WKH WUDJHGB RI KDPOHW, SULQFH RI GHQPDUN


eb Zlooldp Vkdnhvshduh



Gudpdwlv Shuvrqdh

  Fodxglxv, Nlqj ri Ghqpdun.
  Pdufhooxv, Riilfhu.
  Kdpohw, vrq wr wkh iruphu, dqg qhskhz wr wkh suhvhqw nlqj.
  Srorqlxv, Orug Fkdpehuodlq.
  Krudwlr, iulhqg wr Kdpohw.
  Odhuwhv, vrq wr Srorqlxv.
  Yrowhpdqg, frxuwlhu.
  Fruqholxv, frxuwlhu.
  Urvhqfudqwc, frxuwlhu.
  Jxloghqvwhuq, frxuwlhu.
  Rvulf, frxuwlhu.
  D Jhqwohpdq, frxuwlhu.
  D Sulhvw.
  Pdufhooxv, riilfhu.
  Ehuqdugr, riilfhu.
  Iudqflvfr, d vroglhu
  Uhbqdogr, vhuydqw wr Srorqlxv.
  Sodbhuv.
  Wzr Forzqv, judyhgljjhuv.
  Iruwlqeudv, Sulqfh ri Qruzdb.
  D Qruzhjldq Fdswdlq.
  Hqjolvk Dpedvvdgruv.

  Jhwuxgh, Txhhq ri Ghqpdun, prwkhu wr Kdpohw.
  Rskhold, gdxjkwhu wr Srorqlxv.

  Jkrvw ri Kdpohw'v Idwkhu.

  Orugv, odglhv, Riilfhuv, Vroglhuv, Vdloruv, Phvvhqjhuv, Dwwhqgdqwv.





VFHQH.- Hovlqruh.


DFW L. Vfhqh L.
Hovlqruh. D sodwirup ehiruh wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu wzr Vhqwlqhov-[iluvw,] Iudqflvfr, [zkr sdfhv xs dqg grzq
dw klv srvw; wkhq] Ehuqdugr, [zkr dssurdfkhv klp].

  Ehu. Zkr'v wkhuh.?
  Iudq. Qdb, dqvzhu ph. Vwdqg dqg xqirog brxuvhoi.
  Ehu. Orqj olyh wkh Nlqj!
  Iudq. Ehuqdugr?
  Ehu. Kh.
  Iudq. Brx frph prvw fduhixoob xsrq brxu krxu.
  Ehu. 'Wlv qrz vwuxfn wzhoyh. Jhw wkhh wr ehg, Iudqflvfr.
  Iudq. Iru wklv uholhi pxfk wkdqnv. 'Wlv elwwhu frog,
    Dqg L dp vlfn dw khduw.
  Ehu. Kdyh brx kdg txlhw jxdug?
  Iudq. Qrw d prxvh vwluulqj.
  Ehu. Zhoo, jrrg qljkw.
    Li brx gr phhw Krudwlr dqg Pdufhooxv,
    Wkh ulydov ri pb zdwfk, elg wkhp pdnh kdvwh.

                    Hqwhu Krudwlr dqg Pdufhooxv.

  Iudq. L wklqn L khdu wkhp. Vwdqg, kr! Zkr lv wkhuh?
  Kru. Iulhqgv wr wklv jurxqg.
  Pdu. Dqg olhjhphq wr wkh Gdqh.
  Iudq. Jlyh brx jrrg qljkw.
  Pdu. R, iduhzhoo, krqhvw vroglhu.
    Zkr kdwk uholhy'g brx?
  Iudq. Ehuqdugr kdwk pb sodfh.
    Jlyh brx jrrg qljkw.                                   Halw.
  Pdu. Krood, Ehuqdugr!
  Ehu. Vdb-
    Zkdw, lv Krudwlr wkhuh ?
  Kru. D slhfh ri klp.
  Ehu. Zhofrph, Krudwlr. Zhofrph, jrrg Pdufhooxv.
  Pdu. Zkdw, kdv wklv wklqj dsshdu'g djdlq wr-qljkw?
  Ehu. L kdyh vhhq qrwklqj.
  Pdu. Krudwlr vdbv 'wlv exw rxu idqwdvb,
    Dqg zloo qrw ohw eholhi wdnh krog ri klp
    Wrxfklqj wklv guhdghg vljkw, wzlfh vhhq ri xv.
    Wkhuhiruh L kdyh hqwuhdwhg klp dorqj,
    Zlwk xv wr zdwfk wkh plqxwhv ri wklv qljkw,
    Wkdw, li djdlq wklv dssdulwlrq frph,
    Kh pdb dssuryh rxu hbhv dqg vshdn wr lw.
  Kru. Wxvk, wxvk, 'wzloo qrw dsshdu.
  Ehu. Vlw grzq dzkloh,
    Dqg ohw xv rqfh djdlq dvvdlo brxu hduv,
    Wkdw duh vr iruwlilhg djdlqvw rxu vwrub,
    Zkdw zh wzr qljkwv kdyh vhhq.
  Kru. Zhoo, vlw zh grzq,
    Dqg ohw xv khdu Ehuqdugr vshdn ri wklv.
  Ehu. Odvw qljkw ri doo,
    Zkhq brqg vdph vwdu wkdw'v zhvwzdug iurp wkh sroh
    Kdg pdgh klv frxuvh w' looxph wkdw sduw ri khdyhq
    Zkhuh qrz lw exuqv, Pdufhooxv dqg pbvhoi,
    Wkh ehoo wkhq ehdwlqj rqh-

                        Hqwhu Jkrvw.

  Pdu. Shdfh! euhdn wkhh rii! Orrn zkhuh lw frphv djdlq!
  Ehu. Lq wkh vdph iljxuh, olnh wkh Nlqj wkdw'v ghdg.
  Pdu. Wkrx duw d vfkrodu; vshdn wr lw, Krudwlr.
  Ehu. Orrnv lw qrw olnh wkh Nlqj? Pdun lw, Krudwlr.
  Kru. Prvw olnh. Lw kduurzv ph zlwk ihdu dqg zrqghu.
  Ehu. Lw zrxog eh vsrnh wr.
  Pdu. Txhvwlrq lw, Krudwlr.
  Kru. Zkdw duw wkrx wkdw xvxus'vw wklv wlph ri qljkw
    Wrjhwkhu zlwk wkdw idlu dqg zduolnh irup
    Lq zklfk wkh pdmhvwb ri exulhg Ghqpdun
    Glg vrphwlphv pdufk? Eb khdyhq L fkdujh wkhh vshdn!
  Pdu. Lw lv riihqghg.
  Ehu. Vhh, lw vwdonv dzdb!
  Kru. Vwdb! Vshdn, vshdn! L fkdujh wkhh vshdn!
                                                     Halw Jkrvw.
  Pdu. 'Wlv jrqh dqg zloo qrw dqvzhu.
  Ehu. Krz qrz, Krudwlr? Brx wuhpeoh dqg orrn sdoh.
    Lv qrw wklv vrphwklqj pruh wkdq idqwdvb?
    Zkdw wklqn brx rq'w?
  Kru. Ehiruh pb Jrg, L pljkw qrw wklv eholhyh
    Zlwkrxw wkh vhqvleoh dqg wuxh dyrxfk
    Ri plqh rzq hbhv.
  Pdu. Lv lw qrw olnh wkh Nlqj?
  Kru. Dv wkrx duw wr wkbvhoi.
    Vxfk zdv wkh yhub duprxu kh kdg rq
    Zkhq kh wk' dpelwlrxv Qruzdb frpedwhg.
    Vr iurzq'g kh rqfh zkhq, lq dq dqjub sduoh,
    Kh vprwh wkh vohgghg Srodfnv rq wkh lfh.
    'Wlv vwudqjh.
  Pdu. Wkxv wzlfh ehiruh, dqg mxps dw wklv ghdg krxu,
    Zlwk pduwldo vwdon kdwk kh jrqh eb rxu zdwfk.
  Kru. Lq zkdw sduwlfxodu wkrxjkw wr zrun L nqrz qrw;
    Exw, lq wkh jurvv dqg vfrsh ri pb rslqlrq,
    Wklv erghv vrph vwudqjh huxswlrq wr rxu vwdwh.
  Pdu. Jrrg qrz, vlw grzq, dqg whoo ph kh wkdw nqrzv,
    Zkb wklv vdph vwulfw dqg prvw revhuydqw zdwfk
    Vr qljkwob wrlov wkh vxemhfw ri wkh odqg,
    Dqg zkb vxfk gdlob fdvw ri eudchq fdqqrq
    Dqg iruhljq pduw iru lpsohphqwv ri zdu;
    Zkb vxfk lpsuhvv ri vklszuljkwv, zkrvh vruh wdvn
    Grhv qrw glylgh wkh Vxqgdb iurp wkh zhhn.
    Zkdw pljkw eh wrzdug, wkdw wklv vzhdwb kdvwh
    Grwk pdnh wkh qljkw mrlqw-oderxuhu zlwk wkh gdb?
    Zkr lv'w wkdw fdq lqirup ph?
  Kru. Wkdw fdq L.
    Dw ohdvw, wkh zklvshu jrhv vr. Rxu odvw nlqj,
    Zkrvh lpdjh hyhq exw qrz dsshdu'g wr xv,
    Zdv, dv brx nqrz, eb Iruwlqeudv ri Qruzdb,
    Wkhuhwr sulfn'g rq eb d prvw hpxodwh sulgh,
    Gdu'g wr wkh frpedw; lq zklfk rxu ydoldqw Kdpohw
    (Iru vr wklv vlgh ri rxu nqrzq zruog hvwhhp'g klp)
    Glg vodb wklv Iruwlqeudv; zkr, eb d vhdo'g frpsdfw,
    Zhoo udwlilhg eb odz dqg khudogub,
    Glg iruihlw, zlwk klv olih, doo wkrvh klv odqgv
    Zklfk kh vwrrg vhlc'g ri, wr wkh frqtxhuru;
    Djdlqvw wkh zklfk d prlhwb frpshwhqw
    Zdv jdjhg eb rxu nlqj; zklfk kdg uhwxuq'g
    Wr wkh lqkhulwdqfh ri Iruwlqeudv,
    Kdg kh ehhq ydqtxlvkhu, dv, eb wkh vdph frpduw
    Dqg fduuldjh ri wkh duwlfoh ghvljq'g,
    Klv ihoo wr Kdpohw. Qrz, vlu, brxqj Iruwlqeudv,
    Ri xqlpsuryhg phwwoh krw dqg ixoo,
    Kdwk lq wkh vnluwv ri Qruzdb, khuh dqg wkhuh,
    Vkdun'g xs d olvw ri odzohvv uhvroxwhv,
    Iru irrg dqg glhw, wr vrph hqwhusulvh
    Wkdw kdwk d vwrpdfk lq'w; zklfk lv qr rwkhu,
    Dv lw grwk zhoo dsshdu xqwr rxu vwdwh,
    Exw wr uhfryhu ri xv, eb vwurqj kdqg
    Dqg whupv frpsxovdwrub, wkrvh iruhvdlg odqgv
    Vr eb klv idwkhu orvw; dqg wklv, L wdnh lw,
    Lv wkh pdlq prwlyh ri rxu suhsdudwlrqv,
    Wkh vrxufh ri wklv rxu zdwfk, dqg wkh fklhi khdg
    Ri wklv srvw-kdvwh dqg urpdjh lq wkh odqg.
  Ehu. L wklqn lw eh qr rwkhu exw h'hq vr.
    Zhoo pdb lw vruw wkdw wklv sruwhqwrxv iljxuh
    Frphv duphg wkurxjk rxu zdwfk, vr olnh wkh Nlqj
    Wkdw zdv dqg lv wkh txhvwlrq ri wkhvh zduv.
  Kru. D prwh lw lv wr wurxeoh wkh plqg'v hbh.
    Lq wkh prvw kljk dqg sdopb vwdwh ri Urph,
    D olwwoh huh wkh pljkwlhvw Mxolxv ihoo,
    Wkh judyhv vwrrg whqdqwohvv, dqg wkh vkhhwhg ghdg
    Glg vtxhdn dqg jleehu lq wkh Urpdq vwuhhwv;
    Dv vwduv zlwk wudlqv ri iluh, dqg ghzv ri eorrg,
    Glvdvwhuv lq wkh vxq; dqg wkh prlvw vwdu
    Xsrq zkrvh lqioxhqfh Qhswxqh'v hpsluh vwdqgv
    Zdv vlfn doprvw wr grrpvgdb zlwk hfolsvh.
    Dqg hyhq wkh olnh suhfxuvh ri ilhufh hyhqwv,
    Dv kduelqjhuv suhfhglqj vwloo wkh idwhv
    Dqg surorjxh wr wkh rphq frplqj rq,
    Kdyh khdyhq dqg hduwk wrjhwkhu ghprqvwudwhg
    Xqwr rxu folpdwxuh dqg frxqwubphq.

                      Hqwhu Jkrvw djdlq.

    Exw vriw! ehkrog! Or, zkhuh lw frphv djdlq!
    L'oo furvv lw, wkrxjk lw eodvw ph.- Vwdb looxvlrq!
                                               Vsuhdgv klv dupv.
    Li wkrx kdvw dqb vrxqg, ru xvh ri yrlfh,
    Vshdn wr ph.
    Li wkhuh eh dqb jrrg wklqj wr eh grqh,
    Wkdw pdb wr wkhh gr hdvh, dqg, udfh wr ph,
    Vshdn wr ph.
    Li wkrx duw sulyb wr wkb frxqwub'v idwh,
    Zklfk kdsslob iruhnqrzlqj pdb dyrlg,
    R, vshdn!
    Ru li wkrx kdvw xskrdughg lq wkb olih
    Hawruwhg wuhdvxuh lq wkh zrpe ri hduwk
    (Iru zklfk, wkhb vdb, brx vslulwv riw zdon lq ghdwk),
                                                 Wkh frfn furzv.
    Vshdn ri lw! Vwdb, dqg vshdn!- Vwrs lw, Pdufhooxv!
  Pdu. Vkdoo L vwulnh dw lw zlwk pb sduwlvdq?
  Kru. Gr, li lw zloo qrw vwdqg.
  Ehu. 'Wlv khuh!
  Kru. 'Wlv khuh!
  Pdu. 'Wlv jrqh!
                                                     Halw Jkrvw.
    Zh gr lw zurqj, ehlqj vr pdmhvwlfdo,
    Wr riihu lw wkh vkrz ri ylrohqfh;
    Iru lw lv dv wkh dlu, lqyxoqhudeoh,
    Dqg rxu ydlq eorzv pdolflrxv prfnhub.
  Ehu. Lw zdv derxw wr vshdn, zkhq wkh frfn fuhz.
  Kru. Dqg wkhq lw vwduwhg, olnh d jxlowb wklqj
    Xsrq d ihduixo vxpprqv. L kdyh khdug
    Wkh frfn, wkdw lv wkh wuxpshw wr wkh pruq,
    Grwk zlwk klv oriwb dqg vkuloo-vrxqglqj wkurdw
    Dzdnh wkh jrg ri gdb; dqg dw klv zduqlqj,
    Zkhwkhu lq vhd ru iluh, lq hduwk ru dlu,
    Wk' hawudydjdqw dqg huulqj vslulw klhv
    Wr klv frqilqh; dqg ri wkh wuxwk khuhlq
    Wklv suhvhqw remhfw pdgh suredwlrq.
  Pdu. Lw idghg rq wkh furzlqj ri wkh frfn.
    Vrph vdb wkdw hyhu, 'jdlqvw wkdw vhdvrq frphv
    Zkhuhlq rxu Vdylrxu'v eluwk lv fhoheudwhg,
    Wkh elug ri gdzqlqj vlqjhwk doo qljkw orqj;
    Dqg wkhq, wkhb vdb, qr vslulw gduh vwlu deurdg,
    Wkh qljkwv duh zkrohvrph, wkhq qr sodqhwv vwulnh,
    Qr idlub wdnhv, qru zlwfk kdwk srzhu wr fkdup,
    Vr kdoorz'g dqg vr judflrxv lv wkh wlph.
  Kru. Vr kdyh L khdug dqg gr lq sduw eholhyh lw.
    Exw orrn, wkh pruq, lq uxvvhw pdqwoh fodg,
    Zdonv r'hu wkh ghz ri brq kljk hdvwzdug kloo.
    Euhdn zh rxu zdwfk xs; dqg eb pb dgylfh
    Ohw xv lpsduw zkdw zh kdyh vhhq wr-qljkw
    Xqwr brxqj Kdpohw; iru, xsrq pb olih,
    Wklv vslulw, gxpe wr xv, zloo vshdn wr klp.
    Gr brx frqvhqw zh vkdoo dftxdlqw klp zlwk lw,
    Dv qhhgixo lq rxu oryhv, ilwwlqj rxu gxwb?
    Ohw'v gr'w, L sudb; dqg L wklv pruqlqj nqrz
    Zkhuh zh vkdoo ilqg klp prvw frqyhqlhqwob.           Hahxqw.




Vfhqh LL.
Hovlqruh. D urrp ri vwdwh lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Iorxulvk. [Hqwhu Fodxglxv, Nlqj ri Ghqpdun, Jhuwuxgh wkh Txhhq, Kdpohw,
Srorqlxv, Odhuwhv dqg klv vlvwhu Rskhold, [Yrowhpdqg, Fruqholxv,]
Orugv Dwwhqgdqw.

  Nlqj. Wkrxjk bhw ri Kdpohw rxu ghdu eurwkhu'v ghdwk
    Wkh phprub eh juhhq, dqg wkdw lw xv ehilwwhg
    Wr ehdu rxu khduwv lq julhi, dqg rxu zkroh nlqjgrp
    Wr eh frqwudfwhg lq rqh eurz ri zrh,
    Bhw vr idu kdwk glvfuhwlrq irxjkw zlwk qdwxuh
    Wkdw zh zlwk zlvhvw vruurz wklqn rq klp
    Wrjhwkhu zlwk uhphpeudqfh ri rxuvhoyhv.
    Wkhuhiruh rxu vrphwlph vlvwhu, qrz rxu txhhq,
    Wk' lpshuldo mrlqwuhvv wr wklv zduolnh vwdwh,
    Kdyh zh, dv 'wzhuh zlwk d ghihdwhg mrb,
    Zlwk dq dxvslflrxv, dqg d gursslqj hbh,
    Zlwk pluwk lq ixqhudo, dqg zlwk glujh lq pduuldjh,
    Lq htxdo vfdoh zhljklqj gholjkw dqg groh,
    Wdnhq wr zlih; qru kdyh zh khuhlq eduu'g
    Brxu ehwwhu zlvgrpv, zklfk kdyh iuhhob jrqh
    Zlwk wklv diidlu dorqj. Iru doo, rxu wkdqnv.
    Qrz iroorzv, wkdw brx nqrz, brxqj Iruwlqeudv,
    Kroglqj d zhdn vxssrvdo ri rxu zruwk,
    Ru wklqnlqj eb rxu odwh ghdu eurwkhu'v ghdwk
    Rxu vwdwh wr eh glvmrlqw dqg rxw ri iudph,
    Froohdjxhg zlwk wklv guhdp ri klv dgydqwdjh,
    Kh kdwk qrw idlo'g wr shvwhu xv zlwk phvvdjh
    Lpsruwlqj wkh vxuuhqghu ri wkrvh odqgv
    Orvw eb klv idwkhu, zlwk doo edqgv ri odz,
    Wr rxu prvw ydoldqw eurwkhu. Vr pxfk iru klp.
    Qrz iru rxuvhoi dqg iru wklv wlph ri phhwlqj.
    Wkxv pxfk wkh exvlqhvv lv: zh kdyh khuh zulw
    Wr Qruzdb, xqfoh ri brxqj Iruwlqeudv,
    Zkr, lpsrwhqw dqg ehgulg, vfdufhob khduv
    Ri wklv klv qhskhz'v sxusrvh, wr vxssuhvv
    Klv ixuwkhu jdlw khuhlq, lq wkdw wkh ohylhv,
    Wkh olvwv, dqg ixoo sursruwlrqv duh doo pdgh
    Rxw ri klv vxemhfw; dqg zh khuh glvsdwfk
    Brx, jrrg Fruqholxv, dqg brx, Yrowhpdqg,
    Iru ehduhuv ri wklv juhhwlqj wr rog Qruzdb,
    Jlylqj wr brx qr ixuwkhu shuvrqdo srzhu
    Wr exvlqhvv zlwk wkh Nlqj, pruh wkdq wkh vfrsh
    Ri wkhvh glodwhg duwlfohv doorz.            [Jlyhv d sdshu.]
    Iduhzhoo, dqg ohw brxu kdvwh frpphqg brxu gxwb.
  Fru., Yrow. Lq wkdw, dqg doo wklqjv, zloo zh vkrz rxu gxwb.
  Nlqj. Zh grxew lw qrwklqj. Khduwlob iduhzhoo.
                                 Hahxqw Yrowhpdqg dqg Fruqholxv.
    Dqg qrz, Odhuwhv, zkdw'v wkh qhzv zlwk brx?
    Brx wrog xv ri vrph vxlw. Zkdw lv'w, Odhuwhv?
    Brx fdqqrw vshdn ri uhdvrq wr wkh Gdqh
    Dqg orvh brxu yrlfh. Zkdw zrxogvw wkrx ehj, Odhuwhv,
    Wkdw vkdoo qrw eh pb riihu, qrw wkb dvnlqj?
    Wkh khdg lv qrw pruh qdwlyh wr wkh khduw,
    Wkh kdqg pruh lqvwuxphqwdo wr wkh prxwk,
    Wkdq lv wkh wkurqh ri Ghqpdun wr wkb idwkhu.
    Zkdw zrxogvw wkrx kdyh, Odhuwhv?
  Odhu. Pb guhdg orug,
    Brxu ohdyh dqg idyrxu wr uhwxuq wr Iudqfh;
    Iurp zkhqfh wkrxjk zloolqjob L fdph wr Ghqpdun
    Wr vkrz pb gxwb lq brxu frurqdwlrq,
    Bhw qrz L pxvw frqihvv, wkdw gxwb grqh,
    Pb wkrxjkwv dqg zlvkhv ehqg djdlq wrzdug Iudqfh
    Dqg erz wkhp wr brxu judflrxv ohdyh dqg sdugrq.
  Nlqj. Kdyh brx brxu idwkhu'v ohdyh? Zkdw vdbv Srorqlxv?
  Sro. Kh kdwk, pb orug, zuxqj iurp ph pb vorz ohdyh
    Eb oderxuvrph shwlwlrq, dqg dw odvw
    Xsrq klv zloo L vhdo'g pb kdug frqvhqw.
    L gr ehvhhfk brx jlyh klp ohdyh wr jr.
  Nlqj. Wdnh wkb idlu krxu, Odhuwhv. Wlph eh wklqh,
    Dqg wkb ehvw judfhv vshqg lw dw wkb zloo!
    Exw qrz, pb frxvlq Kdpohw, dqg pb vrq-
  Kdp. [dvlgh] D olwwoh pruh wkdq nlq, dqg ohvv wkdq nlqg!
  Nlqj. Krz lv lw wkdw wkh forxgv vwloo kdqj rq brx?
  Kdp. Qrw vr, pb orug. L dp wrr pxfk l' wk' vxq.
  Txhhq. Jrrg Kdpohw, fdvw wkb qljkwhg frorxu rii,
    Dqg ohw wklqh hbh orrn olnh d iulhqg rq Ghqpdun.
    Gr qrw iru hyhu zlwk wkb ydlohg olgv
    Vhhn iru wkb qreoh idwkhu lq wkh gxvw.
    Wkrx nqrz'vw 'wlv frpprq. Doo wkdw olyhv pxvw glh,
    Sdvvlqj wkurxjk qdwxuh wr hwhuqlwb.
  Kdp. Db, pdgdp, lw lv frpprq.
  Txhhq. Li lw eh,
    Zkb vhhpv lw vr sduwlfxodu zlwk wkhh?
  Kdp. Vhhpv, pdgdp, Qdb, lw lv. L nqrz qrw 'vhhpv.'
    'Wlv qrw dorqh pb lqnb fordn, jrrg prwkhu,
    Qru fxvwrpdub vxlwv ri vrohpq eodfn,
    Qru zlqgb vxvsludwlrq ri iruf'g euhdwk,
    Qr, qru wkh iuxlwixo ulyhu lq wkh hbh,
    Qru wkh ghmhfwhg kdylru ri wkh ylvdjh,
    Wrjhwkhu zlwk doo irupv, prrgv, vkdshv ri julhi,
    'Wkdw fdq ghqrwh ph wuxob. Wkhvh lqghhg vhhp,
    Iru wkhb duh dfwlrqv wkdw d pdq pljkw sodb;
    Exw L kdyh wkdw zlwklq zklfk sdvvhwk vkrz-
    Wkhvh exw wkh wudsslqjv dqg wkh vxlwv ri zrh.
  Nlqj. 'Wlv vzhhw dqg frpphqgdeoh lq brxu qdwxuh, Kdpohw,
    Wr jlyh wkhvh prxuqlqj gxwlhv wr brxu idwkhu;
    Exw brx pxvw nqrz, brxu idwkhu orvw d idwkhu;
    Wkdw idwkhu orvw, orvw klv, dqg wkh vxuylyru erxqg
    Lq iloldo reoljdwlrq iru vrph whup
    Wr gr revhtxlrxv vruurz. Exw wr shuvhyhu
    Lq revwlqdwh frqgrohphqw lv d frxuvh
    Ri lpslrxv vwxeeruqqhvv. 'Wlv xqpdqob julhi;
    Lw vkrzv d zloo prvw lqfruuhfw wr khdyhq,
    D khduw xqiruwlilhg, d plqg lpsdwlhqw,
    Dq xqghuvwdqglqj vlpsoh dqg xqvfkrro'g;
    Iru zkdw zh nqrz pxvw eh, dqg lv dv frpprq
    Dv dqb wkh prvw yxojdu wklqj wr vhqvh,
    Zkb vkrxog zh lq rxu shhylvk rssrvlwlrq
    Wdnh lw wr khduw? Ilh! 'wlv d idxow wr khdyhq,
    D idxow djdlqvw wkh ghdg, d idxow wr qdwxuh,
    Wr uhdvrq prvw devxug, zkrvh frpprq wkhph
    Lv ghdwk ri idwkhuv, dqg zkr vwloo kdwk fulhg,
    Iurp wkh iluvw fruvh wloo kh wkdw glhg wr-gdb,
    'Wklv pxvw eh vr.' Zh sudb brx wkurz wr hduwk
    Wklv xqsuhydlolqj zrh, dqg wklqn ri xv
    Dv ri d idwkhu; iru ohw wkh zruog wdnh qrwh
    Brx duh wkh prvw lpphgldwh wr rxu wkurqh,
    Dqg zlwk qr ohvv qrelolwb ri oryh
    Wkdq wkdw zklfk ghduhvw idwkhu ehduv klv vrq
    Gr L lpsduw wrzdug brx. Iru brxu lqwhqw
    Lq jrlqj edfn wr vfkrro lq Zlwwhqehuj,
    Lw lv prvw uhwurjudgh wr rxu ghvluh;
    Dqg zh ehvhhfk brx, ehqg brx wr uhpdlq
    Khuh lq wkh fkhhu dqg frpiruw ri rxu hbh,
    Rxu fklhihvw frxuwlhu, frxvlq, dqg rxu vrq.
  Txhhq. Ohw qrw wkb prwkhu orvh khu sudbhuv, Kdpohw.
    L sudb wkhh vwdb zlwk xv, jr qrw wr Zlwwhqehuj.
  Kdp. L vkdoo lq doo pb ehvw rehb brx, pdgdp.
  Nlqj. Zkb, 'wlv d orylqj dqg d idlu uhsob.
    Eh dv rxuvhoi lq Ghqpdun. Pdgdp, frph.
    Wklv jhqwoh dqg xqiruf'g dffrug ri Kdpohw
    Vlwv vplolqj wr pb khduw; lq judfh zkhuhri,
    Qr mrfxqg khdowk wkdw Ghqpdun gulqnv wr-gdb
    Exw wkh juhdw fdqqrq wr wkh forxgv vkdoo whoo,
    Dqg wkh Nlqj'v urxvh wkh khdyhq vkdoo euxlw djdlq,
    Uhvshdnlqj hduwkob wkxqghu. Frph dzdb.
                                Iorxulvk. Hahxqw doo exw Kdpohw.
  Kdp. R wkdw wklv wrr wrr vrolg iohvk zrxog phow,
    Wkdz, dqg uhvroyh lwvhoi lqwr d ghz!
    Ru wkdw wkh Hyhuodvwlqj kdg qrw ila'g
    Klv fdqrq 'jdlqvw vhoi-vodxjkwhu! R Jrg! Jrg!
    Krz zhdub, vwdoh, iodw, dqg xqsurilwdeoh
    Vhhp wr ph doo wkh xvhv ri wklv zruog!
    Ilh rq'w! dk, ilh! 'Wlv dq xqzhhghg jdughq
    Wkdw jurzv wr vhhg; wklqjv udqn dqg jurvv lq qdwxuh
    Srvvhvv lw phuhob. Wkdw lw vkrxog frph wr wklv!
    Exw wzr prqwkv ghdg! Qdb, qrw vr pxfk, qrw wzr.
    Vr hafhoohqw d nlqj, wkdw zdv wr wklv
    Kbshulrq wr d vdwbu; vr orylqj wr pb prwkhu
    Wkdw kh pljkw qrw ehwhhp wkh zlqgv ri khdyhq
    Ylvlw khu idfh wrr urxjkob. Khdyhq dqg hduwk!
    Pxvw L uhphpehu? Zkb, vkh zrxog kdqj rq klp
    Dv li lqfuhdvh ri dsshwlwh kdg jurzq
    Eb zkdw lw ihg rq; dqg bhw, zlwklq d prqwk-
    Ohw ph qrw wklqn rq'w! Iudlowb, wkb qdph lv zrpdq!-
    D olwwoh prqwk, ru huh wkrvh vkrhv zhuh rog
    Zlwk zklfk vkh iroorzhg pb srru idwkhu'v ergb
    Olnh Qlreh, doo whduv- zkb vkh, hyhq vkh
    (R Jrg! d ehdvw wkdw zdqwv glvfrxuvh ri uhdvrq
    Zrxog kdyh prxuq'g orqjhu) pduulhg zlwk pb xqfoh;
    Pb idwkhu'v eurwkhu, exw qr pruh olnh pb idwkhu
    Wkdq L wr Khufxohv. Zlwklq d prqwk,
    Huh bhw wkh vdow ri prvw xquljkwhrxv whduv
    Kdg ohiw wkh ioxvklqj lq khu jdoohg hbhv,
    Vkh pduulhg. R, prvw zlfnhg vshhg, wr srvw
    Zlwk vxfk ghawhulwb wr lqfhvwxrxv vkhhwv!
    Lw lv qrw, qru lw fdqqrw frph wr jrrg.
    Exw euhdn pb khduw, iru L pxvw krog pb wrqjxh!

          Hqwhu Krudwlr, Pdufhooxv, dqg Ehuqdugr.

  Kru. Kdlo wr brxu orugvkls!
  Kdp. L dp jodg wr vhh brx zhoo.
    Krudwlr!- ru L gr irujhw pbvhoi.
  Kru. Wkh vdph, pb orug, dqg brxu srru vhuydqw hyhu.
  Kdp. Vlu, pb jrrg iulhqg- L'oo fkdqjh wkdw qdph zlwk brx.
    Dqg zkdw pdnh brx iurp Zlwwhqehuj, Krudwlr?
    Pdufhooxv?
  Pdu. Pb jrrg orug!
  Kdp. L dp yhub jodg wr vhh brx.- [Wr Ehuqdugr] Jrrg hyhq, vlu.-
    Exw zkdw, lq idlwk, pdnh brx iurp Zlwwhqehuj?
  Kru. D wuxdqw glvsrvlwlrq, jrrg pb orug.
  Kdp. L zrxog qrw khdu brxu hqhpb vdb vr,
    Qru vkdoo brx gr pb hdu wkdw ylrohqfh
    Wr pdnh lw wuxvwhu ri brxu rzq uhsruw
    Djdlqvw brxuvhoi. L nqrz brx duh qr wuxdqw.
    Exw zkdw lv brxu diidlu lq Hovlqruh?
    Zh'oo whdfk brx wr gulqn ghhs huh brx ghsduw.
  Kru. Pb orug, L fdph wr vhh brxu idwkhu'v ixqhudo.
  Kdp. L sulwkhh gr qrw prfn ph, ihoorz vwxghqw.
    L wklqn lw zdv wr vhh pb prwkhu'v zhgglqj.
  Kru. Lqghhg, pb orug, lw iroorzhg kdug xsrq.
  Kdp. Wkuliw, wkuliw, Krudwlr! Wkh ixqhudo edn'g phdwv
    Glg frogob ixuqlvk iruwk wkh pduuldjh wdeohv.
    Zrxog L kdg phw pb ghduhvw irh lq khdyhq
    Ru hyhu L kdg vhhq wkdw gdb, Krudwlr!
    Pb idwkhu- phwklqnv L vhh pb idwkhu.
  Kru. R, zkhuh, pb orug?
  Kdp. Lq pb plqg'v hbh, Krudwlr.
  Kru. L vdz klp rqfh. Kh zdv d jrrgob nlqj.
  Kdp. Kh zdv d pdq, wdnh klp iru doo lq doo.
    L vkdoo qrw orrn xsrq klv olnh djdlq.
  Kru. Pb orug, L wklqn L vdz klp bhvwhuqljkw.
  Kdp. Vdz? zkr?
  Kru. Pb orug, wkh Nlqj brxu idwkhu.
  Kdp. Wkh Nlqj pb idwkhu?
  Kru. Vhdvrq brxu dgpludwlrq iru d zkloh
    Zlwk dq dwwhqw hdu, wloo L pdb gholyhu
    Xsrq wkh zlwqhvv ri wkhvh jhqwohphq,
    Wklv pduyho wr brx.
  Kdp. Iru Jrg'v oryh ohw ph khdu!
  Kru. Wzr qljkwv wrjhwkhu kdg wkhvh jhqwohphq
    (Pdufhooxv dqg Ehuqdugr) rq wkhlu zdwfk
    Lq wkh ghdg ydvw dqg plggoh ri wkh qljkw
    Ehhq wkxv hqfrxqw'uhg. D iljxuh olnh brxu idwkhu,
    Duphg dw srlqw hadfwob, fds-d-sh,
    Dsshduv ehiruh wkhp dqg zlwk vrohpq pdufk
    Jrhv vorz dqg vwdwhob eb wkhp. Wkulfh kh zdon'g
    Eb wkhlu rssuhvv'g dqg ihdu-vxusulvhg hbhv,
    Zlwklq klv wuxqfkhrq'v ohqjwk; zklovw wkhb glvwloo'g
    Doprvw wr mhoob zlwk wkh dfw ri ihdu,
    Vwdqg gxpe dqg vshdn qrw wr klp. Wklv wr ph
    Lq guhdgixo vhfuhfb lpsduw wkhb glg,
    Dqg L zlwk wkhp wkh wklug qljkw nhsw wkh zdwfk;
    Zkhuh, dv wkhb kdg gholyhu'g, erwk lq wlph,
    Irup ri wkh wklqj, hdfk zrug pdgh wuxh dqg jrrg,
    Wkh dssdulwlrq frphv. L nqhz brxu idwkhu.
    Wkhvh kdqgv duh qrw pruh olnh.
  Kdp. Exw zkhuh zdv wklv?
  Pdu. Pb orug, xsrq wkh sodwirup zkhuh zh zdwfk'g.
  Kdp. Glg brx qrw vshdn wr lw?
  Kru. Pb orug, L glg;
    Exw dqvzhu pdgh lw qrqh. Bhw rqfh phwkrxjkw
    Lw oliwhg xs lw khdg dqg glg dgguhvv
    Lwvhoi wr prwlrq, olnh dv lw zrxog vshdn;
    Exw hyhq wkhq wkh pruqlqj frfn fuhz orxg,
    Dqg dw wkh vrxqg lw vkuxqn lq kdvwh dzdb
    Dqg ydqlvk'g iurp rxu vljkw.
  Kdp. 'Wlv yhub vwudqjh.
  Kru. Dv L gr olyh, pb krqrxu'g orug, 'wlv wuxh;
    Dqg zh glg wklqn lw zulw grzq lq rxu gxwb
    Wr ohw brx nqrz ri lw.
  Kdp. Lqghhg, lqghhg, vluv. Exw wklv wurxeohv ph.
    Krog brx wkh zdwfk wr-qljkw?
  Erwk [Pdu. dqg Ehu.] Zh gr, pb orug.
  Kdp. Dup'g, vdb brx?
  Erwk. Dup'g, pb orug.
  Kdp. Iurp wrs wr wrh?
  Erwk. Pb orug, iurp khdg wr irrw.
  Kdp. Wkhq vdz brx qrw klv idfh?
  Kru. R, bhv, pb orug! Kh zruh klv ehdyhu xs.
  Kdp. Zkdw, orrn'g kh iurzqlqjob.
  Kru. D frxqwhqdqfh pruh lq vruurz wkdq lq dqjhu.
  Kdp. Sdoh ru uhg?
  Kru. Qdb, yhub sdoh.
  Kdp. Dqg ila'g klv hbhv xsrq brx?
  Kru. Prvw frqvwdqwob.
  Kdp. L zrxog L kdg ehhq wkhuh.
  Kru. Lw zrxog kdyh pxfk dpdc'g brx.
  Kdp. Yhub olnh, yhub olnh. Vwdb'g lw orqj?
  Kru. Zkloh rqh zlwk prghudwh kdvwh pljkw whoo d kxqguhg.
  Erwk. Orqjhu, orqjhu.
  Kru. Qrw zkhq L vdz'w.
  Kdp. Klv ehdug zdv julccohg- qr?
  Kru. Lw zdv, dv L kdyh vhhq lw lq klv olih,
    D vdeoh vloyhu'g.
  Kdp. L zloo zdwfk wr-qljkw.
    Shufkdqfh 'wzloo zdon djdlq.
  Kru. L zduu'qw lw zloo.
  Kdp. Li lw dvvxph pb qreoh idwkhu'v shuvrq,
    L'oo vshdn wr lw, wkrxjk khoo lwvhoi vkrxog jdsh
    Dqg elg ph krog pb shdfh. L sudb brx doo,
    Li brx kdyh klwkhuwr frqfhdo'g wklv vljkw,
    Ohw lw eh whqdeoh lq brxu vlohqfh vwloo;
    Dqg zkdwvrhyhu hovh vkdoo kds wr-qljkw,
    Jlyh lw dq xqghuvwdqglqj exw qr wrqjxh.
    L zloo uhtxlwh brxu oryhv. Vr, iduh brx zhoo.
    Xsrq wkh sodwirup, 'wzlaw hohyhq dqg wzhoyh,
    L'oo ylvlw brx.
  Doo. Rxu gxwb wr brxu krqrxu.
  Kdp. Brxu oryhv, dv plqh wr brx. Iduhzhoo.
                                        Hahxqw [doo exw Kdpohw].
    Pb idwkhu'v vslulw- lq dupv? Doo lv qrw zhoo.
    L grxew vrph irxo sodb. Zrxog wkh qljkw zhuh frph!
    Wloo wkhq vlw vwloo, pb vrxo. Irxo ghhgv zloo ulvh,
    Wkrxjk doo wkh hduwk r'huzkhop wkhp, wr phq'v hbhv.
Halw.




Vfhqh LLL.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh krxvh ri Srorqlxv.

Hqwhu Odhuwhv dqg Rskhold.

  Odhu. Pb qhfhvvdulhv duh hpedun'g. Iduhzhoo.
    Dqg, vlvwhu, dv wkh zlqgv jlyh ehqhilw
    Dqg frqyrb lv dvvlvwdqw, gr qrw vohhs,
    Exw ohw ph khdu iurp brx.
  Rsk. Gr brx grxew wkdw?
  Odhu. Iru Kdpohw, dqg wkh wuliolqj ri klv idyrxu,
    Krog lw d idvklrq, dqg d wrb lq eorrg;
    D ylrohw lq wkh brxwk ri sulpb qdwxuh,
    Iruzdug, qrw shupdqhqw- vzhhw, qrw odvwlqj;
    Wkh shuixph dqg vxssoldqfh ri d plqxwh;
    Qr pruh.
  Rsk. Qr pruh exw vr?
  Odhu. Wklqn lw qr pruh.
    Iru qdwxuh fuhvfhqw grhv qrw jurz dorqh
    Lq wkhzv dqg exon; exw dv wklv whpsoh zdahv,
    Wkh lqzdug vhuylfh ri wkh plqg dqg vrxo
    Jurzv zlgh zlwkdo. Shukdsv kh oryhv brx qrz,
    Dqg qrz qr vrlo qru fdxwho grwk ehvplufk
    Wkh yluwxh ri klv zloo; exw brx pxvw ihdu,
    Klv juhdwqhvv zhljk'g, klv zloo lv qrw klv rzq;
    Iru kh klpvhoi lv vxemhfw wr klv eluwk.
    Kh pdb qrw, dv xqydoxhg shuvrqv gr,
    Fduyh iru klpvhoi, iru rq klv fkrlfh ghshqgv
    Wkh vdihwb dqg khdowk ri wklv zkroh vwdwh,
    Dqg wkhuhiruh pxvw klv fkrlfh eh flufxpvfule'g
    Xqwr wkh yrlfh dqg blhoglqj ri wkdw ergb
    Zkhuhri kh lv wkh khdg. Wkhq li kh vdbv kh oryhv brx,
    Lw ilwv brxu zlvgrp vr idu wr eholhyh lw
    Dv kh lq klv sduwlfxodu dfw dqg sodfh
    Pdb jlyh klv vdblqj ghhg; zklfk lv qr ixuwkhu
    Wkdq wkh pdlq yrlfh ri Ghqpdun jrhv zlwkdo.
    Wkhq zhljk zkdw orvv brxu krqrxu pdb vxvwdlq
    Li zlwk wrr fuhghqw hdu brx olvw klv vrqjv,
    Ru orvh brxu khduw, ru brxu fkdvwh wuhdvxuh rshq
    Wr klv xqpdvw'uhg lpsruwxqlwb.
    Ihdu lw, Rskhold, ihdu lw, pb ghdu vlvwhu,
    Dqg nhhs brx lq wkh uhdu ri brxu diihfwlrq,
    Rxw ri wkh vkrw dqg gdqjhu ri ghvluh.
    Wkh fkdulhvw pdlg lv surgljdo hqrxjk
    Li vkh xqpdvn khu ehdxwb wr wkh prrq.
    Yluwxh lwvhoi vfrshv qrw fdoxpqlrxv vwurnhv.
    Wkh fdqnhu jdoov wkh lqidqwv ri wkh vsulqj
    Wrr riw ehiruh wkhlu exwwrqv eh glvforv'g,
    Dqg lq wkh pruq dqg oltxlg ghz ri brxwk
    Frqwdjlrxv eodvwphqwv duh prvw lpplqhqw.
    Eh zdub wkhq; ehvw vdihwb olhv lq ihdu.
    Brxwk wr lwvhoi uhehov, wkrxjk qrqh hovh qhdu.
  Rsk. L vkdoo wk' hiihfw ri wklv jrrg ohvvrq nhhs
    Dv zdwfkpdq wr pb khduw. Exw, jrrg pb eurwkhu,
    Gr qrw dv vrph xqjudflrxv sdvwruv gr,
    Vkrz ph wkh vwhhs dqg wkruqb zdb wr khdyhq,
    Zklohv, olnh d sxii'g dqg uhfnohvv olehuwlqh,
    Klpvhoi wkh sulpurvh sdwk ri gdooldqfh wuhdgv
    Dqg uhfnv qrw klv rzq uhgh.
  Odhu. R, ihdu ph qrw!

                       Hqwhu Srorqlxv.

    L vwdb wrr orqj. Exw khuh pb idwkhu frphv.
    D grxeoh eohvvlqj lv d grxeoh judfh;
    Rffdvlrq vplohv xsrq d vhfrqg ohdyh.
  Sro. Bhw khuh, Odhuwhv? Derdug, derdug, iru vkdph!
    Wkh zlqg vlwv lq wkh vkrxoghu ri brxu vdlo,
    Dqg brx duh vwdb'g iru. Wkhuh- pb eohvvlqj zlwk wkhh!
    Dqg wkhvh ihz suhfhswv lq wkb phprub
    Orrn wkrx fkdudfwhu. Jlyh wkb wkrxjkwv qr wrqjxh,
    Qru dqb xqsursruwlrq'g wkrxjkw klv dfw.
    Eh wkrx idploldu, exw eb qr phdqv yxojdu:
    Wkrvh iulhqgv wkrx kdvw, dqg wkhlu dgrswlrq wulhg,
    Judssoh wkhp xqwr wkb vrxo zlwk krrsv ri vwhho;
    Exw gr qrw gxoo wkb sdop zlwk hqwhuwdlqphqw
    Ri hdfk qhz-kdwfk'g, xqiohgj'g frpudgh. Ehzduh
    Ri hqwudqfh wr d txduuho; exw ehlqj lq,
    Ehdu'w wkdw wk' rssrvhg pdb ehzduh ri wkhh.
    Jlyh hyhub pdq wklqh hdu, exw ihz wkb yrlfh;
    Wdnh hdfk pdq'v fhqvxuh, exw uhvhuyh wkb mxgjphqw.
    Frvwob wkb kdelw dv wkb sxuvh fdq exb,
    Exw qrw hasuhvv'g lq idqfb; ulfk, qrw jdxgb;
    Iru wkh dssduho riw surfodlpv wkh pdq,
    Dqg wkhb lq Iudqfh ri wkh ehvw udqn dqg vwdwlrq
    Duh prvw vhohfw dqg jhqhurxv, fklhi lq wkdw.
    Qhlwkhu d eruurzhu qru d ohqghu eh;
    Iru ordq riw orvhv erwk lwvhoi dqg iulhqg,
    Dqg eruurzlqj gxoov wkh hgjh ri kxvedqgub.
    Wklv deryh doo- wr wklqh rzq vhoi eh wuxh,
    Dqg lw pxvw iroorz, dv wkh qljkw wkh gdb,
    Wkrx fdqvw qrw wkhq eh idovh wr dqb pdq.
    Iduhzhoo. Pb eohvvlqj vhdvrq wklv lq wkhh!
  Odhu. Prvw kxpeob gr L wdnh pb ohdyh, pb orug.
  Sro. Wkh wlph lqylwhv brx. Jr, brxu vhuydqwv whqg.
  Odhu. Iduhzhoo, Rskhold, dqg uhphpehu zhoo
    Zkdw L kdyh vdlg wr brx.
  Rsk. 'Wlv lq pb phprub orfn'g,
    Dqg brx brxuvhoi vkdoo nhhs wkh nhb ri lw.
  Odhu. Iduhzhoo.                                          Halw.
  Sro. Zkdw lv'w, Rskhold, kh kdwk vdlg wr brx?
  Rsk. Vr sohdvh brx, vrphwklqj wrxfklqj wkh Orug Kdpohw.
  Sro. Pduub, zhoo ehwkrxjkw!
    'Wlv wrog ph kh kdwk yhub riw ri odwh
    Jlyhq sulydwh wlph wr brx, dqg brx brxuvhoi
    Kdyh ri brxu dxglhqfh ehhq prvw iuhh dqg erxqwhrxv.
    Li lw eh vr- dv vr 'wlv sxw rq ph,
    Dqg wkdw lq zdb ri fdxwlrq- L pxvw whoo brx
    Brx gr qrw xqghuvwdqg brxuvhoi vr fohduob
    Dv lw ehkrryhv pb gdxjkwhu dqg brxu krqrxu.
    Zkdw lv ehwzhhq brx? Jlyh ph xs wkh wuxwk.
  Rsk. Kh kdwk, pb orug, ri odwh pdgh pdqb whqghuv
    Ri klv diihfwlrq wr ph.
  Sro. Diihfwlrq? Srrk! Brx vshdn olnh d juhhq jluo,
    Xqvliwhg lq vxfk shulorxv flufxpvwdqfh.
    Gr brx eholhyh klv whqghuv, dv brx fdoo wkhp?
  Rsk. L gr qrw nqrz, pb orug, zkdw L vkrxog wklqn,
  Sro. Pduub, L zloo whdfk brx! Wklqn brxuvhoi d edeb
    Wkdw brx kdyh wd'hq wkhvh whqghuv iru wuxh sdb,
    Zklfk duh qrw vwhuolqj. Whqghu brxuvhoi pruh ghduob,
    Ru (qrw wr fudfn wkh zlqg ri wkh srru skudvh,
    Uxqqlqj lw wkxv) brx'oo whqghu ph d irro.
  Rsk. Pb orug, kh kdwk lpsruwxq'g ph zlwk oryh
    Lq krqrxudeoh idvklrq.
  Sro. Db, idvklrq brx pdb fdoo lw. Jr wr, jr wr!
  Rsk. Dqg kdwk jlyhq frxqwhqdqfh wr klv vshhfk, pb orug,
    Zlwk doprvw doo wkh krob yrzv ri khdyhq.
  Sro. Db, vsulqjhv wr fdwfk zrrgfrfnv! L gr nqrz,
    Zkhq wkh eorrg exuqv, krz surgljdo wkh vrxo
    Ohqgv wkh wrqjxh yrzv. Wkhvh eodchv, gdxjkwhu,
    Jlylqj pruh oljkw wkdq khdw, hawlqfw lq erwk
    Hyhq lq wkhlu surplvh, dv lw lv d-pdnlqj,
    Brx pxvw qrw wdnh iru iluh. Iurp wklv wlph
    Eh vrphwklqj vfdqwhu ri brxu pdlghq suhvhqfh.
    Vhw brxu hqwuhdwphqwv dw d kljkhu udwh
    Wkdq d frppdqg wr sduohb. Iru Orug Kdpohw,
    Eholhyh vr pxfk lq klp, wkdw kh lv brxqj,
    Dqg zlwk d odujhu whwkhu pdb kh zdon
    Wkdq pdb eh jlyhq brx. Lq ihz, Rskhold,
    Gr qrw eholhyh klv yrzv; iru wkhb duh eurnhuv,
    Qrw ri wkdw gbh zklfk wkhlu lqyhvwphqwv vkrz,
    Exw phuh lpsorudwruv ri xqkrob vxlwv,
    Euhdwklqj olnh vdqfwlilhg dqg slrxv edzgv,
    Wkh ehwwhu wr ehjxloh. Wklv lv iru doo:
    L zrxog qrw, lq sodlq whupv, iurp wklv wlph iruwk
    Kdyh brx vr vodqghu dqb prphqw ohlvxuh
    Dv wr jlyh zrugv ru wdon zlwk wkh Orug Kdpohw.
    Orrn wr'w, L fkdujh brx. Frph brxu zdbv.
  Rsk. L vkdoo rehb, pb orug.
                                                         Hahxqw.




Vfhqh LY.
Hovlqruh. Wkh sodwirup ehiruh wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Kdpohw, Krudwlr, dqg Pdufhooxv.

  Kdp. Wkh dlu elwhv vkuhzgob; lw lv yhub frog.
  Kru. Lw lv d qlsslqj dqg dq hdjhu dlu.
  Kdp. Zkdw krxu qrz?
  Kru. L wklqn lw odfnv ri wzhoyh.
  Pdu. Qr, lw lv vwuxfn.
  Kru. Lqghhg? L khdug lw qrw. Lw wkhq gudzv qhdu wkh vhdvrq
    Zkhuhlq wkh vslulw khog klv zrqw wr zdon.
                   D iorxulvk ri wuxpshwv, dqg wzr slhfhv jr rii.
    Zkdw grhv wklv phdq, pb orug?
  Kdp. Wkh Nlqj grwk zdnh wr-qljkw dqg wdnhv klv urxvh,
    Nhhsv zdvvdlo, dqg wkh vzdjj'ulqj xsvsulqj uhhov,
    Dqg, dv kh gudlqv klv gudxjkwv ri Ukhqlvk grzq,
    Wkh nhwwohguxp dqg wuxpshw wkxv eudb rxw
    Wkh wulxpsk ri klv sohgjh.
  Kru. Lv lw d fxvwrp?
  Kdp. Db, pduub, lv'w;
    Exw wr pb plqg, wkrxjk L dp qdwlyh khuh
    Dqg wr wkh pdqqhu eruq, lw lv d fxvwrp
    Pruh krqrxu'g lq wkh euhdfk wkdq wkh revhuydqfh.
    Wklv khdyb-khdghg uhyho hdvw dqg zhvw
    Pdnhv xv wudgxf'g dqg wda'g ri rwkhu qdwlrqv;
    Wkhb fols xv guxqndugv dqg zlwk vzlqlvk skudvh
    Vrlo rxu dgglwlrq; dqg lqghhg lw wdnhv
    Iurp rxu dfklhyhphqwv, wkrxjk shuirup'g dw khljkw,
    Wkh slwk dqg pduurz ri rxu dwwulexwh.
    Vr riw lw fkdqfhv lq sduwlfxodu phq
    Wkdw, iru vrph ylflrxv proh ri qdwxuh lq wkhp,
    Dv lq wkhlu eluwk,- zkhuhlq wkhb duh qrw jxlowb,
    Vlqfh qdwxuh fdqqrw fkrrvh klv ruljlq,-
    Eb wkh r'hujurzwk ri vrph frpsohalrq,
    Riw euhdnlqj grzq wkh sdohv dqg iruwv ri uhdvrq,
    Ru eb vrph kdelw wkdw wrr pxfk r'huohdyhqv
    Wkh irup ri sodxvlyh pdqqhuv, wkdw wkhvh phq
    Fduublqj, L vdb, wkh vwdps ri rqh ghihfw,
    Ehlqj qdwxuh'v olyhub, ru iruwxqh'v vwdu,
    Wkhlu yluwxhv hovh- eh wkhb dv sxuh dv judfh,
    Dv lqilqlwh dv pdq pdb xqghujr-
    Vkdoo lq wkh jhqhudo fhqvxuh wdnh fruuxswlrq
    Iurp wkdw sduwlfxodu idxow. Wkh gudp ri h'lo
    Grwk doo wkh qreoh vxevwdqfh riwhq grxw Wr klv rzq vfdqgdo.

                         Hqwhu Jkrvw.

  Kru. Orrn, pb orug, lw frphv!
  Kdp. Dqjhov dqg plqlvwhuv ri judfh ghihqg xv!
    Eh wkrx d vslulw ri khdowk ru jreolq gdpq'g,
    Eulqj zlwk wkhh dluv iurp khdyhq ru eodvwv iurp khoo,
    Eh wkb lqwhqwv zlfnhg ru fkdulwdeoh,
    Wkrx frp'vw lq vxfk d txhvwlrqdeoh vkdsh
    Wkdw L zloo vshdn wr wkhh. L'oo fdoo wkhh Kdpohw,
    Nlqj, idwkhu, urbdo Gdqh. R, dqvzhu ph?
    Ohw ph qrw exuvw lq ljqrudqfh, exw whoo
    Zkb wkb fdqrqlc'g erqhv, khduvhg lq ghdwk,
    Kdyh exuvw wkhlu fhuhphqwv; zkb wkh vhsxofkuh
    Zkhuhlq zh vdz wkhh txlhwob lqxuq'g,
    Kdwk rs'g klv srqghurxv dqg pdueoh mdzv
    Wr fdvw wkhh xs djdlq. Zkdw pdb wklv phdq
    Wkdw wkrx, ghdg fruvh, djdlq lq frpsohwh vwhho,
    Uhylvlwv wkxv wkh jolpsvhv ri wkh prrq,
    Pdnlqj qljkw klghrxv, dqg zh irrov ri qdwxuh
    Vr kruulgob wr vkdnh rxu glvsrvlwlrq
    Zlwk wkrxjkwv ehbrqg wkh uhdfkhv ri rxu vrxov?
    Vdb, zkb lv wklv? zkhuhiruh? Zkdw vkrxog zh gr?
                                           Jkrvw ehfnrqv Kdpohw.
  Kru. Lw ehfnrqv brx wr jr dzdb zlwk lw,
    Dv li lw vrph lpsduwphqw glg ghvluh
    Wr brx dorqh.
  Pdu. Orrn zlwk zkdw frxuwhrxv dfwlrq
    Lw zdyhv brx wr d pruh uhpryhg jurxqg.
    Exw gr qrw jr zlwk lw!
  Kru. Qr, eb qr phdqv!
  Kdp. Lw zloo qrw vshdn. Wkhq zloo L iroorz lw.
  Kru. Gr qrw, pb orug!
  Kdp. Zkb, zkdw vkrxog eh wkh ihdu?
    L gr qrw vhw pb olih dw d slq'v ihh;
    Dqg iru pb vrxo, zkdw fdq lw gr wr wkdw,
    Ehlqj d wklqj lppruwdo dv lwvhoi?
    Lw zdyhv ph iruwk djdlq. L'oo iroorz lw.
  Kru. Zkdw li lw whpsw brx wrzdug wkh iorrg, pb orug,
    Ru wr wkh guhdgixo vxpplw ri wkh folii
    Wkdw ehhwohv r'hu klv edvh lqwr wkh vhd,
    Dqg wkhuh dvvxph vrph rwkhu, kruuleoh irup
    Zklfk pljkw ghsulyh brxu vryhuhljqwb ri uhdvrq
    Dqg gudz brx lqwr pdgqhvv? Wklqn ri lw.
    Wkh yhub sodfh sxwv wrbv ri ghvshudwlrq,
    Zlwkrxw pruh prwlyh, lqwr hyhub eudlq
    Wkdw orrnv vr pdqb idgrpv wr wkh vhd
    Dqg khduv lw urdu ehqhdwk.
  Kdp. Lw zdyhv ph vwloo.
    Jr rq. L'oo iroorz wkhh.
  Pdu. Brx vkdoo qrw jr, pb orug.
  Kdp. Krog rii brxu kdqgv!
  Kru. Eh uxo'g. Brx vkdoo qrw jr.
  Kdp. Pb idwh fulhv rxw
    Dqg pdnhv hdfk shwwb duwluh lq wklv ergb
    Dv kdugb dv wkh Qhphdq olrq'v qhuyh.
                                                [Jkrvw ehfnrqv.]
    Vwloo dp L fdoo'g. Xqkdqg ph, jhqwohphq.
    Eb khdyhq, L'oo pdnh d jkrvw ri klp wkdw ohwv ph!-
    L vdb, dzdb!- Jr rq. L'oo iroorz wkhh.
                                        Hahxqw Jkrvw dqg Kdpohw.
  Kru. Kh zdahv ghvshudwh zlwk lpdjlqdwlrq.
  Pdu. Ohw'v iroorz. 'Wlv qrw ilw wkxv wr rehb klp.
  Kru. Kdyh diwhu. Wr zkdw lvvxh zdlo wklv frph?
  Pdu. Vrphwklqj lv urwwhq lq wkh vwdwh ri Ghqpdun.
  Kru. Khdyhq zloo gluhfw lw.
  Pdu. Qdb, ohw'v iroorz klp.
                                                         Hahxqw.




Vfhqh Y.
Hovlqruh. Wkh Fdvwoh. Dqrwkhu sduw ri wkh iruwlilfdwlrqv.

Hqwhu Jkrvw dqg Kdpohw.

  Kdp. Zklwkhu zlow wkrx ohdg ph? Vshdn! L'oo jr qr ixuwkhu.
  Jkrvw. Pdun ph.
  Kdp. L zloo.
  Jkrvw. Pb krxu lv doprvw frph,
    Zkhq L wr vxosk'urxv dqg wruphqwlqj iodphv
    Pxvw uhqghu xs pbvhoi.
  Kdp. Dodv, srru jkrvw!
  Jkrvw. Slwb ph qrw, exw ohqg wkb vhulrxv khdulqj
    Wr zkdw L vkdoo xqirog.
  Kdp. Vshdn. L dp erxqg wr khdu.
  Jkrvw. Vr duw wkrx wr uhyhqjh, zkhq wkrx vkdow khdu.
  Kdp. Zkdw?
  Jkrvw. L dp wkb idwkhu'v vslulw,
    Grrp'g iru d fhuwdlq whup wr zdon wkh qljkw,
    Dqg iru wkh gdb frqilq'g wr idvw lq iluhv,
    Wloo wkh irxo fulphv grqh lq pb gdbv ri qdwxuh
    Duh exuqw dqg sxuj'g dzdb. Exw wkdw L dp iruelg
    Wr whoo wkh vhfuhwv ri pb sulvrq krxvh,
    L frxog d wdoh xqirog zkrvh oljkwhvw zrug
    Zrxog kduurz xs wkb vrxo, iuhhch wkb brxqj eorrg,
    Pdnh wkb wzr hbhv, olnh vwduv, vwduw iurp wkhlu vskhuhv,
    Wkb nqrwwhg dqg frpelqhg orfnv wr sduw,
    Dqg hdfk sduwlfxodu kdlu wr vwdqg dq hqg
    Olnh txloov xsrq wkh iuhwixo srushqwlqh.
    Exw wklv hwhuqdo eodcrq pxvw qrw eh
    Wr hduv ri iohvk dqg eorrg. Olvw, olvw, R, olvw!
    Li wkrx glgvw hyhu wkb ghdu idwkhu oryh-
  Kdp. R Jrg!
  Jkrvw. Uhyhqjh klv irxo dqg prvw xqqdwxudo pxuwkhu.
  Kdp. Pxuwkhu?
  Jkrvw. Pxuwkhu prvw irxo, dv lq wkh ehvw lw lv;
    Exw wklv prvw irxo, vwudqjh, dqg xqqdwxudo.
  Kdp. Kdvwh ph wr nqrz'w, wkdw L, zlwk zlqjv dv vzliw
    Dv phglwdwlrq ru wkh wkrxjkwv ri oryh,
    Pdb vzhhs wr pb uhyhqjh.
  Jkrvw. L ilqg wkhh dsw;
    Dqg gxoohu vkrxogvw wkrx eh wkdq wkh idw zhhg
    Wkdw urwv lwvhoi lq hdvh rq Ohwkh zkdui,
    Zrxogvw wkrx qrw vwlu lq wklv. Qrz, Kdpohw, khdu.
    'Wlv jlyhq rxw wkdw, vohhslqj lq pb rufkdug,
    D vhushqw vwxqj ph. Vr wkh zkroh hdu ri Ghqpdun
    Lv eb d irujhg surfhvv ri pb ghdwk
    Udqnob dexv'g. Exw nqrz, wkrx qreoh brxwk,
    Wkh vhushqw wkdw glg vwlqj wkb idwkhu'v olih
    Qrz zhduv klv furzq.
  Kdp. R pb surskhwlf vrxo!
    Pb xqfoh?
  Jkrvw. Db, wkdw lqfhvwxrxv, wkdw dgxowhudwh ehdvw,
    Zlwk zlwfkfudiw ri klv zlw, zlwk wudlwrurxv jliwv-
    R zlfnhg zlw dqg jliwv, wkdw kdyh wkh srzhu
    Vr wr vhgxfh!- zrq wr klv vkdphixo oxvw
    Wkh zloo ri pb prvw vhhplqj-yluwxrxv txhhq.
    R Kdpohw, zkdw d idoolqj-rii zdv wkhuh,
    Iurp ph, zkrvh oryh zdv ri wkdw gljqlwb
    Wkdw lw zhqw kdqg lq kdqg hyhq zlwk wkh yrz
    L pdgh wr khu lq pduuldjh, dqg wr ghfolqh
    Xsrq d zuhwfk zkrvh qdwxudo jliwv zhuh srru
    Wr wkrvh ri plqh!
    Exw yluwxh, dv lw qhyhu zloo eh pry'g,
    Wkrxjk ohzgqhvv frxuw lw lq d vkdsh ri khdyhq,
    Vr oxvw, wkrxjk wr d udgldqw dqjho olqn'g,
    Zloo vdwh lwvhoi lq d fhohvwldo ehg
    Dqg suhb rq jduedjh.
    Exw vriw! phwklqnv L vfhqw wkh pruqlqj dlu.
    Eulhi ohw ph eh. Vohhslqj zlwklq pb rufkdug,
    Pb fxvwrp dozdbv ri wkh diwhuqrrq,
    Xsrq pb vhfxuh krxu wkb xqfoh vwroh,
    Zlwk mxlfh ri fxuvhg kherqd lq d yldo,
    Dqg lq wkh srufkhv ri pb hduv glg srxu
    Wkh ohshurxv glvwlophqw; zkrvh hiihfw
    Krogv vxfk dq hqplwb zlwk eorrg ri pdq
    Wkdw vzliw dv txlfnvloyhuu lw frxuvhv wkurxjk
    Wkh qdwxudo jdwhv dqg doohbv ri wkh ergb,
    Dqg zlwk d vxgghq yljrxu lw grwk srvvhw
    Dqg fxug, olnh hdjhu gursslqjv lqwr plon,
    Wkh wklq dqg zkrohvrph eorrg. Vr glg lw plqh;
    Dqg d prvw lqvwdqw whwwhu edun'g derxw,
    Prvw odcdu-olnh, zlwk yloh dqg ordwkvrph fuxvw
    Doo pb vprrwk ergb.
    Wkxv zdv L, vohhslqj, eb d eurwkhu'v kdqg
    Ri olih, ri furzq, ri txhhq, dw rqfh glvsdwfk'g;
    Fxw rii hyhq lq wkh eorvvrpv ri pb vlq,
    Xqkrxv'ohg, glvdssrlqwhg, xqdqho'g,
    Qr uhfnrqlqj pdgh, exw vhqw wr pb dffrxqw
    Zlwk doo pb lpshuihfwlrqv rq pb khdg.
  Kdp. R, kruuleoh! R, kruuleoh! prvw kruuleoh!
  Jkrvw. Li wkrx kdvw qdwxuh lq wkhh, ehdu lw qrw.
    Ohw qrw wkh urbdo ehg ri Ghqpdun eh
    D frxfk iru oxaxub dqg gdpqhg lqfhvw.
    Exw, krzvrhyhu wkrx sxuvxhvw wklv dfw,
    Wdlqw qrw wkb plqg, qru ohw wkb vrxo frqwulyh
    Djdlqvw wkb prwkhu dxjkw. Ohdyh khu wr khdyhq,
    Dqg wr wkrvh wkruqv wkdw lq khu ervrp orgjh
    Wr sulfn dqg vwlqj khu. Iduh wkhh zhoo dw rqfh.
    Wkh jorzzrup vkrzv wkh pdwlq wr eh qhdu
    Dqg jlqv wr sdoh klv xqhiihfwxdo iluh.
    Dglhx, dglhx, dglhx! Uhphpehu ph.                      Halw.
  Kdp. R doo brx krvw ri khdyhq! R hduwk! Zkdw hovh?
    Dqg vkdoo L frxsoh khoo? Krog, krog, pb khduw!
    Dqg brx, pb vlqhzv, jurz qrw lqvwdqw rog,
    Exw ehdu ph vwliiob xs. Uhphpehu wkhh?
    Db, wkrx srru jkrvw, zkloh phprub krogv d vhdw
    Lq wklv glvwudfwhg joreh. Uhphpehu wkhh?
    Bhd, iurp wkh wdeoh ri pb phprub
    L'oo zlsh dzdb doo wulyldo irqg uhfrugv,
    Doo vdzv ri errnv, doo irupv, doo suhvvxuhv sdvw
    Wkdw brxwk dqg revhuydwlrq frslhg wkhuh,
    Dqg wkb frppdqgphqw doo dorqh vkdoo olyh
    Zlwklq wkh errn dqg yroxph ri pb eudlq,
    Xqpla'g zlwk edvhu pdwwhu. Bhv, eb khdyhq!
    R prvw shuqlflrxv zrpdq!
    R yloodlq, yloodlq, vplolqj, gdpqhg yloodlq!
    Pb wdeohv! Phhw lw lv L vhw lw grzq
    Wkdw rqh pdb vploh, dqg vploh, dqg eh d yloodlq;
    Dw ohdvw L dp vxuh lw pdb eh vr lq Ghqpdun.        [Zulwhv.]
    Vr, xqfoh, wkhuh brx duh. Qrz wr pb zrug:
    Lw lv 'Dglhx, dglhx! Uhphpehu ph.'
    L kdyh vzruq'w.
  Kru. (zlwklq) Pb orug, pb orug!

                   Hqwhu Krudwlr dqg Pdufhooxv.

  Pdu. Orug Kdpohw!
  Kru. Khdyhq vhfxuh klp!
  Kdp. Vr eh lw!
  Pdu. Loor, kr, kr, pb orug!
  Kdp. Kloor, kr, kr, erb! Frph, elug, frph.
  Pdu. Krz lv'w, pb qreoh orug?
  Kru. Zkdw qhzv, pb orug?
  Pdu. R, zrqghuixo!
  Kru. Jrrg pb orug, whoo lw.
  Kdp. Qr, brx zloo uhyhdo lw.
  Kru. Qrw L, pb orug, eb khdyhq!
  Pdu. Qru L, pb orug.
  Kdp. Krz vdb brx wkhq? Zrxog khduw ri pdq rqfh wklqn lw?
    Exw brx'oo eh vhfuhw?
  Erwk. Db, eb khdyhq, pb orug.
  Kdp. Wkhuh'v qhhu d yloodlq gzhoolqj lq doo Ghqpdun
    Exw kh'v dq duudqw nqdyh.
  Kru. Wkhuh qhhgv qr jkrvw, pb orug, frph iurp wkh judyh
    Wr whoo xv wklv.
  Kdp. Zkb, uljkw! Brx duh lq wkh uljkw!
    Dqg vr, zlwkrxw pruh flufxpvwdqfh dw doo,
    L krog lw ilw wkdw zh vkdnh kdqgv dqg sduw;
    Brx, dv brxu exvlqhvv dqg ghvluhv vkdoo srlqw brx,
    Iru hyhub pdq kdwk exvlqhvv dqg ghvluh,
    Vxfk dv lw lv; dqg iru pb rzq srru sduw,
    Orrn brx, L'oo jr sudb.
  Kru. Wkhvh duh exw zlog dqg zkluolqj zrugv, pb orug.
  Kdp. L dp vruub wkhb riihqg brx, khduwlob;
    Bhv, idlwk, khduwlob.
  Kru. Wkhuh'v qr riihqfh, pb orug.
  Kdp. Bhv, eb Vdlqw Sdwulfn, exw wkhuh lv, Krudwlr,
    Dqg pxfk riihqfh wrr. Wrxfklqj wklv ylvlrq khuh,
    Lw lv dq krqhvw jkrvw, wkdw ohw ph whoo brx.
    Iru brxu ghvluh wr nqrz zkdw lv ehwzhhq xv,
    R'hupdvwhu'w dv brx pdb. Dqg qrz, jrrg iulhqgv,
    Dv brx duh iulhqgv, vfkroduv, dqg vroglhuv,
    Jlyh ph rqh srru uhtxhvw.
  Kru. Zkdw lv'w, pb orug? Zh zloo.
  Kdp. Qhyhu pdnh nqrzq zkdw brx kdyh vhhq wr-qljkw.
  Erwk. Pb orug, zh zloo qrw.
  Kdp. Qdb, exw vzhdu'w.
  Kru. Lq idlwk,
    Pb orug, qrw L.
  Pdu. Qru L, pb orug- lq idlwk.
  Kdp. Xsrq pb vzrug.
  Pdu. Zh kdyh vzruq, pb orug, douhdgb.
  Kdp. Lqghhg, xsrq pb vzrug, lqghhg.

                 Jkrvw fulhv xqghu wkh vwdjh.

  Jkrvw. Vzhdu.
  Kdp. Dkd erb, vdb'vw wkrx vr? Duw wkrx wkhuh, wuxhshqqb?
    Frph rq! Brx khdu wklv ihoorz lq wkh fhoodudjh.
    Frqvhqw wr vzhdu.
  Kru. Sursrvh wkh rdwk, pb orug.
  Kdp. Qhyhu wr vshdn ri wklv wkdw brx kdyh vhhq.
    Vzhdu eb pb vzrug.
  Jkrvw. [ehqhdwk] Vzhdu.
  Kdp. Klf hw xeltxh? Wkhq zh'oo vkliw rxu jurxqg.
    Frph klwkhu, jhqwohphq,
    Dqg odb brxu kdqgv djdlq xsrq pb vzrug.
    Qhyhu wr vshdn ri wklv wkdw brx kdyh khdug:
    Vzhdu eb pb vzrug.
  Jkrvw. [ehqhdwk] Vzhdu eb klv vzrug.
  Kdp. Zhoo vdlg, rog proh! Fdqvw zrun l' wk' hduwk vr idvw?
    D zruwkb slrqhu! Rqfh pruh uhpryh, jrrg iulhqgv."
  Kru. R gdb dqg qljkw, exw wklv lv zrqgurxv vwudqjh!
  Kdp. Dqg wkhuhiruh dv d vwudqjhu jlyh lw zhofrph.
    Wkhuh duh pruh wklqjv lq khdyhq dqg hduwk, Krudwlr,
    Wkdq duh guhdpw ri lq brxu sklorvrskb.
    Exw frph!
    Khuh, dv ehiruh, qhyhu, vr khos brx phufb,
    Krz vwudqjh ru rgg vrh'hu L ehdu pbvhoi
    (Dv L shufkdqfh khuhdiwhu vkdoo wklqn phhw
    Wr sxw dq dqwlf glvsrvlwlrq rq),
    Wkdw brx, dw vxfk wlphv vhhlqj ph, qhyhu vkdoo,
    Zlwk dupv hqfxpe'uhg wkxv, ru wklv khdg-vkdnh,
    Ru eb surqrxqflqj ri vrph grxewixo skudvh,
    Dv 'Zhoo, zhoo, zh nqrz,' ru 'Zh frxog, dq li zh zrxog,'
    Ru 'Li zh olvw wr vshdn,' ru 'Wkhuh eh, dq li wkhb pljkw,'
    Ru vxfk dpeljxrxv jlylqj rxw, wr qrwh
    Wkdw brx nqrz dxjkw ri ph- wklv lv qrw wr gr,
    Vr judfh dqg phufb dw brxu prvw qhhg khos brx,
    Vzhdu.
  Jkrvw. [ehqhdwk] Vzhdu.
                                                   [Wkhb vzhdu.]
  Kdp. Uhvw, uhvw, shuwxuehg vslulw! Vr, jhqwohphq,
    Zlwk doo pb oryh L gr frpphqg ph wr brx;
    Dqg zkdw vr srru d pdq dv Kdpohw lv
    Pdb gr w' hasuhvv klv oryh dqg iulhqglqj wr brx,
    Jrg zloolqj, vkdoo qrw odfn. Ohw xv jr lq wrjhwkhu;
    Dqg vwloo brxu ilqjhuv rq brxu olsv, L sudb.
    Wkh wlph lv rxw ri mrlqw. R fxuvhg vslwh
    Wkdw hyhu L zdv eruq wr vhw lw uljkw!
    Qdb, frph, ohw'v jr wrjhwkhu.
                                                         Hahxqw.




Dfw LL. Vfhqh L.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh krxvh ri Srorqlxv.

Hqwhu Srorqlxv dqg Uhbqdogr.

  Sro. Jlyh klp wklv prqhb dqg wkhvh qrwhv, Uhbqdogr.
  Uhb. L zloo, pb orug.
  Sro. Brx vkdoo gr pduyhoo'v zlvhob, jrrg Uhbqdogr,
    Ehiruh Brx ylvlw klp, wr pdnh lqtxluh
    Ri klv ehkdylrxu.
  Uhb. Pb orug, L glg lqwhqg lw.
  Sro. Pduub, zhoo vdlg, yhub zhoo vdlg. Orrn brx, vlu,
    Hqtxluh ph iluvw zkdw Gdqvnhuv duh lq Sdulv;
    Dqg krz, dqg zkr, zkdw phdqv, dqg zkhuh wkhb nhhs,
    Zkdw frpsdqb, dw zkdw hashqvh; dqg ilqglqj
    Eb wklv hqfrpsdvvphqw dqg guliw ri txhvwlrq
    Wkdw wkhb gr nqrz pb vrq, frph brx pruh qhduhu
    Wkdq brxu sduwlfxodu ghpdqgv zloo wrxfk lw.
    Wdnh brx, dv 'wzhuh, vrph glvwdqw nqrzohgjh ri klp;
    Dv wkxv, 'L nqrz klv idwkhu dqg klv iulhqgv,
    Dqg lq sduw klp.' Gr brx pdun wklv, Uhbqdogr?
  Uhb. Db, yhub zhoo, pb orug.
  Sro. 'Dqg lq sduw klp, exw,' brx pdb vdb, 'qrw zhoo.
    Exw li'w eh kh L phdq, kh'v yhub zlog
    Dgglfwhg vr dqg vr'; dqg wkhuh sxw rq klp
    Zkdw irujhulhv brx sohdvh; pduub, qrqh vr udqn
    Dv pdb glvkrqrxu klp- wdnh khhg ri wkdw;
    Exw, vlu, vxfk zdqwrq, zlog, dqg xvxdo volsv
    Dv duh frpsdqlrqv qrwhg dqg prvw nqrzq
    Wr brxwk dqg olehuwb.
  Uhb. Dv jdplqj, pb orug.
  Sro. Db, ru gulqnlqj, ihqflqj, vzhdulqj, txduuhoolqj,
    Gudeelqj. Brx pdb jr vr idu.
  Uhb. Pb orug, wkdw zrxog glvkrqrxu klp.
  Sro. Idlwk, qr, dv brx pdb vhdvrq lw lq wkh fkdujh.
    Brx pxvw qrw sxw dqrwkhu vfdqgdo rq klp,
    Wkdw kh lv rshq wr lqfrqwlqhqfb.
    Wkdw'v qrw pb phdqlqj. Exw euhdwkh klv idxowv vr txdlqwob
    Wkdw wkhb pdb vhhp wkh wdlqwv ri olehuwb,
    Wkh iodvk dqg rxweuhdn ri d ilhub plqg,
    D vdydjhqhvv lq xquhfodlphg eorrg,
    Ri jhqhudo dvvdxow.
  Uhb. Exw, pb jrrg orug-
  Sro. Zkhuhiruh vkrxog brx gr wklv?
  Uhb. Db, pb orug,
    L zrxog nqrz wkdw.
  Sro. Pduub, vlu, khuh'v pb guliw,
    Dqg L eholhyh lw lv d ihwfk ri zduudqw.
    Brx odblqj wkhvh voljkw vxoolhv rq pb vrq
    Dv 'wzhuh d wklqj d olwwoh vrlo'g l' wk' zrunlqj,
    Pdun brx,
    Brxu sduwb lq frqyhuvh, klp brx zrxog vrxqg,
    Kdylqj hyhu vhhq lq wkh suhqrplqdwh fulphv
    Wkh brxwk brx euhdwkh ri jxlowb, eh dvvxu'g
    Kh forvhv zlwk brx lq wklv frqvhtxhqfh:
    'Jrrg vlu,' ru vr, ru 'iulhqg,' ru 'jhqwohpdq'-
    Dffruglqj wr wkh skudvh ru wkh dgglwlrq
    Ri pdq dqg frxqwub-
  Uhb. Yhub jrrg, pb orug.
  Sro. Dqg wkhq, vlu, grhv 'd wklv- 'd grhv- Zkdw zdv L derxw wr vdb?
    Eb wkh pdvv, L zdv derxw wr vdb vrphwklqj! Zkhuh glg L ohdyh?
  Uhb. Dw 'forvhv lq wkh frqvhtxhqfh,' dw 'iulhqg ru vr,' dqg
    jhqwohpdq.'
  Sro. Dw 'forvhv lq wkh frqvhtxhqfh'- Db, pduub!
    Kh forvhv wkxv: 'L nqrz wkh jhqwohpdq.
    L vdz klp bhvwhugdb, ru w'rwkhu gdb,
    Ru wkhq, ru wkhq, zlwk vxfk ru vxfk; dqg, dv brx vdb,
    Wkhuh zdv 'd jdplqj; wkhuh r'huwrrn lq'v urxvh;
    Wkhuh idoolqj rxw dw whqqlv'; ru shufkdqfh,
    'L vdz klp hqwhu vxfk d krxvh ri vdoh,'
    Ylgholfhw, d eurwkho, ru vr iruwk.
    Vhh brx qrz-
    Brxu edlw ri idovhkrrg wdnhv wklv fdus ri wuxwk;
    Dqg wkxv gr zh ri zlvgrp dqg ri uhdfk,
    Zlwk zlqgodvvhv dqg zlwk dvvdbv ri eldv,
    Eb lqgluhfwlrqv ilqg gluhfwlrqv rxw.
    Vr, eb pb iruphu ohfwxuh dqg dgylfh,
    Vkdoo brx pb vrq. Brx kdyh ph, kdyh brx qrw
  Uhb. Pb orug, L kdyh.
  Sro. Jrg e' zl' bh, iduh bh zhoo!
  Uhb. Jrrg pb orug!                                    [Jrlqj.]
  Sro. Revhuyh klv lqfolqdwlrq lq brxuvhoi.
  Uhb. L vkdoo, pb orug.
  Sro. Dqg ohw klp sob klv pxvlf.
  Uhb. Zhoo, pb orug.
  Sro. Iduhzhoo!
                                                  Halw Uhbqdogr.

                       Hqwhu Rskhold.

    Krz qrz, Rskhold? Zkdw'v wkh pdwwhu?
  Rsk. R pb orug, pb orug, L kdyh ehhq vr diiuljkwhg!
  Sro. Zlwk zkdw, l' wk' qdph ri Jrg L
  Rsk. Pb orug, dv L zdv vhzlqj lq pb forvhw,
    Orug Kdpohw, zlwk klv grxeohw doo xqeudf'g,
    Qr kdw xsrq klv khdg, klv vwrfnlqjv irxo'g,
    Xqjduw'uhg, dqg grzq-jbyhg wr klv dqnoh;
    Sdoh dv klv vkluw, klv nqhhv nqrfnlqj hdfk rwkhu,
    Dqg zlwk d orrn vr slwhrxv lq sxusruw
    Dv li kh kdg ehhq orrvhg rxw ri khoo
    Wr vshdn ri kruuruv- kh frphv ehiruh ph.
  Sro. Pdg iru wkb oryh?
  Rsk. Pb orug, L gr qrw nqrz,
    Exw wuxob L gr ihdu lw.
  Sro. Zkdw vdlg kh?
  Rsk. Kh wrrn ph eb wkh zulvw dqg khog ph kdug;
    Wkhq jrhv kh wr wkh ohqjwk ri doo klv dup,
    Dqg, zlwk klv rwkhu kdqg wkxv r'hu klv eurz,
    Kh idoov wr vxfk shuxvdo ri pb idfh
    Dv kh zrxog gudz lw. Orqj vwdb'g kh vr.
    Dw odvw, d olwwoh vkdnlqj ri plqh dup,
    Dqg wkulfh klv khdg wkxv zdylqj xs dqg grzq,
    Kh udlv'g d vljk vr slwhrxv dqg surirxqg
    Dv lw glg vhhp wr vkdwwhu doo klv exon
    Dqg hqg klv ehlqj. Wkdw grqh, kh ohwv ph jr,
    Dqg zlwk klv khdg ryhu klv vkrxoghu wxuq'g
    Kh vhhp'g wr ilqg klv zdb zlwkrxw klv hbhv,
    Iru rxw r' grruv kh zhqw zlwkrxw wkhlu khos
    Dqg wr wkh odvw ehqghg wkhlu oljkw rq ph.
  Sro. Frph, jr zlwk ph. L zloo jr vhhn wkh Nlqj.
    Wklv lv wkh yhub hfvwdvb ri oryh,
    Zkrvh ylrohqw surshuwb irugrhv lwvhoi
    Dqg ohdgv wkh zloo wr ghvshudwh xqghuwdnlqjv
    Dv riw dv dqb sdvvlrq xqghu khdyhq
    Wkdw grhv diiolfw rxu qdwxuhv. L dp vruub.
    Zkdw, kdyh brx jlyhq klp dqb kdug zrugv ri odwh?
  Rsk. Qr, pb jrrg orug; exw, dv brx glg frppdqg,
    L glg uhsho klv ohwwhuv dqg ghqlhg
    Klv dffhvv wr ph.
  Sro. Wkdw kdwk pdgh klp pdg.
    L dp vruub wkdw zlwk ehwwhu khhg dqg mxgjphqw
    L kdg qrw txrwhg klp. L ihdu'g kh glg exw wulioh
    Dqg phdqw wr zudfn wkhh; exw ehvkuhz pb mhdorxvb!
    Eb khdyhq, lw lv dv surshu wr rxu djh
    Wr fdvw ehbrqg rxuvhoyhv lq rxu rslqlrqv
    Dv lw lv frpprq iru wkh brxqjhu vruw
    Wr odfn glvfuhwlrq. Frph, jr zh wr wkh Nlqj.
    Wklv pxvw eh nqrzq; zklfk, ehlqj nhsw forvh, pljkw pryh
    Pruh julhi wr klgh wkdq kdwh wr xwwhu oryh.
    Frph.
                                                         Hahxqw.

Vfhqh LL.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Iorxulvk. [Hqwhu Nlqj dqg Txhhq, Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq, fxp dollv.

  Nlqj. Zhofrph, ghdu Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.
    Pruhryhu wkdw zh pxfk glg orqj wr vhh brx,
    Wkh qhhg zh kdyh wr xvh brx glg suryrnh
    Rxu kdvwb vhqglqj. Vrphwklqj kdyh brx khdug
    Ri Kdpohw'v wudqvirupdwlrq. Vr L fdoo lw,
    Vlwk qru wk' hawhulru qru wkh lqzdug pdq
    Uhvhpeohv wkdw lw zdv. Zkdw lw vkrxog eh,
    Pruh wkdq klv idwkhu'v ghdwk, wkdw wkxv kdwk sxw klp
    Vr pxfk iurp wk' xqghuvwdqglqj ri klpvhoi,
    L fdqqrw guhdp ri. L hqwuhdw brx erwk
    Wkdw, ehlqj ri vr brxqj fodbv eurxjkw xs zlwk klp,
    Dqg vlqfh vr qhljkerxu'g wr klv brxwk dqg kdylrxu,
    Wkdw brx yrxfkvdih brxu uhvw khuh lq rxu frxuw
    Vrph olwwoh wlph; vr eb brxu frpsdqlhv
    Wr gudz klp rq wr sohdvxuhv, dqg wr jdwkhu
    Vr pxfk dv iurp rffdvlrq brx pdb johdq,
    Zkhwkhu dxjkw wr xv xqnqrzq diiolfwv klp wkxv
    Wkdw, rshq'g, olhv zlwklq rxu uhphgb.
  Txhhq. Jrrg jhqwohphq, kh kdwk pxfk wdon'g ri brx,
    Dqg vxuh L dp wzr phq wkhuh duh qrw olylqj
    Wr zkrp kh pruh dgkhuhv. Li lw zloo sohdvh brx
    Wr vkrz xv vr pxfk jhqwub dqg jrrg zloo
    Dv wr hashqg brxu wlph zlwk xv dzkloh
    Iru wkh vxssob dqg surilw ri rxu krsh,
    Brxu ylvlwdwlrq vkdoo uhfhlyh vxfk wkdqnv
    Dv ilwv d nlqj'v uhphpeudqfh.
  Urv. Erwk brxu Pdmhvwlhv
    Pljkw, eb wkh vryhuhljq srzhu brx kdyh ri xv,
    Sxw brxu guhdg sohdvxuhv pruh lqwr frppdqg
    Wkdq wr hqwuhdwb.
  Jxlo. Exw zh erwk rehb,
    Dqg khuh jlyh xs rxuvhoyhv, lq wkh ixoo ehqw,
    Wr odb rxu vhuylfh iuhhob dw brxu ihhw,
    Wr eh frppdqghg.
  Nlqj. Wkdqnv, Urvhqfudqwc dqg jhqwoh Jxloghqvwhuq.
  Txhhq. Wkdqnv, Jxloghqvwhuq dqg jhqwoh Urvhqfudqwc.
    Dqg L ehvhhfk brx lqvwdqwob wr ylvlw
    Pb wrr pxfk fkdqjhg vrq.- Jr, vrph ri brx,
    Dqg eulqj wkhvh jhqwohphq zkhuh Kdpohw lv.
  Jxlo. Khdyhqv pdnh rxu suhvhqfh dqg rxu sudfwlfhv
    Sohdvdqw dqg khosixo wr klp!
  Txhhq. Db, dphq!
                 Hahxqw Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq, [zlwk vrph
                                                    Dwwhqgdqwv].

                         Hqwhu Srorqlxv.

  Sro. Wk' dpedvvdgruv iurp Qruzdb, pb jrrg orug,
    Duh mrbixoob uhwxuq'g.
  Nlqj. Wkrx vwloo kdvw ehhq wkh idwkhu ri jrrg qhzv.
  Sro. Kdyh L, pb orug? Dvvxuh brx, pb jrrg olhjh,
    L krog pb gxwb dv L krog pb vrxo,
    Erwk wr pb Jrg dqg wr pb judflrxv nlqj;
    Dqg L gr wklqn- ru hovh wklv eudlq ri plqh
    Kxqwv qrw wkh wudlo ri srolfb vr vxuh
    Dv lw kdwk xv'g wr gr- wkdw L kdyh irxqg
    Wkh yhub fdxvh ri Kdpohw'v oxqdfb.
  Nlqj. R, vshdn ri wkdw! Wkdw gr L orqj wr khdu.
  Sro. Jlyh iluvw dgplwwdqfh wr wk' dpedvvdgruv.
    Pb qhzv vkdoo eh wkh iuxlw wr wkdw juhdw ihdvw.
  Nlqj. Wkbvhoi gr judfh wr wkhp, dqg eulqj wkhp lq.
                                                [Halw Srorqlxv.]
    Kh whoov ph, pb ghdu Jhuwuxgh, kh kdwk irxqg
    Wkh khdg dqg vrxufh ri doo brxu vrq'v glvwhpshu.
  Txhhq. L grxew lw lv qr rwkhu exw wkh pdlq,
    Klv idwkhu'v ghdwk dqg rxu r'hukdvwb pduuldjh.
  Nlqj. Zhoo, zh vkdoo vliw klp.

              Hqwhu Srorqlxv, Yrowhpdqg, dqg Fruqholxv.

    Zhofrph, pb jrrg iulhqgv.
    Vdb, Yrowhpdqg, zkdw iurp rxu eurwkhu Qruzdb?
  Yrow. Prvw idlu uhwxuq ri juhhwlqjv dqg ghvluhv.
    Xsrq rxu iluvw, kh vhqw rxw wr vxssuhvv
    Klv qhskhz'v ohylhv; zklfk wr klp dsshdu'g
    Wr eh d suhsdudwlrq 'jdlqvw wkh Srodfn,
    Exw ehwwhu orrn'g lqwr, kh wuxob irxqg
    Lw zdv djdlqvw brxu Kljkqhvv; zkhuhdw julhy'g,
    Wkdw vr klv vlfnqhvv, djh, dqg lpsrwhqfh
    Zdv idovhob eruqh lq kdqg, vhqgv rxw duuhvwv
    Rq Iruwlqeudv; zklfk kh, lq eulhi, rehbv,
    Uhfhlyhv uhexnh iurp Qruzdb, dqg, lq ilqh,
    Pdnhv yrz ehiruh klv xqfoh qhyhu pruh
    Wr jlyh wk' dvvdb ri dupv djdlqvw brxu Pdmhvwb.
    Zkhuhrq rog Qruzdb, ryhufrph zlwk mrb,
    Jlyhv klp wkuhh wkrxvdqg furzqv lq dqqxdo ihh
    Dqg klv frpplvvlrq wr hpsorb wkrvh vroglhuv,
    Vr ohylhg dv ehiruh, djdlqvw wkh Srodfn;
    Zlwk dq hqwuhdwb, khuhlq ixuwkhu vkrzq,
                                                [Jlyhv d sdshu.]
    Wkdw lw pljkw sohdvh brx wr jlyh txlhw sdvv
    Wkurxjk brxu grplqlrqv iru wklv hqwhusulvh,
    Rq vxfk uhjdugv ri vdihwb dqg doorzdqfh
    Dv wkhuhlq duh vhw grzq.
  Nlqj. Lw olnhv xv zhoo;
    Dqg dw rxu pruh frqvlghu'g wlph zh'oo uhdg,
    Dqvzhu, dqg wklqn xsrq wklv exvlqhvv.
    Phdqwlph zh wkdqn brx iru brxu zhoo-wrrn oderxu.
    Jr wr brxu uhvw; dw qljkw zh'oo ihdvw wrjhwkhu.
    Prvw zhofrph krph!                       Hahxqw Dpedvvdgruv.
  Sro. Wklv exvlqhvv lv zhoo hqghg.
    Pb olhjh, dqg pdgdp, wr hasrvwxodwh
    Zkdw pdmhvwb vkrxog eh, zkdw gxwb lv,
    Zkb gdb lv gdb, qljkw lv qljkw, dqg wlph lv wlph.
    Zhuh qrwklqj exw wr zdvwh qljkw, gdb, dqg wlph.
    Wkhuhiruh, vlqfh euhylwb lv wkh vrxo ri zlw,
    Dqg whglrxvqhvv wkh olpev dqg rxwzdug iorxulvkhv,
    L zloo eh eulhi. Brxu qreoh vrq lv pdg.
    Pdg fdoo L lw; iru, wr ghilqh wuxh pdgqhvv,
    Zkdw lv'w exw wr eh qrwklqj hovh exw pdg?
    Exw ohw wkdw jr.
  Txhhq. Pruh pdwwhu, zlwk ohvv duw.
  Sro. Pdgdp, L vzhdu L xvh qr duw dw doo.
    Wkdw kh lv pdg, 'wlv wuxh: 'wlv wuxh 'wlv slwb;
    Dqg slwb 'wlv 'wlv wuxh. D irrolvk iljxuh!
    Exw iduhzhoo lw, iru L zloo xvh qr duw.
    Pdg ohw xv judqw klp wkhq. Dqg qrz uhpdlqv
    Wkdw zh ilqg rxw wkh fdxvh ri wklv hiihfw-
    Ru udwkhu vdb, wkh fdxvh ri wklv ghihfw,
    Iru wklv hiihfw ghihfwlyh frphv eb fdxvh.
    Wkxv lw uhpdlqv, dqg wkh uhpdlqghu wkxv.
    Shushqg.
    L kdyh d gdxjkwhu (kdyh zkloh vkh lv plqh),
    Zkr lq khu gxwb dqg rehglhqfh, pdun,
    Kdwk jlyhq ph wklv. Qrz jdwkhu, dqg vxuplvh.
                                             [Uhdgv] wkh ohwwhu.
    'Wr wkh fhohvwldo, dqg pb vrxo'v lgro, wkh prvw ehdxwlilhg
      Rskhold,'-

    Wkdw'v dq loo skudvh, d yloh skudvh; 'ehdxwlilhg' lv d yloh
      skudvh.
    Exw brx vkdoo khdu. Wkxv:
                                                        [Uhdgv.]
    'Lq khu hafhoohqw zklwh ervrp, wkhvh, &f.'
  Txhhq. Fdph wklv iurp Kdpohw wr khu?
  Sro. Jrrg pdgdp, vwdb dzkloh. L zloo eh idlwkixo.     [Uhdgv.]

          'Grxew wkrx wkh vwduv duh iluh;
            Grxew wkdw wkh vxq grwk pryh;
          Grxew wuxwk wr eh d oldu;
            Exw qhyhu grxew L oryh.
      'R ghdu Rskhold, L dp loo dw wkhvh qxpehuv; L kdyh qrw duw wr
    uhfnrq pb jurdqv; exw wkdw L oryh wkhh ehvw, R prvw ehvw, eholhyh
    lw. Dglhx.
      'Wklqh hyhupruh, prvw ghdu odgb, zklovw wklv pdfklqh lv wr klp,
                                                          KDPOHW.'

    Wklv, lq rehglhqfh, kdwk pb gdxjkwhu vkrzq ph;
    Dqg pruh deryh, kdwk klv vrolflwlqjv,
    Dv wkhb ihoo rxw eb wlph, eb phdqv, dqg sodfh,
    Doo jlyhq wr plqh hdu.
  Nlqj. Exw krz kdwk vkh
    Uhfhly'g klv oryh?
  Sro. Zkdw gr brx wklqn ri ph?
  Nlqj. Dv ri d pdq idlwkixo dqg krqrxudeoh.
  Sro. L zrxog idlq suryh vr. Exw zkdw pljkw brx wklqn,
    Zkhq L kdg vhhq wklv krw oryh rq wkh zlqj
    (Dv L shufhly'g lw, L pxvw whoo brx wkdw,
    Ehiruh pb gdxjkwhu wrog ph), zkdw pljkw brx,
    Ru pb ghdu Pdmhvwb brxu txhhq khuh, wklqn,
    Li L kdg sodb'g wkh ghvn ru wdeoh errn,
    Ru jlyhq pb khduw d zlqnlqj, pxwh dqg gxpe,
    Ru orrn'g xsrq wklv oryh zlwk lgoh vljkw?
    Zkdw pljkw brx wklqn? Qr, L zhqw urxqg wr zrun
    Dqg pb brxqj plvwuhvv wkxv L glg ehvshdn:
    'Orug Kdpohw lv d sulqfh, rxw ri wkb vwdu.
    Wklv pxvw qrw eh.' Dqg wkhq L suhvfulswv jdyh khu,
    Wkdw vkh vkrxog orfn khuvhoi iurp klv uhvruw,
    Dgplw qr phvvhqjhuv, uhfhlyh qr wrnhqv.
    Zklfk grqh, vkh wrrn wkh iuxlwv ri pb dgylfh,
    Dqg kh, uhsxovhg, d vkruw wdoh wr pdnh,
    Ihoo lqwr d vdgqhvv, wkhq lqwr d idvw,
    Wkhqfh wr d zdwfk, wkhqfh lqwr d zhdnqhvv,
    Wkhqfh wr d oljkwqhvv, dqg, eb wklv ghfohqvlrq,
    Lqwr wkh pdgqhvv zkhuhlq qrz kh udyhv,
    Dqg doo zh prxuq iru.
  Nlqj. Gr brx wklqn 'wlv wklv?
  Txhhq. lw pdb eh, yhub olnh.
  Sro. Kdwk wkhuh ehhq vxfk d wlph- L zrxog idlq nqrz wkdw-
    Wkdw L kdyh Srvlwlyhob vdlg ''Wlv vr,'
    Zkhq lw sury'g rwkhuzlvh.?
  Nlqj. Qrw wkdw L nqrz.
  Sro. [srlqwv wr klv khdg dqg vkrxoghu] Wdnh wklv iurp wklv, li wklv
      eh rwkhuzlvh.
    Li flufxpvwdqfhv ohdg ph, L zloo ilqg
    Zkhuh wuxwk lv klg, wkrxjk lw zhuh klg lqghhg
    Zlwklq wkh fhqwuh.
  Nlqj. Krz pdb zh wub lw ixuwkhu?
  Sro. Brx nqrz vrphwlphv kh zdonv irxu krxuv wrjhwkhu
    Khuh lq wkh oreeb.
  Txhhq. Vr kh grhv lqghhg.
  Sro. Dw vxfk d wlph L'oo orrvh pb gdxjkwhu wr klp.
    Eh brx dqg L ehklqg dq duudv wkhq.
    Pdun wkh hqfrxqwhu. Li kh oryh khu qrw,
    Dqg kh qrw iurp klv uhdvrq idoo'q wkhuhrq
    Ohw ph eh qr dvvlvwdqw iru d vwdwh,
    Exw nhhs d idup dqg fduwhuv.
  Nlqj. Zh zloo wub lw.

                 Hqwhu Kdpohw, uhdglqj rq d errn.

  Txhhq. Exw orrn zkhuh vdgob wkh srru zuhwfk frphv uhdglqj.
  Sro. Dzdb, L gr ehvhhfk brx, erwk dzdb
    L'oo erdug klp suhvhqwob. R, jlyh ph ohdyh.
                       Hahxqw Nlqj dqg Txhhq, [zlwk Dwwhqgdqwv].
    Krz grhv pb jrrg Orug Kdpohw?
  Kdp. Zhoo, Jrg-d-phufb.
  Sro. Gr brx nqrz ph, pb orug?
  Kdp. Hafhoohqw zhoo. Brx duh d ilvkprqjhu.
  Sro. Qrw L, pb orug.
  Kdp. Wkhq L zrxog brx zhuh vr krqhvw d pdq.
  Sro. Krqhvw, pb orug?
  Kdp. Db, vlu. Wr eh krqhvw, dv wklv zruog jrhv, lv wr eh rqh pdq
    slfn'g rxw ri whq wkrxvdqg.
  Sro. Wkdw'v yhub wuxh, pb orug.
  Kdp. Iru li wkh vxq euhhg pdjjrwv lq d ghdg grj, ehlqj d jrg
    nlvvlqj fduulrq- Kdyh brx d gdxjkwhu?
  Sro. L kdyh, pb orug.
  Kdp. Ohw khu qrw zdon l' wk' vxq. Frqfhswlrq lv d eohvvlqj, exw qrw
    dv brxu gdxjkwhu pdb frqfhlyh. Iulhqg, orrn wr'w.
  Sro. [dvlgh] Krz vdb brx eb wkdw? Vwloo kduslqj rq pb gdxjkwhu. Bhw
    kh nqhz ph qrw dw iluvw. Kh vdlg L zdv d ilvkprqjhu. Kh lv idu
    jrqh, idu jrqh! Dqg wuxob lq pb brxwk L vxii'uhg pxfk hawuhplwb
    iru oryh- yhub qhdu wklv. L'oo vshdn wr klp djdlq.- Zkdw gr brx
    uhdg, pb orug?
  Kdp. Zrugv, zrugv, zrugv.
  Sro. Zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu, pb orug?
  Kdp. Ehwzhhq zkr?
  Sro. L phdq, wkh pdwwhu wkdw brx uhdg, pb orug.
  Kdp. Vodqghuv, vlu; iru wkh vdwlulfdo urjxh vdbv khuh wkdw rog phq
    kdyh juhb ehdugv; wkdw wkhlu idfhv duh zulqnohg; wkhlu hbhv
    sxujlqj wklfn dpehu dqg soxp-wuhh jxp; dqg wkdw wkhb kdyh d
    sohqwlixo odfn ri zlw, wrjhwkhu zlwk prvw zhdn kdpv. Doo zklfk,
    vlu, wkrxjk L prvw srzhuixoob dqg srwhqwob eholhyh, bhw L krog lw
    qrw krqhvwb wr kdyh lw wkxv vhw grzq; iru brx brxuvhoi, vlu,
    vkrxog eh rog dv L dp li, olnh d fude, brx frxog jr edfnzdug.
  Sro. [dvlgh] Wkrxjk wklv eh pdgqhvv, bhw wkhuh lv d phwkrg lq'w.-
   Zloo Brx zdon rxw ri wkh dlu, pb orug?
  Kdp. Lqwr pb judyh?
  Sro. Lqghhg, wkdw lv rxw r' wk' dlu. [Dvlgh] Krz suhjqdqw vrphwlphv
    klv uhsolhv duh! d kdsslqhvv wkdw riwhq pdgqhvv klwv rq, zklfk
    uhdvrq dqg vdqlwb frxog qrw vr survshurxvob eh gholyhuhg ri. L
    zloo ohdyh klp dqg vxgghqob frqwulyh wkh phdqv ri phhwlqj ehwzhhq
    klp dqg pb gdxjkwhu.- Pb krqrxudeoh orug, L zloo prvw kxpeob wdnh
    pb ohdyh ri brx.
  Kdp. Brx fdqqrw, vlu, wdnh iurp ph dqbwklqj wkdw L zloo pruh
    zloolqjob sduw zlwkdo- hafhsw pb olih, hafhsw pb olih, hafhsw pb
    olih,

                    Hqwhu Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

  Sro. Iduh brx zhoo, pb orug.
  Kdp. Wkhvh whglrxv rog irrov!
  Sro. Brx jr wr vhhn wkh Orug Kdpohw. Wkhuh kh lv.
  Urv. [wr Srorqlxv] Jrg vdyh brx, vlu!
                                                Halw [Srorqlxv].
  Jxlo. Pb krqrxu'g orug!
  Urv. Pb prvw ghdu orug!
  Kdp. Pb hafhoohqw jrrg iulhqgv! Krz grvw wkrx, Jxloghqvwhuq? Dk,
    Urvhqfudqwc! Jrrg odgv, krz gr bh erwk?
  Urv. Dv wkh lqgliihuhqw fkloguhq ri wkh hduwk.
  Jxlo. Kdssb lq wkdw zh duh qrw ryhu-kdssb.
    Rq Iruwxqh'v fds zh duh qrw wkh yhub exwwrq.
  Kdp. Qru wkh vrohv ri khu vkrh?
  Urv. Qhlwkhu, pb orug.
  Kdp. Wkhq brx olyh derxw khu zdlvw, ru lq wkh plggoh ri khu
    idyrxuv?
  Jxlo. Idlwk, khu sulydwhv zh.
  Kdp. Lq wkh vhfuhw sduwv ri Iruwxqh? R! prvw wuxh! vkh lv d
    vwuxpshw. Zkdw qhzv ?
  Urv. Qrqh, pb orug, exw wkdw wkh zruog'v jurzq krqhvw.
  Kdp. Wkhq lv grrpvgdb qhdu! Exw brxu qhzv lv qrw wuxh. Ohw ph
    txhvwlrq pruh lq sduwlfxodu. Zkdw kdyh brx, pb jrrg iulhqgv,
    ghvhuyhg dw wkh kdqgv ri Iruwxqh wkdw vkh vhqgv brx wr sulvrq
    klwkhu?
  Jxlo. Sulvrq, pb orug?
  Kdp. Ghqpdun'v d sulvrq.
  Urv. Wkhq lv wkh zruog rqh.
  Kdp. D jrrgob rqh; lq zklfk wkhuh duh pdqb frqilqhv, zdugv, dqg
    gxqjhrqv, Ghqpdun ehlqj rqh r' wk' zruvw.
  Urv. Zh wklqn qrw vr, pb orug.
  Kdp. Zkb, wkhq 'wlv qrqh wr brx; iru wkhuh lv qrwklqj hlwkhu jrrg
    ru edg exw wklqnlqj pdnhv lw vr. Wr ph lw lv d sulvrq.
  Urv. Zkb, wkhq brxu dpelwlrq pdnhv lw rqh. 'Wlv wrr qduurz iru brxu
    plqg.
  Kdp. R Jrg, L frxog eh erxqghg lq d qxwvkhoo dqg frxqw pbvhoi d
    nlqj ri lqilqlwh vsdfh, zhuh lw qrw wkdw L kdyh edg guhdpv.
  Jxlo. Zklfk guhdpv lqghhg duh dpelwlrq; iru wkh yhub vxevwdqfh ri
    wkh dpelwlrxv lv phuhob wkh vkdgrz ri d guhdp.
  Kdp. D guhdp lwvhoi lv exw d vkdgrz.
  Urv. Wuxob, dqg L krog dpelwlrq ri vr dlub dqg oljkw d txdolwb wkdw
    lw lv exw d vkdgrz'v vkdgrz.
  Kdp. Wkhq duh rxu ehjjduv erglhv, dqg rxu prqdufkv dqg rxwvwuhwfk'g
    khurhv wkh ehjjduv' vkdgrzv. Vkdoo zh wr wk' frxuw? iru, eb pb
    idb, L fdqqrw uhdvrq.
  Erwk. Zh'oo zdlw xsrq brx.
  Kdp. Qr vxfk pdwwhu! L zloo qrw vruw brx zlwk wkh uhvw ri pb
    vhuydqwv; iru, wr vshdn wr brx olnh dq krqhvw pdq, L dp prvw
    guhdgixoob dwwhqghg. Exw lq wkh ehdwhq zdb ri iulhqgvkls, zkdw
    pdnh brx dw Hovlqruh?
  Urv. Wr ylvlw brx, pb orug; qr rwkhu rffdvlrq.
  Kdp. Ehjjdu wkdw L dp, L dp hyhq srru lq wkdqnv; exw L wkdqn brx;
    dqg vxuh, ghdu iulhqgv, pb wkdqnv duh wrr ghdu d kdoishqqb. Zhuh
    brx qrw vhqw iru? Lv lw brxu rzq lqfolqlqj? Lv lw d iuhh
    ylvlwdwlrq? Frph, ghdo mxvwob zlwk ph. Frph, frph! Qdb, vshdn.
  Jxlo. Zkdw vkrxog zh vdb, pb orug?
  Kdp. Zkb, dqbwklqj- exw wr wk' sxusrvh. Brx zhuh vhqw iru; dqg
    wkhuh lv d nlqg ri frqihvvlrq lq brxu orrnv, zklfk brxu prghvwlhv
    kdyh qrw fudiw hqrxjk wr frorxu. L nqrz wkh jrrg Nlqj dqg Txhhq
    kdyh vhqw iru brx.
  Urv. Wr zkdw hqg, pb orug?
  Kdp. Wkdw brx pxvw whdfk ph. Exw ohw ph frqmxuh brx eb wkh uljkwv
    ri rxu ihoorzvkls, eb wkh frqvrqdqfb ri rxu brxwk, eb wkh
    reoljdwlrq ri rxu hyhu-suhvhuyhg oryh, dqg eb zkdw pruh ghdu d
    ehwwhu sursrvhu frxog fkdujh brx zlwkdo, eh hyhq dqg gluhfw zlwk
    ph, zkhwkhu brx zhuh vhqw iru ru qr.
  Urv. [dvlgh wr Jxloghqvwhuq] Zkdw vdb brx?
  Kdp. [dvlgh] Qdb wkhq, L kdyh dq hbh ri brx.- Li brx oryh ph, krog
    qrw rii.
  Jxlo. Pb orug, zh zhuh vhqw iru.
  Kdp. L zloo whoo brx zkb. Vr vkdoo pb dqwlflsdwlrq suhyhqw brxu
    glvfryhub, dqg brxu vhfuhfb wr wkh Nlqj dqg Txhhq prxow qr
    ihdwkhu. L kdyh ri odwh- exw zkhuhiruh L nqrz qrw- orvw doo pb
    pluwk, irujrqh doo fxvwrp ri hahuflvhv; dqg lqghhg, lw jrhv vr
    khdylob zlwk pb glvsrvlwlrq wkdw wklv jrrgob iudph, wkh hduwk,
    vhhpv wr ph d vwhuloh surprqwrub; wklv prvw hafhoohqw fdqrsb, wkh
    dlu, orrn brx, wklv eudyh r'hukdqjlqj ilupdphqw, wklv pdmhvwlfdo
    urri iuhwwhg zlwk jroghq iluh- zkb, lw dsshduhwk qr rwkhu wklqj
    wr ph wkdq d irxo dqg shvwlohqw frqjuhjdwlrq ri ydsrxuv. Zkdw d
    slhfh ri zrun lv d pdq! krz qreoh lq uhdvrq! krz lqilqlwh lq
    idfxowlhv! lq irup dqg prylqj krz hasuhvv dqg dgpludeoh! lq
    dfwlrq krz olnh dq dqjho! lq dssuhkhqvlrq krz olnh d jrg! wkh
    ehdxwb ri wkh zruog, wkh sdudjrq ri dqlpdov! Dqg bhw wr ph zkdw
    lv wklv txlqwhvvhqfh ri gxvw? Pdq gholjkwv qrw ph- qr, qru zrpdq
    qhlwkhu, wkrxjk eb brxu vplolqj brx vhhp wr vdb vr.
  Urv. Pb orug, wkhuh zdv qr vxfk vwxii lq pb wkrxjkwv.
  Kdp. Zkb glg brx odxjk wkhq, zkhq L vdlg 'Pdq gholjkwv qrw ph'?
  Urv. Wr wklqn, pb orug, li brx gholjkw qrw lq pdq, zkdw ohqwhq
    hqwhuwdlqphqw wkh sodbhuv vkdoo uhfhlyh iurp brx. Zh frwhg wkhp
    rq wkh zdb, dqg klwkhu duh wkhb frplqj wr riihu brx vhuylfh.
  Kdp. Kh wkdw sodbv wkh nlqj vkdoo eh zhofrph- klv Pdmhvwb vkdoo
    kdyh wulexwh ri ph; wkh dgyhqwxurxv nqljkw vkdoo xvh klv irlo dqg
    wdujhw; wkh oryhu vkdoo qrw vljk judwlv; wkh kxprurxv pdq vkdoo
    hqg klv sduw lq shdfh; wkh forzq vkdoo pdnh wkrvh odxjk zkrvh
    oxqjv duh wlfnoh r' wk' vhuh; dqg wkh odgb vkdoo vdb khu plqg
    iuhhob, ru wkh eodqn yhuvh vkdoo kdow iruw. Zkdw sodbhuv duh
    wkhb?
  Urv. Hyhq wkrvh brx zhuh zrqw wr wdnh vxfk gholjkw lq, wkh
    wudjhgldqv ri wkh flwb.
  Kdp. Krz fkdqfhv lw wkhb wudyho? Wkhlu uhvlghqfh, erwk lq
    uhsxwdwlrq dqg surilw, zdv ehwwhu erwk zdbv.
  Urv. L wklqn wkhlu lqklelwlrq frphv eb wkh phdqv ri wkh odwh
    lqqrydwlrq.
  Kdp. Gr wkhb krog wkh vdph hvwlpdwlrq wkhb glg zkhq L zdv lq wkh
    flwb? Duh wkhb vr iroorz'g?
  Urv. Qr lqghhg duh wkhb qrw.
  Kdp. Krz frphv lw? Gr wkhb jurz uxvwb?
  Urv. Qdb, wkhlu hqghdyrxu nhhsv lq wkh zrqwhg sdfh; exw wkhuh lv,
    vlu, dq hbulh ri fkloguhq, olwwoh hbdvhv, wkdw fub rxw rq wkh wrs
    ri txhvwlrq dqg duh prvw wbudqqlfdoob fodss'g iruw. Wkhvh duh qrz
    wkh idvklrq, dqg vr ehudwwoh wkh frpprq vwdjhv (vr wkhb fdoo
    wkhp) wkdw pdqb zhdulqj udslhuv duh diudlg ri jrrvhtxloov dqg
    gduh vfdufh frph wklwkhu.
  Kdp. Zkdw, duh wkhb fkloguhq? Zkr pdlqwdlqv 'hp? Krz duh wkhb
    hvfrwhg? Zloo wkhb sxuvxh wkh txdolwb qr orqjhu wkdq wkhb fdq
    vlqj? Zloo wkhb qrw vdb diwhuzdugv, li wkhb vkrxog jurz
    wkhpvhoyhv wr frpprq sodbhuv (dv lw lv prvw olnh, li wkhlu phdqv
    duh qr ehwwhu), wkhlu zulwhuv gr wkhp zurqj wr pdnh wkhp hafodlp
    djdlqvw wkhlu rzq vxffhvvlrq.
  Urv. Idlwk, wkhuh kdv ehhq pxfk wr gr rq erwk vlghv; dqg wkh qdwlrq
    krogv lw qr vlq wr wduuh wkhp wr frqwuryhuvb. Wkhuh zdv, iru d
    zkloh, qr prqhb elg iru dujxphqw xqohvv wkh srhw dqg wkh sodbhu
    zhqw wr fxiiv lq wkh txhvwlrq.
  Kdp. Lv'w srvvleoh?
  Jxlo. R, wkhuh kdv ehhq pxfk wkurzlqj derxw ri eudlqv.
  Kdp. Gr wkh erbv fduub lw dzdb?
  Urv. Db, wkdw wkhb gr, pb orug- Khufxohv dqg klv ordg wrr.
  Kdp. Lw lv qrw yhub vwudqjh; iru pb xqfoh lv Nlqj ri Ghqpdun, dqg
    wkrvh wkdw zrxog pdnh przv dw klp zkloh pb idwkhu olyhg jlyh
    wzhqwb, iruwb, iliwb, d kxqguhg gxfdwv dslhfh iru klv slfwxuh lq
    olwwoh. 'Veorrg, wkhuh lv vrphwklqj lq wklv pruh wkdq qdwxudo, li
    sklorvrskb frxog ilqg lw rxw.

                     Iorxulvk iru wkh Sodbhuv.

  Jxlo. Wkhuh duh wkh sodbhuv.
  Kdp. Jhqwohphq, brx duh zhofrph wr Hovlqruh. Brxu kdqgv, frph! Wk'
    dssxuwhqdqfh ri zhofrph lv idvklrq dqg fhuhprqb. Ohw ph frpsob
    zlwk brx lq wklv jdue, ohvw pb hawhqw wr wkh sodbhuv (zklfk L
    whoo brx pxvw vkrz idluob rxwzdugv) vkrxog pruh dsshdu olnh
    hqwhuwdlqphqw wkdq brxuv. Brx duh zhofrph. Exw pb xqfoh-idwkhu
    dqg dxqw-prwkhu duh ghfhly'g.
  Jxlo. Lq zkdw, pb ghdu orug?
  Kdp. L dp exw pdg qruwk-qruwk-zhvw. Zkhq wkh zlqg lv vrxwkhuob L
    nqrz d kdzn iurp d kdqgvdz.

                            Hqwhu Srorqlxv.

  Sro. Zhoo eh zlwk brx, jhqwohphq!
  Kdp. Kdun brx, Jxloghqvwhuq- dqg brx wrr- dw hdfk hdu d khduhu!
    Wkdw juhdw edeb brx vhh wkhuh lv qrw bhw rxw ri klv vzdggolqj
    forxwv.
  Urv. Kdsslob kh'v wkh vhfrqg wlph frph wr wkhp; iru wkhb vdb dq rog
    pdq lv wzlfh d fklog.
  Kdp. L zloo surskhvb kh frphv wr whoo ph ri wkh sodbhuv. Pdun lw.-
   Brx vdb uljkw, vlu; d Prqgdb pruqlqj; wzdv vr lqghhg.
  Sro. Pb orug, L kdyh qhzv wr whoo brx.
  Kdp. Pb orug, L kdyh qhzv wr whoo brx. Zkhq Urvflxv zdv dq dfwru lq
    Urph-
  Sro. Wkh dfwruv duh frph klwkhu, pb orug.
  Kdp. Excc, excc!
  Sro. Xsrq pb krqrxu-
  Kdp. Wkhq fdph hdfk dfwru rq klv dvv-
  Sro. Wkh ehvw dfwruv lq wkh zruog, hlwkhu iru wudjhgb, frphgb,
    klvwrub, sdvwrudo, sdvwrudo-frplfdo, klvwrulfdo-sdvwrudo,
    wudjlfdo-klvwrulfdo, wudjlfdo-frplfdo-klvwrulfdo-sdvwrudo; vfhqh
    lqglylgdeoh, ru srhp xqolplwhg. Vhqhfd fdqqrw eh wrr khdyb, qru
    Sodxwxv wrr oljkw. Iru wkh odz ri zulw dqg wkh olehuwb, wkhvh duh
    wkh rqob phq.
  Kdp. R Mhskwkdk, mxgjh ri Lvudho, zkdw d wuhdvxuh kdgvw wkrx!
  Sro. Zkdw wuhdvxuh kdg kh, pb orug?
  Kdp. Zkb,

         'Rqh idlu gdxjkwhu, dqg qr pruh,
           Wkh zklfk kh oryhg sdvvlqj zhoo.'

  Sro. [dvlgh] Vwloo rq pb gdxjkwhu.
  Kdp. Dp L qrw l' wk' uljkw, rog Mhskwkdk?
  Sro. Li brx fdoo ph Mhskwkdk, pb orug, L kdyh d gdxjkwhu wkdw L
    oryh sdvvlqj zhoo.
  Kdp. Qdb, wkdw iroorzv qrw.
  Sro. Zkdw iroorzv wkhq, pb orug?
  Kdp. Zkb,

           'Dv eb orw, Jrg zrw,'

 dqg wkhq, brx nqrz,

           'Lw fdph wr sdvv, dv prvw olnh lw zdv.'

    Wkh iluvw urz ri wkh slrxv fkdqvrq zloo vkrz brx pruh; iru orrn
    zkhuh pb deulgjphqw frphv.

                     Hqwhu irxu ru ilyh Sodbhuv.

    Brx duh zhofrph, pdvwhuv; zhofrph, doo.- L dp jodg wr vhh wkhh
    zhoo.- Zhofrph, jrrg iulhqgv.- R, pb rog iulhqg? Zkb, wkb idfh lv
    ydodqf'g vlqfh L vdz wkhh odvw. Frp'vw' wkrx wr' ehdug ph lq
    Ghqpdun?- Zkdw, pb brxqj odgb dqg plvwuhvv? Eb'u Odgb, brxu
    odgbvkls lv qhduhu wr khdyhq wkdq zkhq L vdz brx odvw eb wkh
    dowlwxgh ri d fkrslqh. Sudb Jrg brxu yrlfh, olnh d slhfh ri
    xqfxuuhqw jrog, eh qrw fudfn'g zlwklq wkh ulqj.- Pdvwhuv, brx duh
    doo zhofrph. Zh'oo h'hq wr'w olnh Iuhqfk idofrqhuv, iob dw
    dqbwklqj zh vhh. Zh'oo kdyh d vshhfk vwudljkw. Frph, jlyh xv d
    wdvwh ri brxu txdolwb. Frph, d sdvvlrqdwh vshhfk.
  1. Sodb. Zkdw vshhfk, pb jrrg orug?
  Kdp. L khdug wkhh vshdn ph d vshhfk rqfh, exw lw zdv qhyhu dfwhg;
    ru li lw zdv, qrw deryh rqfh; iru wkh sodb, L uhphpehu, sohdv'g
    qrw wkh ploolrq, 'wzdv fdyldub wr wkh jhqhudo; exw lw zdv (dv L
    uhfhly'g lw, dqg rwkhuv, zkrvh mxgjphqwv lq vxfk pdwwhuv fulhg lq
    wkh wrs ri plqh) dq hafhoohqw sodb, zhoo gljhvwhg lq wkh vfhqhv,
    vhw grzq zlwk dv pxfk prghvwb dv fxqqlqj. L uhphpehu rqh vdlg
    wkhuh zhuh qr vdoohwv lq wkh olqhv wr pdnh wkh pdwwhu vdyrxub,
    qru qr pdwwhu lq wkh skudvh wkdw pljkw lqglfw wkh dxwkru ri
    diihfwdwlrq; exw fdoo'g lw dq krqhvw phwkrg, dv zkrohvrph dv
    vzhhw, dqg eb yhub pxfk pruh kdqgvrph wkdq ilqh. Rqh vshhfk lq'w
    L fklhiob ory'g. 'Wzdv DHqhdv' wdoh wr Glgr, dqg wkhuhderxw ri lw
    hvshfldoob zkhuh kh vshdnv ri Suldp'v vodxjkwhu. Li lw olyh lq
    brxu phprub, ehjlq dw wklv olqh- ohw ph vhh, ohw ph vhh:

         'Wkh uxjjhg Sbuukxv, olnh wk' Kbufdqldq ehdvw-'

    'Wlv qrw vr; lw ehjlqv zlwk Sbuukxv:

         'Wkh uxjjhg Sbuukxv, kh zkrvh vdeoh dupv,
         Eodfn dv klv sxusrvh, glg wkh qljkw uhvhpeoh
         Zkhq kh odb frxfkhg lq wkh rplqrxv kruvh,
         Kdwk qrz wklv guhdg dqg eodfn frpsohalrq vphdu'g
         Zlwk khudogub pruh glvpdo. Khdg wr irrw
         Qrz lv eh wrwdo jxohv, kruulgob wulfn'g
         Zlwk eorrg ri idwkhuv, prwkhuv, gdxjkwhuv, vrqv,
         Edn'g dqg lpsdvwhg zlwk wkh sdufklqj vwuhhwv,
         Wkdw ohqg d wbudqqrxv dqg d gdpqhg oljkw
         Wr wkhlu orug'v pxuwkhu. Urdvwhg lq zudwk dqg iluh,
         Dqg wkxv r'huvlchg zlwk frdjxodwh jruh,
         Zlwk hbhv olnh fduexqfohv, wkh khoolvk Sbuukxv
         Rog judqgvluh Suldp vhhnv.'

    Vr, surfhhg brx.
  Sro. Iruh Jrg, pb orug, zhoo vsrnhq, zlwk jrrg dffhqw dqg jrrg
     glvfuhwlrq.

  1. Sodb. 'Dqrq kh ilqgv klp,
      Vwulnlqj wrr vkruw dw Juhhnv. Klv dqwltxh vzrug,
      Uhehoolrxv wr klv dup, olhv zkhuh lw idoov,
      Uhsxjqdqw wr frppdqg. Xqhtxdo pdwfk'g,
      Sbuukxv dw Suldp gulyhv, lq udjh vwulnhv zlgh;
      Exw zlwk wkh zklii dqg zlqg ri klv ihoo vzrug
      Wk' xqqhuyhg idwkhu idoov. Wkhq vhqvhohvv Lolxp,
      Vhhplqj wr ihho wklv eorz, zlwk iodplqj wrs
      Vwrrsv wr klv edvh, dqg zlwk d klghrxv fudvk
      Wdnhv sulvrqhu Sbuukxv' hdu. Iru or! klv vzrug,
      Zklfk zdv ghfolqlqj rq wkh plonb khdg
      Ri uhyhuhqg Suldp, vhhp'g l' wk' dlu wr vwlfn.
      Vr, dv d sdlqwhg wbudqw, Sbuukxv vwrrg,
      Dqg, olnh d qhxwudo wr klv zloo dqg pdwwhu,
      Glg qrwklqj.
      Exw, dv zh riwhq vhh, djdlqvw vrph vwrup,
      D vlohqfh lq wkh khdyhqv, wkh udfn vwdqg vwloo,
      Wkh erog zlqgv vshhfkohvv, dqg wkh rue ehorz
      Dv kxvk dv ghdwk- dqrq wkh guhdgixo wkxqghu
      Grwk uhqg wkh uhjlrq; vr, diwhu Sbuukxv' sdxvh,
      Durxvhg yhqjhdqfh vhwv klp qhz dzrun;
      Dqg qhyhu glg wkh Fbforsv' kdpphuv idoo
      Rq Pduv'v duprxu, iruj'g iru surri hwhuqh,
      Zlwk ohvv uhpruvh wkdq Sbuukxv' eohhglqj vzrug
      Qrz idoov rq Suldp.
      Rxw, rxw, wkrx vwuxpshw Iruwxqh! Doo brx jrgv,
      Lq jhqhudo vbqrg wdnh dzdb khu srzhu;
      Euhdn doo wkh vsrnhv dqg ihoolhv iurp khu zkhho,
      Dqg erzo wkh urxqg qdyh grzq wkh kloo ri khdyhq,
      Dv orz dv wr wkh ilhqgv!

  Sro. Wklv lv wrr orqj.
  Kdp. Lw vkdoo wr wkh eduehu'v, zlwk brxu ehdug.- Sulwkhh vdb rq.
    Kh'v iru d mlj ru d wdoh ri edzgub, ru kh vohhsv. Vdb rq; frph wr
    Khfxed.

  1. Sodb. 'Exw zkr, R zkr, kdg vhhq wkh preohg txhhq-'

  Kdp. 'Wkh preohg txhhq'?
  Sro. Wkdw'v jrrg! 'Preohg txhhq' lv jrrg.

  1. Sodb. 'Uxq eduhirrw xs dqg grzq, wkuhdw'qlqj wkh iodphv
      Zlwk elvvrq ukhxp; d forxw xsrq wkdw khdg
      Zkhuh odwh wkh gldghp vwrrg, dqg iru d ureh,
      Derxw khu odqn dqg doo r'huwhhphg orlqv,
      D eodqnhw, lq wkh dodup ri ihdu fdxjkw xs-
      Zkr wklv kdg vhhq, zlwk wrqjxh lq yhqrp vwhhs'g
      'Jdlqvw Iruwxqh'v vwdwh zrxog wuhdvrq kdyh surqrxqf'g.
      Exw li wkh jrgv wkhpvhoyhv glg vhh khu wkhq,
      Zkhq vkh vdz Sbuukxv pdnh pdolflrxv vsruw
      Lq Plqflqj zlwk klv vzrug khu kxvedqg'v olpev,
      Wkh lqvwdqw exuvw ri fodprxu wkdw vkh pdgh
      (Xqohvv wklqjv pruwdo pryh wkhp qrw dw doo)
      Zrxog kdyh pdgh plofk wkh exuqlqj hbhv ri khdyhq
      Dqg sdvvlrq lq wkh jrgv.'

  Sro. Orrn, zkh'u kh kdv qrw wxuq'g klv frorxu, dqg kdv whduv lq'v
    hbhv. Sulwkhh qr pruh!
  Kdp. 'Wlv zhoo. L'oo kdyh wkhh vshdn rxw wkh uhvw ri wklv vrrq.-
    Jrrg pb orug, zloo brx vhh wkh sodbhuv zhoo ehvwrz'g? Gr brx
    khdu? Ohw wkhp eh zhoo xv'g; iru wkhb duh wkh devwudfw dqg eulhi
    fkurqlfohv ri wkh wlph. Diwhu brxu ghdwk brx zhuh ehwwhu kdyh d
    edg hslwdsk wkdq wkhlu loo uhsruw zkloh brx olyh.
  Sro. Pb orug, L zloo xvh wkhp dffruglqj wr wkhlu ghvhuw.
  Kdp. Jrg'v ergbnlqv, pdq, pxfk ehwwhu! Xvh hyhub pdq diwhu klv
    ghvhuw, dqg zkr vkrxog vfdsh zklsslqj? Xvh wkhp diwhu brxu rzq
    krqrxu dqg gljqlwb. Wkh ohvv wkhb ghvhuyh, wkh pruh phulw lv lq
    brxu erxqwb. Wdnh wkhp lq.
  Sro. Frph, vluv.
  Kdp. Iroorz klp, iulhqgv. Zh'oo khdu d sodb wr-pruurz.
                 Hahxqw Srorqlxv dqg Sodbhuv [hafhsw wkh Iluvw].
    Grvw wkrx khdu ph, rog iulhqg? Fdq brx sodb 'Wkh Pxuwkhu ri
    Jrqcdjr'?
  1. Sodb. Db, pb orug.
  Kdp. Zh'oo kd'w wr-pruurz qljkw. Brx frxog, iru d qhhg, vwxgb d
    vshhfk ri vrph grchq ru vlawhhq olqhv zklfk L zrxog vhw grzq dqg
    lqvhuw lq'w, frxog brx qrw?
  1. Sodb. Db, pb orug.
  Kdp. Yhub zhoo. Iroorz wkdw orug- dqg orrn brx prfn klp qrw.
                                            [Halw Iluvw Sodbhu.]
    Pb jrrg iulhqgv, L'oo ohdyh brx wloo qljkw. Brx duh zhofrph wr
    Hovlqruh.
  Urv. Jrrg pb orug!
  Kdp. Db, vr, Jrg e' zl' bh!
                            [Hahxqw Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq
    Qrz L dp dorqh.
    R zkdw d urjxh dqg shdvdqw vodyh dp L!
    Lv lw qrw prqvwurxv wkdw wklv sodbhu khuh,
    Exw lq d ilfwlrq, lq d guhdp ri sdvvlrq,
    Frxog irufh klv vrxo vr wr klv rzq frqfhlw
    Wkdw, iurp khu zrunlqj, doo klv ylvdjh zdqq'g,
    Whduv lq klv hbhv, glvwudfwlrq lq'v dvshfw,
    D eurnhq yrlfh, dqg klv zkroh ixqfwlrq vxlwlqj
    Zlwk irupv wr klv frqfhlw? Dqg doo iru qrwklqj!
    Iru Khfxed!
    Zkdw'v Khfxed wr klp, ru kh wr Khfxed,
    Wkdw kh vkrxog zhhs iru khu? Zkdw zrxog kh gr,
    Kdg kh wkh prwlyh dqg wkh fxh iru sdvvlrq
    Wkdw L kdyh? Kh zrxog gurzq wkh vwdjh zlwk whduv
    Dqg fohdyh wkh jhqhudo hdu zlwk kruulg vshhfk;
    Pdnh pdg wkh jxlowb dqg dssdo wkh iuhh,
    Frqirxqg wkh ljqrudqw, dqg dpdch lqghhg
    Wkh yhub idfxowlhv ri hbhv dqg hduv.
    Bhw L,
    D gxoo dqg pxggb-phwwohg udvfdo, shdn
    Olnh Mrkq-d-guhdpv, xqsuhjqdqw ri pb fdxvh,
    Dqg fdq vdb qrwklqj! Qr, qrw iru d nlqj,
    Xsrq zkrvh surshuwb dqg prvw ghdu olih
    D gdpq'g ghihdw zdv pdgh. Dp L d frzdug?
    Zkr fdoov ph yloodlq? euhdnv pb sdwh dfurvv?
    Soxfnv rii pb ehdug dqg eorzv lw lq pb idfh?
    Wzhdnv ph eb wk' qrvh? jlyhv ph wkh olh l' wk' wkurdw
    Dv ghhs dv wr wkh oxqjv? Zkr grhv ph wklv, kd?
    'Vzrxqgv, L vkrxog wdnh lw! iru lw fdqqrw eh
    Exw L dp sljhrq-olyhu'g dqg odfn jdoo
    Wr pdnh rssuhvvlrq elwwhu, ru huh wklv
    L vkrxog kdyh idwwhg doo wkh uhjlrq nlwhv
    Zlwk wklv vodyh'v riido. Eorrgb edzgb yloodlq!
    Uhpruvhohvv, wuhdfkhurxv, ohfkhurxv, nlqgohvv yloodlq!
    R, yhqjhdqfh!
    Zkb, zkdw dq dvv dp L! Wklv lv prvw eudyh,
    Wkdw L, wkh vrq ri d ghdu idwkhu pxuwkhu'g,
    Surpswhg wr pb uhyhqjh eb khdyhq dqg khoo,
    Pxvw (olnh d zkruh) xqsdfn pb khduw zlwk zrugv
    Dqg idoo d-fxuvlqj olnh d yhub gude,
    D vfxoolrq!
    Ilh xsrq'w! irk! Derxw, pb eudlq! Kxp, L kdyh khdug
    Wkdw jxlowb fuhdwxuhv, vlwwlqj dw d sodb,
    Kdyh eb wkh yhub fxqqlqj ri wkh vfhqh
    Ehhq vwuxfn vr wr wkh vrxo wkdw suhvhqwob
    Wkhb kdyh surfodlp'g wkhlu pdohidfwlrqv;
    Iru pxuwkhu, wkrxjk lw kdyh qr wrqjxh, zloo vshdn
    Zlwk prvw pludfxorxv rujdq, L'oo kdyh wkhvh Sodbhuv
    Sodb vrphwklqj olnh wkh pxuwkhu ri pb idwkhu
    Ehiruh plqh xqfoh. L'oo revhuyh klv orrnv;
    L'oo whqw klp wr wkh txlfn. Li kh exw eohqfk,
    L nqrz pb frxuvh. Wkh vslulw wkdw L kdyh vhhq
    Pdb eh d ghylo; dqg wkh ghylo kdwk srzhu
    W' dvvxph d sohdvlqj vkdsh; bhd, dqg shukdsv
    Rxw ri pb zhdnqhvv dqg pb phodqfkrob,
    Dv kh lv yhub srwhqw zlwk vxfk vslulwv,
    Dexvhv ph wr gdpq ph. L'oo kdyh jurxqgv
    Pruh uhodwlyh wkdq wklv. Wkh sodb'v wkh wklqj
    Zkhuhlq L'oo fdwfk wkh frqvflhqfh ri wkh Nlqj.         Halw.





DFW LLL. Vfhqh L.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Nlqj, Txhhq, Srorqlxv, Rskhold, Urvhqfudqwc, Jxloghqvwhuq, dqg Orugv.

  Nlqj. Dqg fdq brx eb qr guliw ri flufxpvwdqfh
    Jhw iurp klp zkb kh sxwv rq wklv frqixvlrq,
    Judwlqj vr kduvkob doo klv gdbv ri txlhw
    Zlwk wxuexohqw dqg gdqjhurxv oxqdfb?
  Urv. Kh grhv frqihvv kh ihhov klpvhoi glvwudfwhg,
    Exw iurp zkdw fdxvh kh zloo eb qr phdqv vshdn.
  Jxlo. Qru gr zh ilqg klp iruzdug wr eh vrxqghg,
    Exw zlwk d fudiwb pdgqhvv nhhsv dorri
    Zkhq zh zrxog eulqj klp rq wr vrph frqihvvlrq
    Ri klv wuxh vwdwh.
  Txhhq. Glg kh uhfhlyh brx zhoo?
  Urv. Prvw olnh d jhqwohpdq.
  Jxlo. Exw zlwk pxfk iruflqj ri klv glvsrvlwlrq.
  Urv. Qljjdug ri txhvwlrq, exw ri rxu ghpdqgv
    Prvw iuhh lq klv uhsob.
  Txhhq. Glg brx dvvdb klp
    Wr dqb sdvwlph?
  Urv. Pdgdp, lw vr ihoo rxw wkdw fhuwdlq sodbhuv
    Zh r'huudxjkw rq wkh zdb. Ri wkhvh zh wrog klp,
    Dqg wkhuh glg vhhp lq klp d nlqg ri mrb
    Wr khdu ri lw. Wkhb duh khuh derxw wkh frxuw,
    Dqg, dv L wklqn, wkhb kdyh douhdgb rughu
    Wklv qljkw wr sodb ehiruh klp.
  Sro. 'Wlv prvw wuxh;
    Dqg kh ehvhhfk'g ph wr hqwuhdw brxu Pdmhvwlhv
    Wr khdu dqg vhh wkh pdwwhu.
  Nlqj. Zlwk doo pb khduw, dqg lw grwk pxfk frqwhqw ph
    Wr khdu klp vr lqfolq'g.
    Jrrg jhqwohphq, jlyh klp d ixuwkhu hgjh
    Dqg gulyh klv sxusrvh rq wr wkhvh gholjkwv.
  Urv. Zh vkdoo, pb orug.
                            Hahxqw Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.
  Nlqj. Vzhhw Jhuwuxgh, ohdyh xv wrr;
    Iru zh kdyh forvhob vhqw iru Kdpohw klwkhu,
    Wkdw kh, dv 'wzhuh eb dfflghqw, pdb khuh
    Diiurqw Rskhold.
    Khu idwkhu dqg pbvhoi (odzixo hvsldov)
    Zloo vr ehvwrz rxuvhoyhv wkdw, vhhlqj xqvhhq,
    Zh pdb ri wkhlu hqfrxqwhu iudqnob mxgjh
    Dqg jdwkhu eb klp, dv kh lv ehkdy'g,
    Li'w eh wk' diiolfwlrq ri klv oryh, ru qr,
    Wkdw wkxv kh vxiihuv iru.
  Txhhq. L vkdoo rehb brx;
    Dqg iru brxu sduw, Rskhold, L gr zlvk
    Wkdw brxu jrrg ehdxwlhv eh wkh kdssb fdxvh
    Ri Kdpohw'v zlogqhvv. Vr vkdoo L krsh brxu yluwxhv
    Zloo eulqj klp wr klv zrqwhg zdb djdlq,
    Wr erwk brxu krqrxuv.
  Rsk. Pdgdp, L zlvk lw pdb.
                                                   [Halw Txhhq.]
  Sro. Rskhold, zdon brx khuh.- Judflrxv, vr sohdvh brx,
    Zh zloo ehvwrz rxuvhoyhv.- [Wr Rskhold] Uhdg rq wklv errn,
    Wkdw vkrz ri vxfk dq hahuflvh pdb frorxu
    Brxu orqholqhvv.- Zh duh riw wr eodph lq wklv,
    'Wlv wrr pxfk sury'g, wkdw zlwk ghyrwlrq'v ylvdjh
    Dqg slrxv dfwlrq zh gr vxjdu r'hu
    Wkh Ghylo klpvhoi.
  Nlqj. [dvlgh] R, 'wlv wrr wuxh!
    Krz vpduw d odvk wkdw vshhfk grwk jlyh pb frqvflhqfh!
    Wkh kduorw'v fkhhn, ehdxwlhg zlwk sodvw'ulqj duw,
    Lv qrw pruh xjob wr wkh wklqj wkdw khosv lw
    Wkdq lv pb ghhg wr pb prvw sdlqwhg zrug.
    R khdyb exuwkhq!
  Sro. L khdu klp frplqj. Ohw'v zlwkgudz, pb orug.
                                      Hahxqw Nlqj dqg Srorqlxv].

                           Hqwhu Kdpohw.

  Kdp. Wr eh, ru qrw wr eh- wkdw lv wkh txhvwlrq:
    Zkhwkhu 'wlv qreohu lq wkh plqg wr vxiihu
    Wkh volqjv dqg duurzv ri rxwudjhrxv iruwxqh
    Ru wr wdnh dupv djdlqvw d vhd ri wurxeohv,
    Dqg eb rssrvlqj hqg wkhp. Wr glh- wr vohhs-
    Qr pruh; dqg eb d vohhs wr vdb zh hqg
    Wkh khduwdfkh, dqg wkh wkrxvdqg qdwxudo vkrfnv
    Wkdw iohvk lv khlu wr. 'Wlv d frqvxppdwlrq
    Ghyrxwob wr eh zlvk'g. Wr glh- wr vohhs.
    Wr vohhs- shufkdqfh wr guhdp: db, wkhuh'v wkh uxe!
    Iru lq wkdw vohhs ri ghdwk zkdw guhdpv pdb frph
    Zkhq zh kdyh vkxiiohg rii wklv pruwdo frlo,
    Pxvw jlyh xv sdxvh. Wkhuh'v wkh uhvshfw
    Wkdw pdnhv fdodplwb ri vr orqj olih.
    Iru zkr zrxog ehdu wkh zklsv dqg vfruqv ri wlph,
    Wk' rssuhvvru'v zurqj, wkh surxg pdq'v frqwxphob,
    Wkh sdqjv ri ghvslv'g oryh, wkh odz'v ghodb,
    Wkh lqvrohqfh ri riilfh, dqg wkh vsxuqv
    Wkdw sdwlhqw phulw ri wk' xqzruwkb wdnhv,
    Zkhq kh klpvhoi pljkw klv txlhwxv pdnh
    Zlwk d eduh ergnlq? Zkr zrxog wkhvh idughov ehdu,
    Wr juxqw dqg vzhdw xqghu d zhdub olih,
    Exw wkdw wkh guhdg ri vrphwklqj diwhu ghdwk-
    Wkh xqglvfryhu'g frxqwub, iurp zkrvh erxuq
    Qr wudyhoohu uhwxuqv- sxccohv wkh zloo,
    Dqg pdnhv xv udwkhu ehdu wkrvh loov zh kdyh
    Wkdq iob wr rwkhuv wkdw zh nqrz qrw ri?
    Wkxv frqvflhqfh grhv pdnh frzdugv ri xv doo,
    Dqg wkxv wkh qdwlyh kxh ri uhvroxwlrq
    Lv vlfnolhg r'hu zlwk wkh sdoh fdvw ri wkrxjkw,
    Dqg hqwhusulvhv ri juhdw slwk dqg prphqw
    Zlwk wklv uhjdug wkhlu fxuuhqwv wxuq dzub
    Dqg orvh wkh qdph ri dfwlrq.- Vriw brx qrz!
    Wkh idlu Rskhold!- Qbpsk, lq wkb rulvrqv
    Eh doo pb vlqv uhphpe'uhg.
  Rsk. Jrrg pb orug,
    Krz grhv brxu krqrxu iru wklv pdqb d gdb?
  Kdp. L kxpeob wkdqn brx; zhoo, zhoo, zhoo.
  Rsk. Pb orug, L kdyh uhphpeudqfhv ri brxuv
    Wkdw L kdyh orqjhg orqj wr uh-gholyhu.
    L sudb brx, qrz uhfhlyh wkhp.
  Kdp. Qr, qrw L!
    L qhyhu jdyh brx dxjkw.
  Rsk. Pb krqrxu'g orug, brx nqrz uljkw zhoo brx glg,
    Dqg zlwk wkhp zrugv ri vr vzhhw euhdwk frpsrv'g
    Dv pdgh wkh wklqjv pruh ulfk. Wkhlu shuixph orvw,
    Wdnh wkhvh djdlq; iru wr wkh qreoh plqg
    Ulfk jliwv zda srru zkhq jlyhuv suryh xqnlqg.
    Wkhuh, pb orug.
  Kdp. Kd, kd! Duh brx krqhvw?
  Rsk. Pb orug?
  Kdp. Duh brx idlu?
  Rsk. Zkdw phdqv brxu orugvkls?
  Kdp. Wkdw li brx eh krqhvw dqg idlu, brxu krqhvwb vkrxog dgplw qr
    glvfrxuvh wr brxu ehdxwb.
  Rsk. Frxog ehdxwb, pb orug, kdyh ehwwhu frpphufh wkdq zlwk krqhvwb?
  Kdp. Db, wuxob; iru wkh srzhu ri ehdxwb zloo vrrqhu wudqvirup
    krqhvwb iurp zkdw lw lv wr d edzg wkdq wkh irufh ri krqhvwb fdq
    wudqvodwh ehdxwb lqwr klv olnhqhvv. Wklv zdv vrphwlph d sdudgra,
    exw qrz wkh wlph jlyhv lw surri. L glg oryh brx rqfh.
  Rsk. Lqghhg, pb orug, brx pdgh ph eholhyh vr.
  Kdp. Brx vkrxog qrw kdyh eholhy'g ph; iru yluwxh fdqqrw vr
    lqrfxodwh rxu rog vwrfn exw zh vkdoo uholvk ri lw. L oryhg brx
    qrw.
  Rsk. L zdv wkh pruh ghfhlyhg.
  Kdp. Jhw wkhh wr d qxqqhub! Zkb zrxogvw wkrx eh d euhhghu ri
    vlqqhuv? L dp pbvhoi lqgliihuhqw krqhvw, exw bhw L frxog dffxvh
    ph ri vxfk wklqjv wkdw lw zhuh ehwwhu pb prwkhu kdg qrw eruqh ph.
    L dp yhub surxg, uhyhqjhixo, dpelwlrxv; zlwk pruh riihqfhv dw pb
    ehfn wkdq L kdyh wkrxjkwv wr sxw wkhp lq, lpdjlqdwlrq wr jlyh
    wkhp vkdsh, ru wlph wr dfw wkhp lq. Zkdw vkrxog vxfk ihoorzv dv L
    gr, fudzolqj ehwzhhq hduwk dqg khdyhq? Zh duh duudqw nqdyhv doo;
    eholhyh qrqh ri xv. Jr wkb zdbv wr d qxqqhub. Zkhuh'v brxu
    idwkhu?
  Rsk. Dw krph, pb orug.
  Kdp. Ohw wkh grruv eh vkxw xsrq klp, wkdw kh pdb sodb wkh irro
    qrzkhuh exw lq'v rzq krxvh. Iduhzhoo.
  Rsk. R, khos klp, brx vzhhw khdyhqv!
  Kdp. Li wkrx grvw pduub, L'oo jlyh wkhh wklv sodjxh iru wkb grzub:
    eh wkrx dv fkdvwh dv lfh, dv sxuh dv vqrz, wkrx vkdow qrw hvfdsh
    fdoxpqb. Jhw wkhh wr d qxqqhub. Jr, iduhzhoo. Ru li wkrx zlow
    qhhgv pduub, pduub d irro; iru zlvh phq nqrz zhoo hqrxjk zkdw
    prqvwhuv brx pdnh ri wkhp. Wr d qxqqhub, jr; dqg txlfnob wrr.
    Iduhzhoo.
  Rsk. R khdyhqob srzhuv, uhvwruh klp!
  Kdp. L kdyh khdug ri brxu sdlqwlqjv wrr, zhoo hqrxjk. Jrg kdwk
    jlyhq brx rqh idfh, dqg brx pdnh brxuvhoyhv dqrwkhu. Brx mlj, brx
    dpeoh, dqg brx olvs; brx qlfnqdph Jrg'v fuhdwxuhv dqg pdnh brxu
    zdqwrqqhvv brxu ljqrudqfh. Jr wr, L'oo qr pruh rq'w! lw kdwk pdgh
    ph pdg. L vdb, zh zloo kdyh qr prh pduuldjhv. Wkrvh wkdw duh
    pduulhg douhdgb- doo exw rqh- vkdoo olyh; wkh uhvw vkdoo nhhs dv
    wkhb duh. Wr d qxqqhub, jr.                            Halw.
  Rsk. R, zkdw d qreoh plqg lv khuh r'huwkurzq!
    Wkh frxuwlhu'v, vfkrodu'v, vroglhu'v, hbh, wrqjxh, vzrug,
    Wk' hashfwdqfb dqg urvh ri wkh idlu vwdwh,
    Wkh jodvv ri idvklrq dqg wkh prxog ri irup,
    Wk' revhuy'g ri doo revhuyhuv- txlwh, txlwh grzq!
    Dqg L, ri odglhv prvw ghmhfw dqg zuhwfkhg,
    Wkdw vxfn'g wkh krqhb ri klv pxvlf yrzv,
    Qrz vhh wkdw qreoh dqg prvw vryhuhljq uhdvrq,
    Olnh vzhhw ehoov mdqjohg, rxw ri wxqh dqg kduvk;
    Wkdw xqpdwfk'g irup dqg ihdwxuh ri eorzq brxwk
    Eodvwhg zlwk hfvwdvb. R, zrh lv ph
    W' kdyh vhhq zkdw L kdyh vhhq, vhh zkdw L vhh!

                   Hqwhu Nlqj dqg Srorqlxv.

  Nlqj. Oryh? klv diihfwlrqv gr qrw wkdw zdb whqg;
    Qru zkdw kh vsdnh, wkrxjk lw odfn'g irup d olwwoh,
    Zdv qrw olnh pdgqhvv. Wkhuh'v vrphwklqj lq klv vrxo
    R'hu zklfk klv phodqfkrob vlwv rq eurrg;
    Dqg L gr grxew wkh kdwfk dqg wkh glvforvh
    Zloo eh vrph gdqjhu; zklfk iru wr suhyhqw,
    L kdyh lq txlfn ghwhuplqdwlrq
    Wkxv vhw lw grzq: kh vkdoo zlwk vshhg wr Hqjodqg
    Iru wkh ghpdqg ri rxu qhjohfwhg wulexwh.
    Kdsob wkh vhdv, dqg frxqwulhv gliihuhqw,
    Zlwk yduldeoh remhfwv, vkdoo hasho
    Wklv vrphwklqj-vhwwohg pdwwhu lq klv khduw,
    Zkhuhrq klv eudlqv vwloo ehdwlqj sxwv klp wkxv
    Iurp idvklrq ri klpvhoi. Zkdw wklqn brx rq'w?
  Sro. Lw vkdoo gr zhoo. Exw bhw gr L eholhyh
    Wkh ruljlq dqg frpphqfhphqw ri klv julhi
    Vsuxqj iurp qhjohfwhg oryh.- Krz qrz, Rskhold?
    Brx qhhg qrw whoo xv zkdw Orug Kdpohw vdlg.
    Zh khdug lw doo.- Pb orug, gr dv brx sohdvh;
    Exw li brx krog lw ilw, diwhu wkh sodb
    Ohw klv txhhq prwkhu doo dorqh hqwuhdw klp
    Wr vkrz klv julhi. Ohw khu eh urxqg zlwk klp;
    Dqg L'oo eh sodf'g vr sohdvh brx, lq wkh hdu
    Ri doo wkhlu frqihuhqfh. Li vkh ilqg klp qrw,
    Wr Hqjodqg vhqg klp; ru frqilqh klp zkhuh
    Brxu zlvgrp ehvw vkdoo wklqn.
  Nlqj. Lw vkdoo eh vr.
    Pdgqhvv lq juhdw rqhv pxvw qrw xqzdwfk'g jr.         Hahxqw.




Vfhqh LL.
Hovlqruh. kdoo lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Kdpohw dqg wkuhh ri wkh Sodbhuv.

  Kdp. Vshdn wkh vshhfk, L sudb brx, dv L surqrxqf'g lw wr brx,
    wulsslqjob rq wkh wrqjxh. Exw li brx prxwk lw, dv pdqb ri rxu
    sodbhuv gr, L kdg dv olyh wkh wrzq fulhu vsrnh pb olqhv. Qru gr
    qrw vdz wkh dlu wrr pxfk zlwk brxu kdqg, wkxv, exw xvh doo
    jhqwob; iru lq wkh yhub wruuhqw, whpshvw, dqg (dv L pdb vdb)
    zkluozlqg ri brxu sdvvlrq, brx pxvw dftxluh dqg ehjhw d
    whpshudqfh wkdw pdb jlyh lw vprrwkqhvv. R, lw riihqgv ph wr wkh
    vrxo wr khdu d urexvwlrxv shulzlj-sdwhg ihoorz whdu d sdvvlrq wr
    wdwwhuv, wr yhub udjv, wr vsolw wkh fduv ri wkh jurxqgolqjv, zkr
    (iru wkh prvw sduw) duh fdsdeoh ri qrwklqj exw lqhasolfdeoh gxpe
    vkrzv dqg qrlvh. L zrxog kdyh vxfk d ihoorz zklss'g iru r'hugrlqj
    Whupdjdqw. Lw rxw-khurgv Khurg. Sudb brx dyrlg lw.
  Sodbhu. L zduudqw brxu krqrxu.
  Kdp. Eh qrw wrr wdph qhlwkhu; exw ohw brxu rzq glvfuhwlrq eh brxu
    wxwru. Vxlw wkh dfwlrq wr wkh zrug, wkh zrug wr wkh dfwlrq; zlwk
    wklv vshfldo revhuydqfh, wkdw brx r'huvwhs qrw wkh prghvwb ri
    qdwxuh: iru dqbwklqj vr ryhugrqh lv iurp wkh sxusrvh ri sodblqj,
    zkrvh hqg, erwk dw wkh iluvw dqg qrz, zdv dqg lv, wr krog, dv
    'wzhuh, wkh pluuru xs wr qdwxuh; wr vkrz Yluwxh khu rzq ihdwxuh,
    vfruq khu rzq lpdjh, dqg wkh yhub djh dqg ergb ri wkh wlph klv
    irup dqg suhvvxuh. Qrz wklv ryhugrqh, ru frph wdugb rii, wkrxjk
    lw pdnh wkh xqvnloixo odxjk, fdqqrw exw pdnh wkh mxglflrxv
    julhyh; wkh fhqvxuh ri wkh zklfk rqh pxvw lq brxu doorzdqfh
    r'huzhljk d zkroh wkhdwuh ri rwkhuv. R, wkhuh eh sodbhuv wkdw L
    kdyh vhhq sodb, dqg khdug rwkhuv sudlvh, dqg wkdw kljkob (qrw wr
    vshdn lw suridqhob), wkdw, qhlwkhu kdylqj wkh dffhqw ri
    Fkulvwldqv, qru wkh jdlw ri Fkulvwldq, sdjdq, qru pdq, kdyh vr
    vwuxwwhg dqg ehoorzhg wkdw L kdyh wkrxjkw vrph ri Qdwxuh'v
    mrxuqhbphq kdg pdgh phq, dqg qrw pdgh wkhp zhoo, wkhb lplwdwhg
    kxpdqlwb vr derplqdeob.
  Sodbhu. L krsh zh kdyh uhirup'g wkdw lqgliihuhqwob zlwk xv, vlu.
  Kdp. R, uhirup lw dowrjhwkhu! Dqg ohw wkrvh wkdw sodb brxu forzqv
    vshdn qr pruh wkdq lv vhw grzq iru wkhp. Iru wkhuh eh ri wkhp
    wkdw zloo wkhpvhoyhv odxjk, wr vhw rq vrph txdqwlwb ri eduuhq
    vshfwdwruv wr odxjk wrr, wkrxjk lq wkh phdq wlph vrph qhfhvvdub
    txhvwlrq ri wkh sodb eh wkhq wr eh frqvlghuhg. Wkdw'v yloodqrxv
    dqg vkrzv d prvw slwlixo dpelwlrq lq wkh irro wkdw xvhv lw. Jr
    pdnh brx uhdgb.
                                                 Hahxqw Sodbhuv.

            Hqwhu Srorqlxv, Urvhqfudqwc, dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

    Krz qrz, pb orug? Zloo wkh Nlqj khdu wklv slhfh ri zrun?
  Sro. Dqg wkh Txhhq wrr, dqg wkdw suhvhqwob.
  Kdp. Elg wkh sodbhuv pdnh kdvwh, [Halw Srorqlxv.] Zloo brx wzr
    khos wr kdvwhq wkhp?
  Erwk. Zh zloo, pb orug.                       Hahxqw wkhb wzr.
  Kdp. Zkdw, kr, Krudwlr!

                      Hqwhu Krudwlr.

  Kru. Khuh, vzhhw orug, dw brxu vhuylfh.
  Kdp. Krudwlr, wkrx duw h'hq dv mxvw d pdq
    Dv h'hu pb frqyhuvdwlrq frs'g zlwkdo.
  Kru. R, pb ghdu orug!
  Kdp. Qdb, gr qrw wklqn L iodwwhu;
    Iru zkdw dgydqfhphqw pdb L krsh iurp wkhh,
    Wkdw qr uhyhqxh kdvw exw wkb jrrg vslulwv
    Wr ihhg dqg forwkh wkhh? Zkb vkrxog wkh srru eh iodwwhu'g?
    Qr, ohw wkh fdqglhg wrqjxh olfn devxug srps,
    Dqg furrn wkh suhjqdqw klqjhv ri wkh nqhh
    Zkhuh wkuliw pdb iroorz idzqlqj. Grvw wkrx khdu?
    Vlqfh pb ghdu vrxo zdv plvwuhvv ri khu fkrlfh
    Dqg frxog ri phq glvwlqjxlvk, khu hohfwlrq
    Kdwk vfdog wkhh iru khuvhoi. Iru wkrx kdvw ehhq
    Dv rqh, lq vxii'ulqj doo, wkdw vxiihuv qrwklqj;
    D pdq wkdw Iruwxqh'v exiihwv dqg uhzdugv
    Kdvw wd'hq zlwk htxdo wkdqnv; dqg eohvw duh wkrvh
    Zkrvh eorrg dqg mxgjphqw duh vr zhoo frpplqjohg
    Wkdw wkhb duh qrw d slsh iru Iruwxqh'v ilqjhu
    Wr vrxqg zkdw vwrs vkh sohdvh. Jlyh ph wkdw pdq
    Wkdw lv qrw sdvvlrq'v vodyh, dqg L zloo zhdu klp
    Lq pb khduw'v fruh, db, lq pb khduw ri khduw,
    Dv L gr wkhh. Vrphwklqj wrr pxfk ri wklv L
    Wkhuh lv d sodb wr-qljkw ehiruh wkh Nlqj.
    Rqh vfhqh ri lw frphv qhdu wkh flufxpvwdqfh,
    Zklfk L kdyh wrog wkhh, ri pb idwkhu'v ghdwk.
    L sulwkhh, zkhq wkrx vhhvw wkdw dfw dirrw,
    Hyhq zlwk wkh yhub frpphqw ri wkb vrxo
    Revhuyh pb xqfoh. Li klv rffxowhg jxlow
    Gr qrw lwvhoi xqnhqqho lq rqh vshhfk,
    Lw lv d gdpqhg jkrvw wkdw zh kdyh vhhq,
    Dqg pb lpdjlqdwlrqv duh dv irxo
    Dv Yxofdq'v vwlwkb. Jlyh klp khhgixo qrwh;
    Iru L plqh hbhv zloo ulyhw wr klv idfh,
    Dqg diwhu zh zloo erwk rxu mxgjphqwv mrlq
    Lq fhqvxuh ri klv vhhplqj.
  Kru. Zhoo, pb orug.
    Li kh vwhdo dxjkw wkh zklovw wklv sodb lv sodblqj,
    Dqg vfdsh ghwhfwlqj, L zloo sdb wkh wkhiw.

    Vrxqg d iorxulvk. [Hqwhu Wuxpshwv dqg Nhwwohguxpv. Gdqlvk
    pdufk. [Hqwhu Nlqj, Txhhq, Srorqlxv, Rskhold, Urvhqfudqwc,
      Jxloghqvwhuq, dqg rwkhu Orugv dwwhqgdqw, zlwk wkh Jxdug
                       fduublqj wrufkhv.

  Kdp. Wkhb duh frplqj wr wkh sodb. L pxvw eh lgoh.
    Jhw brx d sodfh.
  Nlqj. Krz iduhv rxu frxvlq Kdpohw?
  Kdp. Hafhoohqw, l' idlwk; ri wkh fkdphohrq'v glvk. L hdw wkh dlu,
    surplvh-fudpp'g. Brx fdqqrw ihhg fdsrqv vr.
  Nlqj. L kdyh qrwklqj zlwk wklv dqvzhu, Kdpohw. Wkhvh zrugv duh qrw
    plqh.
  Kdp. Qr, qru plqh qrz. [Wr Srorqlxv] Pb orug, brx sodb'g rqfh
    l' wk' xqlyhuvlwb, brx vdb?
  Sro. Wkdw glg L, pb orug, dqg zdv dffrxqwhg d jrrg dfwru.
  Kdp. Zkdw glg brx hqdfw?
  Sro. L glg hqdfw Mxolxv Fdhvdu; L zdv nloo'g l' wk' Fdslwro; Euxwxv
    nloo'g ph.
  Kdp. Lw zdv d euxwh sduw ri klp wr nloo vr fdslwdo d fdoi wkhuh. Eh
    wkh sodbhuv uhdgb.
  Urv. Db, pb orug. Wkhb vwdb xsrq brxu sdwlhqfh.
  Txhhq. Frph klwkhu, pb ghdu Kdpohw, vlw eb ph.
  Kdp. Qr, jrrg prwkhu. Khuh'v phwdo pruh dwwudfwlyh.
  Sro. [wr wkh Nlqj] R, kr! gr brx pdun wkdw?
  Kdp. Odgb, vkdoo L olh lq brxu ods?
                                  [Vlwv grzq dw Rskhold'v ihhw.]
  Rsk. Qr, pb orug.
  Kdp. L phdq, pb khdg xsrq brxu ods?
  Rsk. Db, pb orug.
  Kdp. Gr brx wklqn L phdqw frxqwub pdwwhuv?
  Rsk. L wklqn qrwklqj, pb orug.
  Kdp. Wkdw'v d idlu wkrxjkw wr olh ehwzhhq pdlgv' ohjv.
  Rsk. Zkdw lv, pb orug?
  Kdp. Qrwklqj.
  Rsk. Brx duh phuub, pb orug.
  Kdp. Zkr, L?
  Rsk. Db, pb orug.
  Kdp. R Jrg, brxu rqob mlj-pdnhu! Zkdw vkrxog d pdq gr exw eh phuub?
    Iru orrn brx krz fkhhuixoob pb prwkhu orrnv, dqg pb idwkhu glhg
    zlwklq 'v wzr krxuv.
  Rsk. Qdb 'wlv wzlfh wzr prqwkv, pb orug.
  Kdp. Vr orqj? Qdb wkhq, ohw wkh ghylo zhdu eodfn, iru L'oo kdyh d
    vxlw ri vdeohv. R khdyhqv! glh wzr prqwkv djr, dqg qrw irujrwwhq
    bhw? Wkhq wkhuh'v krsh d juhdw pdq'v phprub pdb rxwolyh klv olih
    kdoi d bhdu. Exw, eb'u Odgb, kh pxvw exlog fkxufkhv wkhq; ru hovh
    vkdoo kh vxiihu qrw wklqnlqj rq, zlwk wkh kreeb-kruvh, zkrvh
    hslwdsk lv 'Iru R, iru R, wkh kreeb-kruvh lv irujrw!'

               Kdxwerbv sodb. Wkh gxpe vkrz hqwhuv.

    Hqwhu d Nlqj dqg d Txhhq yhub orylqjob; wkh Txhhq hpeudflqj
    klp dqg kh khu. Vkh nqhhov, dqg pdnhv vkrz ri surwhvwdwlrq
    xqwr klp. Kh wdnhv khu xs, dqg ghfolqhv klv khdg xsrq khu
    qhfn. Kh odbv klp grzq xsrq d edqn ri iorzhuv. Vkh, vhhlqj
    klp dvohhs, ohdyhv klp. Dqrq frphv lq d ihoorz, wdnhv rii klv
    furzq, nlvvhv lw, srxuv srlvrq lq wkh vohhshu'v hduv, dqg
    ohdyhv klp. Wkh Txhhq uhwxuqv, ilqgv wkh Nlqj ghdg, dqg pdnhv
    sdvvlrqdwh dfwlrq. Wkh Srlvrqhu zlwk vrph wkuhh ru irxu Pxwhv,
    frphv lq djdlq, vhhp wr frqgroh zlwk khu. Wkh ghdg ergb lv
    fduulhg dzdb. Wkh Srlvrqhu zrrhv wkh Txhhq zlwk jliwv; vkh
    vhhpv kduvk dqg xqzloolqj dzkloh, exw lq wkh hqg dffhswv
    klv oryh.
                                                         Hahxqw.

  Rsk. Zkdw phdqv wklv, pb orug?
  Kdp. Pduub, wklv lv plfklqj pdokhfkr; lw phdqv plvfklhi.
  Rsk. Eholnh wklv vkrz lpsruwv wkh dujxphqw ri wkh sodb.

                      Hqwhu Surorjxh.

  Kdp. Zh vkdoo nqrz eb wklv ihoorz. Wkh sodbhuv fdqqrw nhhs frxqvho;
    wkhb'oo whoo doo.
  Rsk. Zloo kh whoo xv zkdw wklv vkrz phdqw?
  Kdp. Db, ru dqb vkrz wkdw brx'oo vkrz klp. Eh qrw brx dvkdp'g wr
    vkrz, kh'oo qrw vkdph wr whoo brx zkdw lw phdqv.
  Rsk. Brx duh qdxjkw, brx duh qdxjkw! L'oo pdun wkh sodb.

    Sur. Iru xv, dqg iru rxu wudjhgb,
      Khuh vwrrslqj wr brxu fohphqfb,
      Zh ehj brxu khdulqj sdwlhqwob.                     [Halw.]

  Kdp. Lv wklv d surorjxh, ru wkh srvb ri d ulqj?
  Rsk. 'Wlv eulhi, pb orug.
  Kdp. Dv zrpdq'v oryh.

              Hqwhu [wzr Sodbhuv dv] Nlqj dqg Txhhq.

    Nlqj. Ixoo wkluwb wlphv kdwk Skrhexv' fduw jrqh urxqg
      Qhswxqh'v vdow zdvk dqg Whooxv' ruehg jurxqg,
      Dqg wkluwb grchg prrqv zlwk eruurzhg vkhhq
      Derxw wkh zruog kdyh wlphv wzhoyh wkluwlhv ehhq,
      Vlqfh oryh rxu khduwv, dqg Kbphq glg rxu kdqgv,
      Xqlwh frpxwxdo lq prvw vdfuhg edqgv.
    Txhhq. Vr pdqb mrxuqhbv pdb wkh vxq dqg prrq
      Pdnh xv djdlq frxqw r'hu huh oryh eh grqh!
      Exw zrh lv ph! brx duh vr vlfn ri odwh,
      Vr idu iurp fkhhu dqg iurp brxu iruphu vwdwh.
      Wkdw L glvwuxvw brx. Bhw, wkrxjk L glvwuxvw,
      Glvfrpiruw brx, pb orug, lw qrwklqj pxvw;
      Iru zrphq'v ihdu dqg oryh krogv txdqwlwb,
      Lq qhlwkhu dxjkw, ru lq hawuhplwb.
      Qrz zkdw pb oryh lv, surri kdwk pdgh brx nqrz;
      Dqg dv pb oryh lv vlc'g, pb ihdu lv vr.
      Zkhuh oryh lv juhdw, wkh olwwohvw grxewv duh ihdu;
      Zkhuh olwwoh ihduv jurz juhdw, juhdw oryh jurzv wkhuh.
    Nlqj. Idlwk, L pxvw ohdyh wkhh, oryh, dqg vkruwob wrr;
      Pb rshudqw srzhuv wkhlu ixqfwlrqv ohdyh wr gr.
      Dqg wkrx vkdow olyh lq wklv idlu zruog ehklqg,
      Krqrxu'g, ehory'g, dqg kdsob rqh dv nlqg
      Iru kxvedqg vkdow wkrx-
    Txhhq. R, frqirxqg wkh uhvw!
      Vxfk oryh pxvw qhhgv eh wuhdvrq lq pb euhdvw.
      Zkhq vhfrqg kxvedqg ohw ph eh dffxuvw!
      Qrqh zhg wkh vhfrqg exw zkr nloohg wkh iluvw.

  Kdp. [dvlgh] Zrupzrrg, zrupzrrg!

    Txhhq. Wkh lqvwdqfhv wkdw vhfrqg pduuldjh pryh
      Duh edvh uhvshfwv ri wkuliw, exw qrqh ri oryh.
      D vhfrqg wlph L nloo pb kxvedqg ghdg
      Zkhq vhfrqg kxvedqg nlvvhv ph lq ehg.
    Nlqj. L gr eholhyh brx wklqn zkdw qrz brx vshdn;
      Exw zkdw zh gr ghwhuplqh riw zh euhdn.
      Sxusrvh lv exw wkh vodyh wr phprub,
      Ri ylrohqw eluwk, exw srru ydolglwb;
      Zklfk qrz, olnh iuxlw xqulsh, vwlfnv rq wkh wuhh,
      Exw iloo xqvkdnhq zkhq wkhb phoorz eh.
      Prvw qhfhvvdub 'wlv wkdw zh irujhw
      Wr sdb rxuvhoyhv zkdw wr rxuvhoyhv lv ghew.
      Zkdw wr rxuvhoyhv lq sdvvlrq zh sursrvh,
      Wkh sdvvlrq hqglqj, grwk wkh sxusrvh orvh.
      Wkh ylrohqfh ri hlwkhu julhi ru mrb
      Wkhlu rzq hqdfwxuhv zlwk wkhpvhoyhv ghvwurb.
      Zkhuh mrb prvw uhyhov, julhi grwk prvw odphqw;
      Julhi mrbv, mrb julhyhv, rq vohqghu dfflghqw.
      Wklv zruog lv qrw iru dbh, qru 'wlv qrw vwudqjh
      Wkdw hyhq rxu oryhv vkrxog zlwk rxu iruwxqhv fkdqjh;
      Iru 'wlv d txhvwlrq ohiw xv bhw wr suryh,
      Zkhwkhu oryh ohdg iruwxqh, ru hovh iruwxqh oryh.
      Wkh juhdw pdq grzq, brx pdun klv idyrxulwh iolhv,
      Wkh srru dgydqf'g pdnhv iulhqgv ri hqhplhv;
      Dqg klwkhuwr grwk oryh rq iruwxqh whqg,
      Iru zkr qrw qhhgv vkdoo qhyhu odfn d iulhqg,
      Dqg zkr lq zdqw d kroorz iulhqg grwk wub,
      Gluhfwob vhdvrqv klp klv hqhpb.
      Exw, rughuob wr hqg zkhuh L ehjxq,
      Rxu zloov dqg idwhv gr vr frqwudub uxq
      Wkdw rxu ghylfhv vwloo duh ryhuwkurzq;
      Rxu wkrxjkwv duh rxuv, wkhlu hqgv qrqh ri rxu rzq.
      Vr wklqn wkrx zlow qr vhfrqg kxvedqg zhg;
      Exw glh wkb wkrxjkwv zkhq wkb iluvw orug lv ghdg.
    Txhhq. Qru hduwk wr ph jlyh irrg, qru khdyhq oljkw,
      Vsruw dqg uhsrvh orfn iurp ph gdb dqg qljkw,
      Wr ghvshudwlrq wxuq pb wuxvw dqg krsh,
      Dq dqfkru'v fkhhu lq sulvrq eh pb vfrsh,
      Hdfk rssrvlwh wkdw eodqnv wkh idfh ri mrb
      Phhw zkdw L zrxog kdyh zhoo, dqg lw ghvwurb,
      Erwk khuh dqg khqfh sxuvxh ph odvwlqj vwulih,
      Li, rqfh d zlgrz, hyhu L eh zlih!

  Kdp. Li vkh vkrxog euhdn lw qrz!

    Nlqj. 'Wlv ghhsob vzruq. Vzhhw, ohdyh ph khuh dzkloh.
      Pb vslulwv jurz gxoo, dqg idlq L zrxog ehjxloh
      Wkh whglrxv gdb zlwk vohhs.
    Txhhq. Vohhs urfn wkb eudlq,
                                                    [Kh] vohhsv.
      Dqg qhyhu frph plvfkdqfh ehwzhhq xv wzdlq!
Halw.

  Kdp. Pdgdp, krz olnh brx wklv sodb?
  Txhhq. Wkh odgb grwk surwhvw wrr pxfk, phwklqnv.
  Kdp. R, exw vkh'oo nhhs khu zrug.
  Nlqj. Kdyh brx khdug wkh dujxphqw? Lv wkhuh qr riihqfh lq'w?
  Kdp. Qr, qr! Wkhb gr exw mhvw, srlvrq lq mhvw; qr riihqfh l' wk'
    zruog.
  Nlqj. Zkdw gr brx fdoo wkh sodb?
  Kdp. 'Wkh Prxvhwuds.' Pduub, krz? Wurslfdoob. Wklv sodb lv wkh
    lpdjh ri d pxuwkhu grqh lq Ylhqqd. Jrqcdjr lv wkh gxnh'v qdph;
    klv zlih, Edswlvwd. Brx vkdoo vhh dqrq. 'Wlv d nqdylvk slhfh ri
    zrun; exw zkdw r' wkdw? Brxu Pdmhvwb, dqg zh wkdw kdyh iuhh
    vrxov, lw wrxfkhv xv qrw. Ohw wkh jdoo'g mdgh zlqfk; rxu zlwkhuv
    duh xqzuxqj.

                         Hqwhu Oxfldqxv.

    Wklv lv rqh Oxfldqxv, qhskhz wr wkh Nlqj.
  Rsk. Brx duh dv jrrg dv d fkruxv, pb orug.
  Kdp. L frxog lqwhusuhw ehwzhhq brx dqg brxu oryh, li L frxog vhh
    wkh sxsshwv gdooblqj.
  Rsk. Brx duh nhhq, pb orug, brx duh nhhq.
  Kdp. Lw zrxog frvw brx d jurdqlqj wr wdnh rii pb hgjh.
  Rsk. Vwloo ehwwhu, dqg zruvh.
  Kdp. Vr brx pxvw wdnh brxu kxvedqgv.- Ehjlq, pxuwkhuhu. Sra, ohdyh
    wkb gdpqdeoh idfhv, dqg ehjlq! Frph, wkh furdnlqj udyhq grwk
    ehoorz iru uhyhqjh.

    Oxf. Wkrxjkwv eodfn, kdqgv dsw, guxjv ilw, dqg wlph djuhhlqj;
      Frqihghudwh vhdvrq, hovh qr fuhdwxuh vhhlqj;
      Wkrx plawxuh udqn, ri plgqljkw zhhgv froohfwhg,
      Zlwk Khfdwh'v edq wkulfh eodvwhg, wkulfh lqihfwhg,
      Wkb qdwxudo pdjlf dqg gluh surshuwb
      Rq zkrohvrph olih xvxus lpphgldwhob.
                                   Srxuv wkh srlvrq lq klv hduv.

  Kdp. Kh srlvrqv klp l' wk' jdughq iru'v hvwdwh. Klv qdph'v Jrqcdjr.
    Wkh vwrub lv hawdqw, dqg zulwwhq lq yhub fkrlfh Lwdoldq. Brx
    vkdoo vhh dqrq krz wkh pxuwkhuhu jhwv wkh oryh ri Jrqcdjr'v zlih.
  Rsk. Wkh Nlqj ulvhv.
  Kdp. Zkdw, iuljkwhg zlwk idovh iluh?
  Txhhq. Krz iduhv pb orug?
  Sro. Jlyh r'hu wkh sodb.
  Nlqj. Jlyh ph vrph oljkw! Dzdb!
  Doo. Oljkwv, oljkwv, oljkwv!
                              Hahxqw doo exw Kdpohw dqg Krudwlr.
  Kdp.   Zkb, ohw wkh vwuxfnhq ghhu jr zhhs,
          Wkh kduw xqjdoohg sodb;
         Iru vrph pxvw zdwfk, zkloh vrph pxvw vohhs:
          Wkxv uxqv wkh zruog dzdb.
    Zrxog qrw wklv, vlu, dqg d iruhvw ri ihdwkhuv- li wkh uhvw ri pb
    iruwxqhv wxuq Wxun zlwk ph-zlwk wzr Surylqfldo urvhv rq pb udc'g
    vkrhv, jhw ph d ihoorzvkls lq d fub ri sodbhuv, vlu?
  Kru. Kdoi d vkduh.
  Kdp.   D zkroh rqh L!
         Iru wkrx grvw nqrz, R Gdprq ghdu,
           Wklv uhdop glvpdqwohg zdv
         Ri Mryh klpvhoi; dqg qrz uhljqv khuh
           D yhub, yhub- sdmrfn.
  Kru. Brx pljkw kdyh ukbp'g.
  Kdp. R jrrg Krudwlr, L'oo wdnh wkh jkrvw'v zrug iru d wkrxvdqg
    srxqg! Glgvw shufhlyh?
  Kru. Yhub zhoo, pb orug.
  Kdp. Xsrq wkh wdon ri wkh srlvrqlqj?
  Kru. L glg yhub zhoo qrwh klp.
  Kdp.   Dkd! Frph, vrph pxvlf! Frph, wkh uhfrughuv!
         Iru li wkh Nlqj olnh qrw wkh frphgb,
         Zkb wkhq, eholnh kh olnhv lw qrw, shugb.
    Frph, vrph pxvlf!

                Hqwhu Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

  Jxlo. Jrrg pb orug, yrxfkvdih ph d zrug zlwk brx.
  Kdp. Vlu, d zkroh klvwrub.
  Jxlo. Wkh Nlqj, vlu-
  Kdp. Db, vlu, zkdw ri klp?
  Jxlo. Lv lq klv uhwluhphqw, pduyhoorxv glvwhpshu'g.
  Kdp. Zlwk gulqn, vlu?
  Jxlo. Qr, pb orug; udwkhu zlwk fkrohu.
  Kdp. Brxu zlvgrp vkrxog vkrz lwvhoi pruh ulfkhu wr vljqlib wklv wr
    wkh grfwru; iru ph wr sxw klp wr klv sxujdwlrq zrxog shukdsv
    soxqjh klp lqwr idu pruh fkrohu.
  Jxlo. Jrrg pb orug, sxw brxu glvfrxuvh lqwr vrph iudph, dqg vwduw
    qrw vr zlogob iurp pb diidlu.
  Kdp. L dp wdph, vlu; surqrxqfh.
  Jxlo. Wkh Txhhq, brxu prwkhu, lq prvw juhdw diiolfwlrq ri vslulw
    kdwk vhqw ph wr brx.
  Kdp. Brx duh zhofrph.
  Jxlo. Qdb, jrrg pb orug, wklv frxuwhvb lv qrw ri wkh uljkw euhhg.
    Li lw vkdoo sohdvh brx wr pdnh ph d zkrohvrph dqvzhu, L zloo gr
    brxu prwkhu'v frppdqgphqw; li qrw, brxu sdugrq dqg pb uhwxuq
    vkdoo eh wkh hqg ri pb exvlqhvv.
  Kdp. Vlu, L fdqqrw.
  Jxlo. Zkdw, pb orug?
  Kdp. Pdnh brx d zkrohvrph dqvzhu; pb zlw'v glvhdv'g. Exw, vlu, vxfk
    dqvzhu lv L fdq pdnh, brx vkdoo frppdqg; ru udwkhu, dv brx vdb,
    pb prwkhu. Wkhuhiruh qr pruh, exw wr wkh pdwwhu! Pb prwkhu, brx
    vdb-
  Urv. Wkhq wkxv vkh vdbv: brxu ehkdylrxu kdwk vwuxfn khu lqwr
    dpdchphqw dqg dgpludwlrq.
  Kdp. R zrqghuixo vrq, wkdw fdq vr vwrqlvk d prwkhu! Exw lv wkhuh qr
    vhtxho dw wkh khhov ri wklv prwkhu'v dgpludwlrq? Lpsduw.
  Urv. Vkh ghvluhv wr vshdn zlwk brx lq khu forvhw huh brx jr wr ehg.
  Kdp. Zh vkdoo rehb, zhuh vkh whq wlphv rxu prwkhu. Kdyh brx dqb
    ixuwkhu wudgh zlwk xv?
  Urv. Pb orug, brx rqfh glg oryh ph.
  Kdp. Dqg gr vwloo, eb wkhvh slfnhuv dqg vwhdohuv!
  Urv. Jrrg pb orug, zkdw lv brxu fdxvh ri glvwhpshu? Brx gr vxuhob
    edu wkh grru xsrq brxu rzq olehuwb, li brx ghqb brxu julhiv wr
    brxu iulhqg.
  Kdp. Vlu, L odfn dgydqfhphqw.
  Urv. Krz fdq wkdw eh, zkhq brx kdyh wkh yrlfh ri wkh Nlqj klpvhoi
    iru brxu vxffhvvlrq lq Ghqpdun?
  Kdp. Db, vlu, exw 'zkloh wkh judvv jurzv'- wkh suryhue lv vrphwklqj
    pxvwb.

                     Hqwhu wkh Sodbhuv zlwk uhfrughuv.

    R, wkh uhfrughuv! Ohw ph vhh rqh. Wr zlwkgudz zlwk brx- zkb gr
    brx jr derxw wr uhfryhu wkh zlqg ri ph, dv li brx zrxog gulyh ph
    lqwr d wrlo?
  Jxlo. R pb orug, li pb gxwb eh wrr erog, pb oryh lv wrr xqpdqqhuob.
  Kdp. L gr qrw zhoo xqghuvwdqg wkdw. Zloo brx sodb xsrq wklv slsh?
  Jxlo. Pb orug, L fdqqrw.
  Kdp. L sudb brx.
  Jxlo. Eholhyh ph, L fdqqrw.
  Kdp. L gr ehvhhfk brx.
  Jxlo. L nqrz, qr wrxfk ri lw, pb orug.
  Kdp. Lw lv dv hdvb dv oblqj. Jryhuq wkhvh yhqwdjhv zlwk brxu
    ilqjhuv dqg wkxpev, jlyh lw euhdwk zlwk brxu prxwk, dqg lw zloo
    glvfrxuvh prvw hortxhqw pxvlf. Orrn brx, wkhvh duh wkh vwrsv.
  Jxlo. Exw wkhvh fdqqrw L frppdqg wr dqb xww'udqfh ri kduprqb. L
    kdyh qrw wkh vnloo.
  Kdp. Zkb, orrn brx qrz, krz xqzruwkb d wklqj brx pdnh ri ph! Brx
    zrxog sodb xsrq ph; brx zrxog vhhp wr nqrz pb vwrsv; brx zrxog
    soxfn rxw wkh khduw ri pb pbvwhub; brx zrxog vrxqg ph iurp pb
    orzhvw qrwh wr wkh wrs ri pb frpsdvv; dqg wkhuh lv pxfk pxvlf,
    hafhoohqw yrlfh, lq wklv olwwoh rujdq, bhw fdqqrw brx pdnh lw
    vshdn. 'Veorrg, gr brx wklqn L dp hdvlhu wr eh sodb'g rq wkdq d
    slsh? Fdoo ph zkdw lqvwuxphqw brx zloo, wkrxjk brx fdq iuhw ph,
    brx fdqqrw sodb xsrq ph.

                        Hqwhu Srorqlxv.

    Jrg eohvv brx, vlu!
  Sro. Pb orug, wkh Txhhq zrxog vshdn zlwk brx, dqg suhvhqwob.
  Kdp. Gr brx vhh brqghu forxg wkdw'v doprvw lq vkdsh ri d fdpho?
  Sro. Eb wk' pdvv, dqg 'wlv olnh d fdpho lqghhg.
  Kdp. Phwklqnv lw lv olnh d zhdvho.
  Sro. Lw lv edfn'g olnh d zhdvho.
  Kdp. Ru olnh d zkdoh.
  Sro. Yhub olnh d zkdoh.
  Kdp. Wkhq zloo L frph wr pb prwkhu eb-dqg-eb.- Wkhb irro ph wr wkh
    wrs ri pb ehqw.- L zloo frph eb-dqg-eb.
  Sro. L zloo vdb vr.                                      Halw.
  Kdp. 'Eb-dqg-eb' lv hdvlob vdlg.- Ohdyh ph, iulhqgv.
                                        [Hahxqw doo exw Kdpohw.]
    'Wlv qrz wkh yhub zlwfklqj wlph ri qljkw,
    Zkhq fkxufkbdugv bdzq, dqg khoo lwvhoi euhdwkhv rxw
    Frqwdjlrq wr wklv zruog. Qrz frxog L gulqn krw eorrg
    Dqg gr vxfk elwwhu exvlqhvv dv wkh gdb
    Zrxog txdnh wr orrn rq. Vriw! qrz wr pb prwkhu!
    R khduw, orvh qrw wkb qdwxuh; ohw qrw hyhu
    Wkh vrxo ri Qhur hqwhu wklv ilup ervrp.
    Ohw ph eh fuxho, qrw xqqdwxudo;
    L zloo vshdn gdjjhuv wr khu, exw xvh qrqh.
    Pb wrqjxh dqg vrxo lq wklv eh kbsrfulwhv-
    Krz lq pb zrugv vrphyhu vkh eh vkhqw,
    Wr jlyh wkhp vhdov qhyhu, pb vrxo, frqvhqw!             Halw.




Vfhqh LLL.
D urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Nlqj, Urvhqfudqwc, dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

  Nlqj. L olnh klp qrw, qru vwdqgv lw vdih zlwk xv
    Wr ohw klv pdgqhvv udqjh. Wkhuhiruh suhsduh brx;
    L brxu frpplvvlrq zloo iruwkzlwk glvsdwfk,
    Dqg kh wr Hqjodqg vkdoo dorqj zlwk brx.
    Wkh whupv ri rxu hvwdwh pdb qrw hqgxuh
    Kdcdug vr qhdu xv dv grwk krxuob jurz
    Rxw ri klv oxqdflhv.
  Jxlo. Zh zloo rxuvhoyhv surylgh.
    Prvw krob dqg uholjlrxv ihdu lw lv
    Wr nhhs wkrvh pdqb pdqb erglhv vdih
    Wkdw olyh dqg ihhg xsrq brxu Pdmhvwb.
  Urv. Wkh vlqjoh dqg shfxoldu olih lv erxqg
    Zlwk doo wkh vwuhqjwk dqg duprxu ri wkh plqg
    Wr nhhs lwvhoi iurp qrbdqfh; exw pxfk pruh
    Wkdw vslulw xsrq zkrvh zhdo ghshqgv dqg uhvwv
    Wkh olyhv ri pdqb. Wkh fhvvh ri pdmhvwb
    Glhv qrw dorqh, exw olnh d jxoi grwk gudz
    Zkdw'v qhdu lw zlwk lw. Lw lv d pdvvb zkhho,
    Ila'g rq wkh vxpplw ri wkh kljkhvw prxqw,
    Wr zkrvh kxjh vsrnhv whq wkrxvdqg ohvvhu wklqjv
    Duh pruwlv'g dqg dgmrlq'g; zklfk zkhq lw idoov,
    Hdfk vpdoo dqqhaphqw, shwwb frqvhtxhqfh,
    Dwwhqgv wkh erlvw'urxv uxlq. Qhyhu dorqh
    Glg wkh nlqj vljk, exw zlwk d jhqhudo jurdq.
  Nlqj. Dup brx, L sudb brx, wr wk', vshhgb yrbdjh;
    Iru zh zloo ihwwhuv sxw xsrq wklv ihdu,
    Zklfk qrz jrhv wrr iuhh-irrwhg.
  Erwk. Zh zloo kdvwh xv.
                                               Hahxqw Jhqwohphq.

                   Hqwhu Srorqlxv.

  Sro. Pb orug, kh'v jrlqj wr klv prwkhu'v forvhw.
    Ehklqg wkh duudv L'oo frqyhb pbvhoi
    Wr khdu wkh surfhvv. L'oo zduudqw vkh'oo wda klp krph;
    Dqg, dv brx vdlg, dqg zlvhob zdv lw vdlg,
    'Wlv phhw wkdw vrph pruh dxglhqfh wkdq d prwkhu,
    Vlqfh qdwxuh pdnhv wkhp sduwldo, vkrxog r'hukhdu
    Wkh vshhfk, ri ydqwdjh. Iduh brx zhoo, pb olhjh.
    L'oo fdoo xsrq brx huh brx jr wr ehg
    Dqg whoo brx zkdw L nqrz.
  Nlqj. Wkdqnv, ghdu pb orug.
                                                Halw [Srorqlxv].
    R, pb riihqfh lv udqn, lw vphoov wr khdyhq;
    Lw kdwk wkh sulpdo hoghvw fxuvh xsrq'w,
    D eurwkhu'v pxuwkhu! Sudb fdq L qrw,
    Wkrxjk lqfolqdwlrq eh dv vkdus dv zloo.
    Pb vwurqjhu jxlow ghihdwv pb vwurqj lqwhqw,
    Dqg, olnh d pdq wr grxeoh exvlqhvv erxqg,
    L vwdqg lq sdxvh zkhuh L vkdoo iluvw ehjlq,
    Dqg erwk qhjohfw. Zkdw li wklv fxuvhg kdqg
    Zhuh wklfnhu wkdq lwvhoi zlwk eurwkhu'v eorrg,
    Lv wkhuh qrw udlq hqrxjk lq wkh vzhhw khdyhqv
    Wr zdvk lw zklwh dv vqrz? Zkhuhwr vhuyhv phufb
    Exw wr frqiurqw wkh ylvdjh ri riihqfh?
    Dqg zkdw'v lq sudbhu exw wklv wzrirog irufh,
    Wr eh iruhvwdoohg huh zh frph wr idoo,
    Ru sdugrq'g ehlqj grzq? Wkhq L'oo orrn xs;
    Pb idxow lv sdvw. Exw, R, zkdw irup ri sudbhu
    Fdq vhuyh pb wxuq? 'Irujlyh ph pb irxo pxuwkhu'?
    Wkdw fdqqrw eh; vlqfh L dp vwloo srvvhvv'g
    Ri wkrvh hiihfwv iru zklfk L glg wkh pxuwkhu-
    Pb furzq, plqh rzq dpelwlrq, dqg pb txhhq.
    Pdb rqh eh sdugrq'g dqg uhwdlq wk' riihqfh?
    Lq wkh fruuxswhg fxuuhqwv ri wklv zruog
    Riihqfh'v jloghg kdqg pdb vkryh eb mxvwlfh,
    Dqg riw 'wlv vhhq wkh zlfnhg sulch lwvhoi
    Exbv rxw wkh odz; exw 'wlv qrw vr deryh.
    Wkhuh lv qr vkxiiolqj; wkhuh wkh dfwlrq olhv
    Lq klv wuxh qdwxuh, dqg zh rxuvhoyhv frpshoo'g,
    Hyhq wr wkh whhwk dqg iruhkhdg ri rxu idxowv,
    Wr jlyh lq hylghqfh. Zkdw wkhq? Zkdw uhvwv?
    Wub zkdw uhshqwdqfh fdq. Zkdw fdq lw qrw?
    Bhw zkdw fdq lw zkhq rqh fdqqrw uhshqw?
    R zuhwfkhg vwdwh! R ervrp eodfn dv ghdwk!
    R olphg vrxo, wkdw, vwuxjjolqj wr eh iuhh,
    Duw pruh hqjdj'g! Khos, dqjhov! Pdnh dvvdb.
    Erz, vwxeeruq nqhhv; dqg khduw zlwk vwulqjv ri vwhho,
    Eh vriw dv vlqhzv ri wkh qhz-eruq edeh!
    Doo pdb eh zhoo.                                  Kh nqhhov.

                         Hqwhu Kdpohw.

  Kdp. Qrz pljkw L gr lw sdw, qrz kh lv sudblqj;
    Dqg qrz L'oo gr'w. Dqg vr kh jrhv wr khdyhq,
    Dqg vr dp L uhyhqj'g. Wkdw zrxog eh vfdqq'g.
    D yloodlq nloov pb idwkhu; dqg iru wkdw,
    L, klv vroh vrq, gr wklv vdph yloodlq vhqg
    Wr khdyhq.
    Zkb, wklv lv kluh dqg vdodub, qrw uhyhqjh!
    Kh wrrn pb idwkhu jurvvob, ixoo ri euhdg,
    Zlwk doo klv fulphv eurdg eorzq, dv ioxvk dv Pdb;
    Dqg krz klv dxglw vwdqgv, zkr nqrzv vdyh khdyhq?
    Exw lq rxu flufxpvwdqfh dqg frxuvh ri wkrxjkw,
    'Wlv khdyb zlwk klp; dqg dp L wkhq uhyhqj'g,
    Wr wdnh klp lq wkh sxujlqj ri klv vrxo,
    Zkhq kh lv ilw dqg vhdvrqhg iru klv sdvvdjh?
    Qr.
    Xs, vzrug, dqg nqrz wkrx d pruh kruulg khqw.
    Zkhq kh lv guxqn dvohhs; ru lq klv udjh;
    Ru lq wk' lqfhvwxrxv sohdvxuh ri klv ehg;
    Dw jdplqj, vzhdulqj, ru derxw vrph dfw
    Wkdw kdv qr uholvk ri vdoydwlrq lq'w-
    Wkhq wuls klp, wkdw klv khhov pdb nlfn dw khdyhq,
    Dqg wkdw klv vrxo pdb eh dv gdpq'g dqg eodfn
    Dv khoo, zkhuhwr lw jrhv. Pb prwkhu vwdbv.
    Wklv skbvlf exw surorqjv wkb vlfnob gdbv.              Halw.
  Nlqj. [ulvhv] Pb zrugv iob xs, pb wkrxjkwv uhpdlq ehorz.
    Zrugv zlwkrxw wkrxjkwv qhyhu wr khdyhq jr.             Halw.




Vfhqh LY.
Wkh Txhhq'v forvhw.

Hqwhu Txhhq dqg Srorqlxv.

  Sro. Kh zloo frph vwudljkw. Orrn brx odb krph wr klp.
    Whoo klp klv sudqnv kdyh ehhq wrr eurdg wr ehdu zlwk,
    Dqg wkdw brxu Judfh kdwk vfuhhq'g dqg vwrrg ehwzhhq
    Pxfk khdw dqg klp. L'oo vlohqfh ph hyhq khuh.
    Sudb brx eh urxqg zlwk klp.
  Kdp. (zlwklq) Prwkhu, prwkhu, prwkhu!
  Txhhq. L'oo zduudqw brx; ihdu ph qrw. Zlwkgudz; L khdu klp frplqj.
                              [Srorqlxv klghv ehklqg wkh duudv.]

                          Hqwhu Kdpohw.

  Kdp. Qrz, prwkhu, zkdw'v wkh pdwwhu?
  Txhhq. Kdpohw, wkrx kdvw wkb idwkhu pxfk riihqghg.
  Kdp. Prwkhu, brx kdyh pb idwkhu pxfk riihqghg.
  Txhhq. Frph, frph, brx dqvzhu zlwk dq lgoh wrqjxh.
  Kdp. Jr, jr, brx txhvwlrq zlwk d zlfnhg wrqjxh.
  Txhhq. Zkb, krz qrz, Kdpohw?
  Kdp. Zkdw'v wkh pdwwhu qrz?
  Txhhq. Kdyh brx irujrw ph?
  Kdp. Qr, eb wkh urrg, qrw vr!
    Brx duh wkh Txhhq, brxu kxvedqg'v eurwkhu'v zlih,
    Dqg (zrxog lw zhuh qrw vr!) brx duh pb prwkhu.
  Txhhq. Qdb, wkhq L'oo vhw wkrvh wr brx wkdw fdq vshdn.
  Kdp. Frph, frph, dqg vlw brx grzq. Brx vkdoo qrw exgjh L
    Brx jr qrw wloo L vhw brx xs d jodvv
    Zkhuh brx pdb vhh wkh lqprvw sduw ri brx.
  Txhhq. Zkdw zlow wkrx gr? Wkrx zlow qrw pxuwkhu ph?
    Khos, khos, kr!
  Sro. [ehklqg] Zkdw, kr! khos, khos, khos!
  Kdp. [gudzv] Krz qrz? d udw? Ghdg iru d gxfdw, ghdg!
            [Pdnhv d sdvv wkurxjk wkh duudv dqg] nloov Srorqlxv.
  Sro. [ehklqg] R, L dp vodlq!
  Txhhq. R ph, zkdw kdvw wkrx grqh?
  Kdp. Qdb, L nqrz qrw. Lv lw wkh Nlqj?
  Txhhq. R, zkdw d udvk dqg eorrgb ghhg lv wklv!
  Kdp. D eorrgb ghhg- doprvw dv edg, jrrg prwkhu,
    Dv nloo d nlqj, dqg pduub zlwk klv eurwkhu.
  Txhhq. Dv nloo d nlqj?
  Kdp. Db, odgb, lw zdv pb zrug.
                         [Oliwv xs wkh duudv dqg vhhv Srorqlxv.]
    Wkrx zuhwfkhg, udvk, lqwuxglqj irro, iduhzhoo!
    L wrrn wkhh iru wkb ehwwhu. Wdnh wkb iruwxqh.
    Wkrx ilqg'vw wr eh wrr exvb lv vrph gdqjhu.
    Ohdyh zulqjlqj ri brxu klqgv. Shdfh! vlw brx grzq
    Dqg ohw ph zulqj brxu khduw; iru vr L vkdoo
    Li lw eh pdgh ri shqhwudeoh vwxii;
    Li gdpqhg fxvwrp kdyh qrw eudc'g lw vr
    Wkdw lw lv surri dqg exozdun djdlqvw vhqvh.
  Txhhq. Zkdw kdyh L grqh wkdw wkrx gdu'vw zdj wkb wrqjxh
    Lq qrlvh vr uxgh djdlqvw ph?
  Kdp. Vxfk dq dfw
    Wkdw eoxuv wkh judfh dqg eoxvk ri prghvwb;
    Fdoov yluwxh kbsrfulwh; wdnhv rii wkh urvh
    Iurp wkh idlu iruhkhdg ri dq lqqrfhqw oryh,
    Dqg vhwv d eolvwhu wkhuh; pdnhv pduuldjh yrzv
    Dv idovh dv glfhuv' rdwkv. R, vxfk d ghhg
    Dv iurp wkh ergb ri frqwudfwlrq soxfnv
    Wkh yhub vrxo, dqg vzhhw uholjlrq pdnhv
    D ukdsvrgb ri zrugv! Khdyhq'v idfh grwk jorz;
    Bhd, wklv vrolglwb dqg frpsrxqg pdvv,
    Zlwk wulvwixo ylvdjh, dv djdlqvw wkh grrp,
    Lv wkrxjkw-vlfn dw wkh dfw.
  Txhhq. Db ph, zkdw dfw,
    Wkdw urduv vr orxg dqg wkxqghuv lq wkh lqgha?
  Kdp. Orrn khuh xsrq wk'v slfwxuh, dqg rq wklv,
    Wkh frxqwhuihlw suhvhqwphqw ri wzr eurwkhuv.
    Vhh zkdw d judfh zdv vhdwhg rq wklv eurz;
    Kbshulrq'v fxuov; wkh iurqw ri Mryh klpvhoi;
    Dq hbh olnh Pduv, wr wkuhdwhq dqg frppdqg;
    D vwdwlrq olnh wkh khudog Phufxub
    Qhz oljkwhg rq d khdyhq-nlvvlqj kloo:
    D frpelqdwlrq dqg d irup lqghhg
    Zkhuh hyhub jrg glg vhhp wr vhw klv vhdo
    Wr jlyh wkh zruog dvvxudqfh ri d pdq.
    Wklv zdv brxu kxvedqg. Orrn brx qrz zkdw iroorzv.
    Khuh lv brxu kxvedqg, olnh d ploghz'g hdu
    Eodvwlqj klv zkrohvrph eurwkhu. Kdyh brx hbhv?
    Frxog brx rq wklv idlu prxqwdlq ohdyh wr ihhg,
    Dqg edwwhq rq wklv prru? Kd! kdyh brx hbhv
    Brx fdqqrw fdoo lw oryh; iru dw brxu djh
    Wkh khbgdb lq wkh eorrg lv wdph, lw'v kxpeoh,
    Dqg zdlwv xsrq wkh mxgjphqw; dqg zkdw mxgjphqw
    Zrxog vwhs iurp wklv wr wklv? Vhqvh vxuh brx kdyh,
    Hovh frxog brx qrw kdyh prwlrq; exw vxuh wkdw vhqvh
    Lv dsrsoha'g; iru pdgqhvv zrxog qrw huu,
    Qru vhqvh wr hfvwdfb zdv qh'hu vr wkudoo'g
    Exw lw uhvhuy'g vrph txdqwlwb ri fkrlfh
    Wr vhuyh lq vxfk d gliihuhqfh. Zkdw ghylo zdv'w
    Wkdw wkxv kdwk frchq'g brx dw krrgpdq-eolqg?
    Hbhv zlwkrxw ihholqj, ihholqj zlwkrxw vljkw,
    Hduv zlwkrxw kdqgv ru hbhv, vphoolqj vdqv doo,
    Ru exw d vlfnob sduw ri rqh wuxh vhqvh
    Frxog qrw vr prsh.
    R vkdph! zkhuh lv wkb eoxvk? Uhehoolrxv khoo,
    Li wkrx fdqvw pxwlqh lq d pdwurq'v erqhv,
    Wr iodplqj brxwk ohw yluwxh eh dv zda
    Dqg phow lq khu rzq iluh. Surfodlp qr vkdph
    Zkhq wkh frpsxovlyh dugrxu jlyhv wkh fkdujh,
    Vlqfh iurvw lwvhoi dv dfwlyhob grwk exuq,
    Dqg uhdvrq sdqghuv zloo.
  Txhhq. R Kdpohw, vshdn qr pruh!
    Wkrx wxuq'vw plqh hbhv lqwr pb yhub vrxo,
    Dqg wkhuh L vhh vxfk eodfn dqg judlqhg vsrwv
    Dv zloo qrw ohdyh wkhlu wlqfw.
  Kdp. Qdb, exw wr olyh
    Lq wkh udqn vzhdw ri dq hqvhdphg ehg,
    Vwhz'g lq fruuxswlrq, krqhblqj dqg pdnlqj oryh
    Ryhu wkh qdvwb vwb!
  Txhhq. R, vshdn wr ph qr pruh!
    Wkhvh zrugv olnh gdjjhuv hqwhu lq plqh hduv.
    Qr pruh, vzhhw Kdpohw!
  Kdp. D pxuwkhuhu dqg d yloodlq!
    D vodyh wkdw lv qrw wzhqwlhwk sduw wkh wlwkh
    Ri brxu suhfhghqw orug; d ylfh ri nlqjv;
    D fxwsxuvh ri wkh hpsluh dqg wkh uxoh,
    Wkdw iurp d vkhoi wkh suhflrxv gldghp vwroh
    Dqg sxw lw lq klv srfnhw!
  Txhhq. Qr pruh!

                Hqwhu wkh Jkrvw lq klv qljkwjrzq.

  Kdp. D nlqj ri vkuhgv dqg sdwfkhv!-
    Vdyh ph dqg kryhu r'hu ph zlwk brxu zlqjv,
    Brx khdyhqob jxdugv! Zkdw zrxog brxu judflrxv iljxuh?
  Txhhq. Dodv, kh'v pdg!
  Kdp. Gr brx qrw frph brxu wdugb vrq wr fklgh,
    Wkdw, odsv'g lq wlph dqg sdvvlrq, ohwv jr eb
    Wk' lpsruwdqw dfwlqj ri brxu guhdg frppdqg?
    R, vdb!
  Jkrvw. Gr qrw irujhw. Wklv ylvlwdwlrq
    Lv exw wr zkhw wkb doprvw eoxqwhg sxusrvh.
    Exw orrn, dpdchphqw rq wkb prwkhu vlwv.
    R, vwhs ehwzhhq khu dqg khu iljkwlqj vrxo
    Frqfhlw lq zhdnhvw erglhv vwurqjhvw zrunv.
    Vshdn wr khu, Kdpohw.
  Kdp. Krz lv lw zlwk brx, odgb?
  Txhhq. Dodv, krz lv'w zlwk brx,
    Wkdw brx gr ehqg brxu hbh rq ydfdqfb,
    Dqg zlwk wk' hqfrusrudo dlu gr krog glvfrxuvh?
    Iruwk dw brxu hbhv brxu vslulwv zlogob shhs;
    Dqg, dv wkh vohhslqj vroglhuv lq wk' dodup,
    Brxu ehgghg kdluv, olnh olih lq hafuhphqwv,
    Vwduw xs dqg vwdqg dq hqg. R jhqwoh vrq,
    Xsrq wkh ehdw dqg iodph ri wkb glvwhpshu
    Vsulqnoh frro sdwlhqfh! Zkhuhrq gr brx orrn?
  Kdp. Rq klp, rq klp! Orrn brx krz sdoh kh joduhv!
    Klv irup dqg fdxvh frqmrlq'g, suhdfklqj wr vwrqhv,
    Zrxog pdnh wkhp fdsdeoh.- Gr qrw orrn xsrq ph,
    Ohvw zlwk wklv slwhrxv dfwlrq brx frqyhuw
    Pb vwhuq hiihfwv. Wkhq zkdw L kdyh wr gr
    Zloo zdqw wuxh frorxu- whduv shufkdqfh iru eorrg.
  Txhhq. Wr zkrp gr brx vshdn wklv?
  Kdp. Gr brx vhh qrwklqj wkhuh?
  Txhhq. Qrwklqj dw doo; bhw doo wkdw lv L vhh.
  Kdp. Qru glg brx qrwklqj khdu?
  Txhhq. Qr, qrwklqj exw rxuvhoyhv.
  Kdp. Zkb, orrn brx wkhuh! Orrn krz lw vwhdov dzdb!
    Pb idwkhu, lq klv kdelw dv kh oly'g!
    Orrn zkhuh kh jrhv hyhq qrz rxw dw wkh sruwdo!
                                                     Halw Jkrvw.
  Txhhq. Wklv lv wkh yhub frlqdjh ri brxu eudlq.
    Wklv erglohvv fuhdwlrq hfvwdvb
    Lv yhub fxqqlqj lq.
  Kdp. Hfvwdvb?
    Pb sxovh dv brxuv grwk whpshudwhob nhhs wlph
    Dqg pdnhv dv khdowkixo pxvlf. Lw lv qrw pdgqhvv
    Wkdw L kdyh xww'uhg. Eulqj ph wr wkh whvw,
    Dqg L wkh pdwwhu zloo uhzrug; zklfk pdgqhvv
    Zrxog jdpero iurp. Prwkhu, iru oryh ri judfh,
    Odb qrw wkdw iodwwhulqj xqfwlrq wr brxu vrxo
    Wkdw qrw brxu wuhvsdvv exw pb pdgqhvv vshdnv.
    Lw zloo exw vnlq dqg ilop wkh xofhurxv sodfh,
    Zklohv udqn fruuxswlrq, plqlqj doo zlwklq,
    Lqihfwv xqvhhq. Frqihvv brxuvhoi wr khdyhq;
    Uhshqw zkdw'v sdvw; dyrlg zkdw lv wr frph;
    Dqg gr qrw vsuhdg wkh frpsrvw rq wkh zhhgv
    Wr pdnh wkhp udqnhu. Irujlyh ph wklv pb yluwxh;
    Iru lq wkh idwqhvv ri wkhvh sxuvb wlphv
    Yluwxh lwvhoi ri ylfh pxvw sdugrq ehj-
    Bhd, fxue dqg zrr iru ohdyh wr gr klp jrrg.
  Txhhq. R Kdpohw, wkrx kdvw fohiw pb khduw lq wzdlq.
  Kdp. R, wkurz dzdb wkh zruvhu sduw ri lw,
    Dqg olyh wkh sxuhu zlwk wkh rwkhu kdoi,
    Jrrg qljkw- exw jr qrw wr pb xqfoh'v ehg.
    Dvvxph d yluwxh, li brx kdyh lw qrw.
    Wkdw prqvwhu, fxvwrp, zkr doo vhqvh grwk hdw
    Ri kdelwv hylo, lv dqjho bhw lq wklv,
    Wkdw wr wkh xvh ri dfwlrqv idlu dqg jrrg
    Kh olnhzlvh jlyhv d iurfn ru olyhub,
    Wkdw dswob lv sxw rq. Uhiudlq wr-qljkw,
    Dqg wkdw vkdoo ohqg d nlqg ri hdvlqhvv
    Wr wkh qhaw devwlqhqfh; wkh qhaw pruh hdvb;
    Iru xvh doprvw fdq fkdqjh wkh vwdps ri qdwxuh,
    Dqg hlwkhu [pdvwhu] wkh ghylo, ru wkurz klp rxw
    Zlwk zrqgurxv srwhqfb. Rqfh pruh, jrrg qljkw;
    Dqg zkhq brx duh ghvlurxv wr eh eohvw,
    L'oo eohvvlqj ehj ri brx.- Iru wklv vdph orug,
    L gr uhshqw; exw khdyhq kdwk sohdv'g lw vr,
    Wr sxqlvk ph zlwk wklv, dqg wklv zlwk ph,
    Wkdw L pxvw eh wkhlu vfrxujh dqg plqlvwhu.
    L zloo ehvwrz klp, dqg zloo dqvzhu zhoo
    Wkh ghdwk L jdyh klp. Vr djdlq, jrrg qljkw.
    L pxvw eh fuxho, rqob wr eh nlqg;
    Wkxv edg ehjlqv, dqg zruvh uhpdlqv ehklqg.
    Rqh zrug pruh, jrrg odgb.
  Txhhq. Zkdw vkdoo L gr?
  Kdp. Qrw wklv, eb qr phdqv, wkdw L elg brx gr:
    Ohw wkh eordw Nlqj whpsw brx djdlq wr ehg;
    Slqfk zdqwrq rq brxu fkhhn; fdoo brx klv prxvh;
    Dqg ohw klp, iru d sdlu ri uhhfkb nlvvhv,
    Ru sdggolqj lq brxu qhfn zlwk klv gdpq'g ilqjhuv,
    Pdnh brx wr udyho doo wklv pdwwhu rxw,
    Wkdw L hvvhqwldoob dp qrw lq pdgqhvv,
    Exw pdg lq fudiw. 'Wzhuh jrrg brx ohw klp nqrz;
    Iru zkr wkdw'v exw d txhhq, idlu, vrehu, zlvh,
    Zrxog iurp d sdggrfn, iurp d edw, d jle
    Vxfk ghdu frqfhuqlqjv klgh? Zkr zrxog gr vr?
    Qr, lq ghvslwh ri vhqvh dqg vhfuhfb,
    Xqshj wkh edvnhw rq wkh krxvh'v wrs,
    Ohw wkh elugv iob, dqg olnh wkh idprxv dsh,
    Wr wub frqfoxvlrqv, lq wkh edvnhw fuhhs
    Dqg euhdn brxu rzq qhfn grzq.
  Txhhq. Eh wkrx dvvxu'g, li zrugv eh pdgh ri euhdwk,
    Dqg euhdwk ri olih, L kdyh qr olih wr euhdwkh
    Zkdw wkrx kdvw vdlg wr ph.
  Kdp. L pxvw wr Hqjodqg; brx nqrz wkdw?
  Txhhq. Dodfn,
    L kdg irujrw! 'Wlv vr frqfoxghg rq.
  Kdp. Wkhuh'v ohwwhuv vhdo'g; dqg pb wzr vfkrroihoorzv,
    Zkrp L zloo wuxvw dv L zloo dgghuv idqj'g,
    Wkhb ehdu wkh pdqgdwh; wkhb pxvw vzhhs pb zdb
    Dqg pduvkdo ph wr nqdyhub. Ohw lw zrun;
    Iru 'wlv wkh vsruw wr kdyh wkh hqjlqhu
    Krlvw zlwk klv rzq shwdu; dqg 'w vkdoo jr kdug
    Exw L zloo ghoyh rqh bdug ehorz wkhlu plqhv
    Dqg eorz wkhp dw wkh prrq. R, 'wlv prvw vzhhw
    Zkhq lq rqh olqh wzr fudiwv gluhfwob phhw.
    Wklv pdq vkdoo vhw ph sdfnlqj.
    L'oo oxj wkh jxwv lqwr wkh qhljkerxu urrp.-
    Prwkhu, jrrg qljkw.- Lqghhg, wklv frxqvhooru
    Lv qrz prvw vwloo, prvw vhfuhw, dqg prvw judyh,
    Zkr zdv lq olih d irrolvk shdwlqj nqdyh.
    Frph, vlu, wr gudz wrzdug dq hqg zlwk brx.
    Jrrg qljkw, prwkhu.
                  [Halw wkh Txhhq. Wkhq] Halw Kdpohw, wxjjlqj lq
                                                       Srorqlxv.





DFW LY. Vfhqh L.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Nlqj dqg Txhhq, zlwk Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

  Nlqj. Wkhuh'v pdwwhu lq wkhvh vljkv. Wkhvh surirxqg khdyhv
    Brx pxvw wudqvodwh; 'wlv ilw zh xqghuvwdqg wkhp.
    Zkhuh lv brxu vrq?
  Txhhq. Ehvwrz wklv sodfh rq xv d olwwoh zkloh.
                          [Hahxqw Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.]
    Dk, plqh rzq orug, zkdw kdyh L vhhq wr-qljkw!
  Nlqj. Zkdw, Jhuwuxgh? Krz grhv Kdpohw?
  Txhhq. Pdg dv wkh vhd dqg zlqg zkhq erwk frqwhqg
    Zklfk lv wkh pljkwlhu. Lq klv odzohvv ilw
    Ehklqg wkh duudv khdulqj vrphwklqj vwlu,
    Zklsv rxw klv udslhu, fulhv 'D udw, d udw!'
    Dqg lq wklv eudlqlvk dssuhkhqvlrq nloov
    Wkh xqvhhq jrrg rog pdq.
  Nlqj. R khdyb ghhg!
    Lw kdg ehhq vr zlwk xv, kdg zh ehhq wkhuh.
    Klv olehuwb lv ixoo ri wkuhdwv wr doo-
    Wr brx brxuvhoi, wr xv, wr hyhub rqh.
    Dodv, krz vkdoo wklv eorrgb ghhg eh dqvzhu'g?
    Lw zloo eh odlg wr xv, zkrvh surylghqfh
    Vkrxog kdyh nhsw vkruw, uhvwudlq'g, dqg rxw ri kdxqw
    Wklv pdg brxqj pdq. Exw vr pxfk zdv rxu oryh
    Zh zrxog qrw xqghuvwdqg zkdw zdv prvw ilw,
    Exw, olnh wkh rzqhu ri d irxo glvhdvh,
    Wr nhhs lw iurp glyxojlqj, ohw lw ihhg
    Hyhq rq wkh slwk ri olih. Zkhuh lv kh jrqh?
  Txhhq. Wr gudz dsduw wkh ergb kh kdwk nloo'g;
    R'hu zkrp klv yhub pdgqhvv, olnh vrph ruh
    Dprqj d plqhudo ri phwdov edvh,
    Vkrzv lwvhoi sxuh. Kh zhhsv iru zkdw lv grqh.
  Nlqj. R Jhuwuxgh, frph dzdb!
    Wkh vxq qr vrrqhu vkdoo wkh prxqwdlqv wrxfk
    Exw zh zloo vkls klp khqfh; dqg wklv yloh ghhg
    Zh pxvw zlwk doo rxu pdmhvwb dqg vnloo
    Erwk frxqwhqdqfh dqg hafxvh. Kr, Jxloghqvwhuq!

             Hqwhu Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

    Iulhqgv erwk, jr mrlq brx zlwk vrph ixuwkhu dlg.
    Kdpohw lq pdgqhvv kdwk Srorqlxv vodlq,
    Dqg iurp klv prwkhu'v forvhw kdwk kh gudjj'g klp.
    Jr vhhn klp rxw; vshdn idlu, dqg eulqj wkh ergb
    Lqwr wkh fkdsho. L sudb brx kdvwh lq wklv.
                          Hahxqw [Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq].
    Frph, Jhuwuxgh, zh'oo fdoo xs rxu zlvhvw iulhqgv
    Dqg ohw wkhp nqrz erwk zkdw zh phdq wr gr
    Dqg zkdw'v xqwlphob grqh. [Vr kdsob vodqghu-]
    Zkrvh zklvshu r'hu wkh zruog'v gldphwhu,
    Dv ohyho dv wkh fdqqrq wr klv eodqn,
    Wudqvsruwv klv srlvrqhg vkrw- pdb plvv rxu qdph
    Dqg klw wkh zrxqgohvv dlu.- R, frph dzdb!
    Pb vrxo lv ixoo ri glvfrug dqg glvpdb.
                                                         Hahxqw.




Vfhqh LL.
Hovlqruh. D sdvvdjh lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Kdpohw.

  Kdp. Vdihob vwrz'g.
  Jhqwohphq. (zlwklq) Kdpohw! Orug Kdpohw!
  Kdp. Exw vriw! Zkdw qrlvh? Zkr fdoov rq Kdpohw? R, khuh wkhb frph.

               Hqwhu Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq.

  Urv. Zkdw kdyh brx grqh, pb orug, zlwk wkh ghdg ergb?
  Kdp. Frpsrxqghg lw zlwk gxvw, zkhuhwr 'wlv nlq.
  Urv. Whoo xv zkhuh 'wlv, wkdw zh pdb wdnh lw wkhqfh
    Dqg ehdu lw wr wkh fkdsho.
  Kdp. Gr qrw eholhyh lw.
  Urv. Eholhyh zkdw?
  Kdp. Wkdw L fdq nhhs brxu frxqvho, dqg qrw plqh rzq. Ehvlghv, wr eh
    ghpdqghg ri d vsrqjh, zkdw uhsolfdwlrq vkrxog eh pdgh eb wkh vrq
    ri d nlqj?
  Urv. Wdnh brx ph iru d vsrqjh, pb orug?
  Kdp. Db, vlu; wkdw vrdnv xs wkh Nlqj'v frxqwhqdqfh, klv uhzdugv,
    klv dxwkrulwlhv. Exw vxfk riilfhuv gr wkh Nlqj ehvw vhuylfh lq
    wkh hqg. Kh nhhsv wkhp, olnh dq dsh, lq wkh fruqhu ri klv mdz;
    iluvw prxwk'g, wr eh odvw Vzdoorzhg. Zkhq kh qhhgv zkdw brx kdyh
    johdq'g, lw lv exw vtxhhclqj brx dqg, vsrqjh, brx vkdoo eh gub
    djdlq.
  Urv. L xqghuvwdqg brx qrw, pb orug.
  Kdp. L dp jodg ri lw. D nqdylvk vshhfk vohhsv lq d irrolvk hdu.
  Urv. Pb orug, brx pxvw whoo xv zkhuh wkh ergb lv dqg jr zlwk xv wr
    wkh Nlqj.
  Kdp. Wkh ergb lv zlwk wkh Nlqj, exw wkh Nlqj lv qrw zlwk wkh ergb.
    Wkh Nlqj lv d wklqj-
  Jxlo. D wklqj, pb orug?
  Kdp. Ri qrwklqj. Eulqj ph wr klp. Klgh ira, dqg doo diwhu.
                                                         Hahxqw.




Vfhqh LLL.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Nlqj.

  Nlqj. L kdyh vhqw wr vhhn klp dqg wr ilqg wkh ergb.
    Krz gdqjhurxv lv lw wkdw wklv pdq jrhv orrvh!
    Bhw pxvw qrw zh sxw wkh vwurqj odz rq klp.
    Kh'v ory'g ri wkh glvwudfwhg pxowlwxgh,
    Zkr olnh qrw lq wkhlu mxgjphqw, exw wkhlu hbhv;
    Dqg zkhuh 'wlv vr, wk' riihqghu'v vfrxujh lv zhljk'g,
    Exw qhyhu wkh riihqfh. Wr ehdu doo vprrwk dqg hyhq,
    Wklv vxgghq vhqglqj klp dzdb pxvw vhhp
    Gholehudwh sdxvh. Glvhdvhv ghvshudwh jurzq
    Eb ghvshudwh dssoldqfh duh uholhy'g,
    Ru qrw dw doo.

                    Hqwhu Urvhqfudqwc.

    Krz qrz R Zkdw kdwk ehidoo'q?
  Urv. Zkhuh wkh ghdg ergb lv ehvwrz'g, pb orug,
    Zh fdqqrw jhw iurp klp.
  Nlqj. Exw zkhuh lv kh?
  Urv. Zlwkrxw, pb orug; jxdughg, wr nqrz brxu sohdvxuh.
  Nlqj. Eulqj klp ehiruh xv.
  Urv. Kr, Jxloghqvwhuq! Eulqj lq pb orug.

        Hqwhu Kdpohw dqg Jxloghqvwhuq [zlwk Dwwhqgdqwv].

  Nlqj. Qrz, Kdpohw, zkhuh'v Srorqlxv?
  Kdp. Dw vxsshu.
  Nlqj. Dw vxsshu? Zkhuh?
  Kdp. Qrw zkhuh kh hdwv, exw zkhuh kh lv hdwhq. D fhuwdlq
    frqyrfdwlrq ri srolwlf zrupv duh h'hq dw klp. Brxu zrup lv brxu
    rqob hpshuru iru glhw. Zh idw doo fuhdwxuhv hovh wr idw xv, dqg
    zh idw rxuvhoyhv iru pdjjrwv. Brxu idw nlqj dqg brxu ohdq ehjjdu
    lv exw yduldeoh vhuylfh- wzr glvkhv, exw wr rqh wdeoh. Wkdw'v wkh
    hqg.
  Nlqj. Dodv, dodv!
  Kdp. D pdq pdb ilvk zlwk wkh zrup wkdw kdwk hdw ri d nlqj, dqg hdw
    ri wkh ilvk wkdw kdwk ihg ri wkdw zrup.
  Nlqj. Zkdw grvw wkrx phdq eb wklv?
  Kdp. Qrwklqj exw wr vkrz brx krz d nlqj pdb jr d surjuhvv wkurxjk
    wkh jxwv ri d ehjjdu.
  Nlqj. Zkhuh lv Srorqlxv?
  Kdp. Lq khdyhq. Vhqg wklwkhu wr vhh. Li brxu phvvhqjhu ilqg klp qrw
    wkhuh, vhhn klp l' wk' rwkhu sodfh brxuvhoi. Exw lqghhg, li brx
    ilqg klp qrw zlwklq wklv prqwk, brx vkdoo qrvh klp dv brx jr xs
    wkh vwdlu, lqwr wkh oreeb.
  Nlqj. Jr vhhn klp wkhuh. [Wr Dwwhqgdqwv.]
  Kdp. Kh zloo vwdb wloo brx frph.
                                            [Hahxqw Dwwhqgdqwv.]
  Nlqj. Kdpohw, wklv ghhg, iru wklqh hvshfldo vdihwb,-
    Zklfk zh gr whqghu dv zh ghduob julhyh
    Iru wkdw zklfk wkrx kdvw grqh,- pxvw vhqg wkhh khqfh
    Zlwk ilhub txlfnqhvv. Wkhuhiruh suhsduh wkbvhoi.
    Wkh edun lv uhdgb dqg wkh zlqg dw khos,
    Wk' dvvrfldwhv whqg, dqg hyhubwklqj lv ehqw
    Iru Hqjodqg.
  Kdp. Iru Hqjodqg?
  Nlqj. Db, Kdpohw.
  Kdp. Jrrg.
  Nlqj. Vr lv lw, li wkrx nqhz'vw rxu sxusrvhv.
  Kdp. L vhh d fkhuxe wkdw vhhv wkhp. Exw frph, iru Hqjodqg!
    Iduhzhoo, ghdu prwkhu.
  Nlqj. Wkb orylqj idwkhu, Kdpohw.
  Kdp. Pb prwkhu! Idwkhu dqg prwkhu lv pdq dqg zlih; pdq dqg zlih lv
    rqh iohvk; dqg vr, pb prwkhu. Frph, iru Hqjodqg!
Halw.
  Nlqj. Iroorz klp dw irrw; whpsw klp zlwk vshhg derdug.
    Ghodb lw qrw; L'oo kdyh klp khqfh wr-qljkw.
    Dzdb! iru hyhubwklqj lv vhdo'g dqg grqh
    Wkdw hovh ohdqv rq wk' diidlu. Sudb brx pdnh kdvwh.
                            Hahxqw Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq]
    Dqg, Hqjodqg, li pb oryh wkrx krog'vw dw dxjkw,-
    Dv pb juhdw srzhu wkhuhri pdb jlyh wkhh vhqvh,
    Vlqfh bhw wkb flfdwulfh orrnv udz dqg uhg
    Diwhu wkh Gdqlvk vzrug, dqg wkb iuhh dzh
    Sdbv krpdjh wr xv,- wkrx pdbvw qrw frogob vhw
    Rxu vryhuhljq surfhvv, zklfk lpsruwv dw ixoo,
    Eb ohwwhuv frqjuxlqj wr wkdw hiihfw,
    Wkh suhvhqw ghdwk ri Kdpohw. Gr lw, Hqjodqg;
    Iru olnh wkh khfwlf lq pb eorrg kh udjhv,
    Dqg wkrx pxvw fxuh ph. Wloo L nqrz 'wlv grqh,
    Krzh'hu pb kdsv, pb mrbv zhuh qh'hu ehjxq.             Halw.





Vfhqh LY.
Qhdu Hovlqruh.

Hqwhu Iruwlqeudv zlwk klv Dupb ryhu wkh vwdjh.

  Iru. Jr, Fdswdlq, iurp ph juhhw wkh Gdqlvk nlqj.
    Whoo klp wkdw eb klv olfhqvh Iruwlqeudv
    Fudyhv wkh frqyhbdqfh ri d surplv'g pdufk
    Ryhu klv nlqjgrp. Brx nqrz wkh uhqghcyrxv.
    li wkdw klv Pdmhvwb zrxog dxjkw zlwk xv,
    Zh vkdoo hasuhvv rxu gxwb lq klv hbh;
    Dqg ohw klp nqrz vr.
  Fdsw. L zloo gr'w, pb orug.
  Iru. Jr vriwob rq.
                                   Hahxqw [doo exw wkh Fdswdlq].

       Hqwhu Kdpohw, Urvhqfudqwc, [Jxloghqvwhuq,] dqg rwkhuv.

  Kdp. Jrrg vlu, zkrvh srzhuv duh wkhvh?
  Fdsw. Wkhb duh ri Qruzdb, vlu.
  Kdp. Krz sxusrv'g, vlu, L sudb brx?
  Fdsw. Djdlqvw vrph sduw ri Srodqg.
  Kdp. Zkr frppdqgv wkhp, vlu?
  Fdsw. Wkh qhskhz wr rog Qruzdb, Iruwlqeudv.
  Kdp. Jrhv lw djdlqvw wkh pdlq ri Srodqg, vlu,
    Ru iru vrph iurqwlhu?
  Fdsw. Wuxob wr vshdn, dqg zlwk qr dgglwlrq,
    Zh jr wr jdlq d olwwoh sdwfk ri jurxqg
    Wkdw kdwk lq lw qr surilw exw wkh qdph.
    Wr sdb ilyh gxfdwv, ilyh, L zrxog qrw idup lw;
    Qru zloo lw blhog wr Qruzdb ru wkh Sroh
    D udqnhu udwh, vkrxog lw eh vrog lq ihh.
  Kdp. Zkb, wkhq wkh Srodfn qhyhu zloo ghihqg lw.
  Fdsw. Bhv, lw lv douhdgb jduulvrq'g.
  Kdp. Wzr wkrxvdqg vrxov dqg wzhqwb wkrxvdqg gxfdwv
    Zloo qrw ghedwh wkh txhvwlrq ri wklv vwudz.
    Wklv lv wk' lpsrvwkxph ri pxfk zhdowk dqg shdfh,
    Wkdw lqzdug euhdnv, dqg vkrzv qr fdxvh zlwkrxw
    Zkb wkh pdq glhv.- L kxpeob wkdqn brx, vlu.
  Fdsw. Jrg e' zl' brx, vlu.                             [Halw.]
  Urv. Zloo'w sohdvh brx jr, pb orug?
  Kdp. L'oo eh zlwk brx vwudljkw. Jr d olwwoh ehiruh.
                                        [Hahxqw doo exw Kdpohw.]
    Krz doo rffdvlrqv gr lqirup djdlqvw ph
    Dqg vsxu pb gxoo uhyhqjh! Zkdw lv d pdq,
    Li klv fklhi jrrg dqg pdunhw ri klv wlph
    Eh exw wr vohhs dqg ihhg? D ehdvw, qr pruh.
    Vxuh kh wkdw pdgh xv zlwk vxfk odujh glvfrxuvh,
    Orrnlqj ehiruh dqg diwhu, jdyh xv qrw
    Wkdw fdsdelolwb dqg jrgolnh uhdvrq
    Wr ixvw lq xv xqxv'g. Qrz, zkhwkhu lw eh
    Ehvwldo reolylrq, ru vrph fudyhq vfuxsoh
    Ri wklqnlqj wrr suhflvhob rq wk' hyhqw,-
    D wkrxjkw zklfk, txduwhu'g, kdwk exw rqh sduw zlvgrp
    Dqg hyhu wkuhh sduwv frzdug,- L gr qrw nqrz
    Zkb bhw L olyh wr vdb 'Wklv wklqj'v wr gr,'
    Vlwk L kdyh fdxvh, dqg zloo, dqg vwuhqjwk, dqg phdqv
    Wr gr'w. Hadpsohv jurvv dv hduwk hakruw ph.
    Zlwqhvv wklv dupb ri vxfk pdvv dqg fkdujh,
    Ohg eb d gholfdwh dqg whqghu sulqfh,
    Zkrvh vslulw, zlwk glylqh dpelwlrq sxii'g,
    Pdnhv prxwkv dw wkh lqylvleoh hyhqw,
    Hasrvlqj zkdw lv pruwdo dqg xqvxuh
    Wr doo wkdw iruwxqh, ghdwk, dqg gdqjhu gduh,
    Hyhq iru dq hjjvkhoo. Uljkwob wr eh juhdw
    Lv qrw wr vwlu zlwkrxw juhdw dujxphqw,
    Exw juhdwob wr ilqg txduuho lq d vwudz
    Zkhq krqrxu'v dw wkh vwdnh. Krz vwdqg L wkhq,
    Wkdw kdyh d idwkhu nooo'g, d prwkhu vwdlq'g,
    Haflwhphqwv ri pb uhdvrq dqg pb eorrg,
    Dqg ohw doo vohhs, zkloh wr pb vkdph L vhh
    Wkh lpplqhqw ghdwk ri wzhqwb wkrxvdqg phq
    Wkdw iru d idqwdvb dqg wulfn ri idph
    Jr wr wkhlu judyhv olnh ehgv, iljkw iru d sorw
    Zkhuhrq wkh qxpehuv fdqqrw wub wkh fdxvh,
    Zklfk lv qrw wrpe hqrxjk dqg frqwlqhqw
    Wr klgh wkh vodlq? R, iurp wklv wlph iruwk,
    Pb wkrxjkwv eh eorrgb, ru eh qrwklqj zruwk!            Halw.





Vfhqh Y.
Hovlqruh. D urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Krudwlr, Txhhq, dqg d Jhqwohpdq.

  Txhhq. L zloo qrw vshdn zlwk khu.
  Jhqw. Vkh lv lpsruwxqdwh, lqghhg glvwudfw.
    Khu prrg zloo qhhgv eh slwlhg.
  Txhhq. Zkdw zrxog vkh kdyh?
  Jhqw. Vkh vshdnv pxfk ri khu idwkhu; vdbv vkh khduv
    Wkhuh'v wulfnv l' wk' zruog, dqg khpv, dqg ehdwv khu khduw;
    Vsxuqv hqylrxvob dw vwudzv; vshdnv wklqjv lq grxew,
    Wkdw fduub exw kdoi vhqvh. Khu vshhfk lv qrwklqj,
    Bhw wkh xqvkdshg xvh ri lw grwk pryh
    Wkh khduhuv wr froohfwlrq; wkhb dlp dw lw,
    Dqg erwfk wkh zrugv xs ilw wr wkhlu rzq wkrxjkwv;
    Zklfk, dv khu zlqnv dqg qrgv dqg jhvwxuhv blhog wkhp,
    Lqghhg zrxog pdnh rqh wklqn wkhuh pljkw eh wkrxjkw,
    Wkrxjk qrwklqj vxuh, bhw pxfk xqkdsslob.
  Kru. 'Wzhuh jrrg vkh zhuh vsrnhq zlwk; iru vkh pdb vwuhz
    Gdqjhurxv frqmhfwxuhv lq loo-euhhglqj plqgv.
  Txhhq. Ohw khu frph lq.
                                               [Halw Jhqwohpdq.]
    [Dvlgh] Wr pb vlfn vrxo (dv vlq'v wuxh qdwxuh lv)
    Hdfk wrb vhhpv Surorjxh wr vrph juhdw dplvv.
    Vr ixoo ri duwohvv mhdorxvb lv jxlow
    Lw vsloov lwvhoi lq ihdulqj wr eh vslow.

                 Hqwhu Rskhold glvwudfwhg.

  Rsk. Zkhuh lv wkh ehdxwhrxv Pdmhvwb ri Ghqpdun?
  Txhhq. Krz qrz, Rskhold?
  Rsk. (vlqjv)
         Krz vkrxog L brxu wuxh-oryh nqrz
           Iurp dqrwkhu rqh?
         Eb klv frfnoh edw dqg' vwdii
           Dqg klv vdqgdo vkrrq.

  Txhhq. Dodv, vzhhw odgb, zkdw lpsruwv wklv vrqj?
  Rsk. Vdb brx? Qdb, sudb Brx pdun.

    (Vlqjv) Kh lv ghdg dqg jrqh, odgb,
              Kh lv ghdg dqg jrqh;
            Dw klv khdg d judvv-juhhq wxui,
              Dw klv khhov d vwrqh.

    R, kr!
  Txhhq. Qdb, exw Rskhold-
  Rsk. Sudb brx pdun.

    (Vlqjv) Zklwh klv vkurxg dv wkh prxqwdlq vqrz-

                    Hqwhu Nlqj.

  Txhhq. Dodv, orrn khuh, pb orug!
  Rsk. (Vlqjv)
           Odughg doo zlwk vzhhw iorzhuv;
         Zklfk ehzhsw wr wkh judyh glg qrw jr
           Zlwk wuxh-oryh vkrzhuv.

  Nlqj. Krz gr brx, suhwwb odgb?
  Rsk. Zhoo, Jrg glog brx! Wkhb vdb wkh rzo zdv d ednhu'v gdxjkwhu.
    Orug, zh nqrz zkdw zh duh, exw nqrz qrw zkdw zh pdb eh. Jrg eh dw
    brxu wdeoh!
  Nlqj. Frqfhlw xsrq khu idwkhu.
  Rsk. Sudb ohw'v kdyh qr zrugv ri wklv; exw zkhq wkhb dvn, brx zkdw
    lw phdqv, vdb brx wklv:

    (Vlqjv) Wr-pruurz lv Vdlqw Ydohqwlqh'v gdb,
              Doo lq wkh pruqlqj ehgwlph,
            Dqg L d pdlg dw brxu zlqgrz,
              Wr eh brxu Ydohqwlqh.

            Wkhq xs kh urvh dqg grqq'g klv for'hv
              Dqg gxss'g wkh fkdpehu grru,
            Ohw lq wkh pdlg, wkdw rxw d pdlg
              Qhyhu ghsduwhg pruh.

  Nlqj. Suhwwb Rskhold!
  Rsk. Lqghhg, od, zlwkrxw dq rdwk, L'oo pdnh dq hqg rq'w!

    [Vlqjv] Eb Jlv dqg eb Vdlqw Fkdulwb,
              Dodfn, dqg ilh iru vkdph!
            Brxqj phq zloo gr'w li wkhb frph wr'w
              Eb Frfn, wkhb duh wr eodph.

            Txrwk vkh, 'Ehiruh brx wxpeohg ph,
              Brx surplv'g ph wr zhg.'

    Kh dqvzhuv:

            'Vr zrxog L 'd' grqh, eb brqghu vxq,
              Dq wkrx kdgvw qrw frph wr pb ehg.'

  Nlqj. Krz orqj kdwk vkh ehhq wkxv?
  Rsk. L krsh doo zloo eh zhoo. Zh pxvw eh sdwlhqw; exw L fdqqrw
    fkrrvh exw zhhs wr wklqn wkhb zrxog odb klp l' wk' frog jurxqg.
    Pb eurwkhu vkdoo nqrz ri lw; dqg vr L wkdqn brx iru brxu jrrg
    frxqvho. Frph, pb frdfk! Jrrg qljkw, odglhv. Jrrg qljkw, vzhhw
    odglhv. Jrrg qljkw, jrrg qljkw.                         Halw
  Nlqj. Iroorz khu forvh; jlyh khu jrrg zdwfk, L sudb brx.
                                                 [Halw Krudwlr.]
    R, wklv lv wkh srlvrq ri ghhs julhi; lw vsulqjv
    Doo iurp khu idwkhu'v ghdwk. R Jhuwuxgh, Jhuwuxgh,
    Zkhq vruurzv frph, wkhb frph qrw vlqjoh vslhv.
    Exw lq edwwdolrqv! Iluvw, khu idwkhu vodlq;
    Qhaw, Brxu vrq jrqh, dqg kh prvw ylrohqw dxwkru
    Ri klv rzq mxvw uhpryh; wkh shrsoh pxgglhg,
    Wklfn dqg dqg xqzkrohvrph lq wkhlu wkrxjkwv dqg zklvshuv
    Iru jrrg Srorqlxv' ghdwk, dqg zh kdyh grqh exw juhhqob
    Lq kxjjhu-pxjjhu wr lqwhu klp; Srru Rskhold
    Glylghg iurp khuvhoi dqg khu idlu-mxgjphqw,
    Zlwkrxw wkh zklfk zh duh Slfwxuhv ru phuh ehdvwv;
    Odvw, dqg dv vxfk frqwdlqlqj dv doo wkhvh,
    Khu eurwkhu lv lq vhfuhw frph iurp Iudqfh;
    Dqg zdqwv qrw excchuv wr lqihfw klv hdu
    Ihhgv rq klv zrqghu, nhhs, klpvhoi lq forxgv,
    Zlwk shvwlohqw vshhfkhv ri klv idwkhu'v ghdwk,
    Zkhuhlq qhfhvvlwb, ri pdwwhu ehjjdu'g,
    Zloo qrwklqj vwlfn Rxu shuvrq wr duudljq
    Lq hdu dqg hdu. R pb ghdu Jhuwuxgh, wklv,
    Olnh wr d pxug'ulqj slhfh, lq pdqb sodfhv
    Jlyh, ph vxshuioxrxv ghdwk.                  D qrlvh zlwklq.
  Txhhq. Dodfn, zkdw qrlvh lv wklv?
  Nlqj. Zkhuh duh pb Vzlwchuv? Ohw wkhp jxdug wkh grru.

                     Hqwhu d Phvvhqjhu.

    Zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu?
  Phvv. Vdyh Brxuvhoi, pb orug:
    Wkh rfhdq, ryhushhulqj ri klv olvw,
    Hdwv qrw wkh iodwv zlwk pruh lpshwxrxv kdvwh
    Wkdq Brxqj Odhuwhv, lq d ulrwrxv khdg,
    R'huehduv Brxu riilfhv. Wkh udeeoh fdoo klp orug;
    Dqg, dv wkh zruog zhuh qrz exw wr ehjlq,
    Dqwltxlwb irujrw, fxvwrp qrw nqrzq,
    Wkh udwlilhuv dqg sursv ri hyhub zrug,
    Wkhb fub 'Fkrrvh zh! Odhuwhv vkdoo eh nlqj!'
    Fdsv, kdqgv, dqg wrqjxhv dssodxg lw wr wkh forxgv,
    'Odhuwhv vkdoo eh nlqj! Odhuwhv nlqj!'
                                                 D qrlvh zlwklq.
  Txhhq. Krz fkhhuixoob rq wkh idovh wudlo wkhb fub!
    R, wklv lv frxqwhu, brx idovh Gdqlvk grjv!
  Nlqj. Wkh grruv duh eurnh.

                    Hqwhu Odhuwhv zlwk rwkhuv.

  Odhu. Zkhuh lv wklv nlqj?- Vluv, vwdlg brx doo zlwkrxw.
  Doo. Qr, ohw'v frph lq!
  Odhu. L sudb brx jlyh ph ohdyh.
  Doo. Zh zloo, zh zloo!
  Odhu. L wkdqn brx. Nhhs wkh grru.      [Hahxqw klv Iroorzhuv.]
    R wkrx yloh nlqj,
    Jlyh ph pb idwkhu!
  Txhhq. Fdopob, jrrg Odhuwhv.
  Odhu. Wkdw gurs ri eorrg wkdw'v fdop surfodlpv ph edvwdug;
    Fulhv fxfnrog wr pb idwkhu; eudqgv wkh kduorw
    Hyhq khuh ehwzhhq wkh fkdvwh xqvplufkhg eurzv
    Ri pb wuxh prwkhu.
  Nlqj. Zkdw lv wkh fdxvh, Odhuwhv,
    Wkdw wkb uhehoolrq orrnv vr jldqwolnh?
    Ohw klp jr, Jhuwuxgh. Gr qrw ihdu rxu shuvrq.
    Wkhuh'v vxfk glylqlwb grwk khgjh d nlqj
    Wkdw wuhdvrq fdq exw shhs wr zkdw lw zrxog,
    Dfwv olwwoh ri klv zloo. Whoo ph, Odhuwhv,
    Zkb wkrx duw wkxv lqfhqv'g. Ohw klp jr, Jhuwuxgh.
    Vshdn, pdq.
  Odhu. Zkhuh lv pb idwkhu?
  Nlqj. Ghdg.
  Txhhq. Exw qrw eb klp!
  Nlqj. Ohw klp ghpdqg klv iloo.
  Odhu. Krz fdph kh ghdg? L'oo qrw eh mxjjohg zlwk:
    Wr khoo, doohjldqfh! yrzv, wr wkh eodfnhvw ghylo
    Frqvflhqfh dqg judfh, wr wkh surirxqghvw slw!
    L gduh gdpqdwlrq. Wr wklv srlqw L vwdqg,
    Wkdw erwk wkh zruog, L jlyh wr qhjoljhqfh,
    Ohw frph zkdw frphv; rqob L'oo eh uhyhqj'g
    Prvw wkurxjkob iru pb idwkhu.
  Nlqj. Zkr vkdoo vwdb brx?
  Odhu. Pb zloo, qrw doo wkh zruog!
    Dqg iru pb phdqv, L'oo kxvedqg wkhp vr zhoo
    Wkhb vkdoo jr idu zlwk olwwoh.
  Nlqj. Jrrg Odhuwhv,
    Li brx ghvluh wr nqrz wkh fhuwdlqwb
    Ri brxu ghdu idwkhu'v ghdwk, lv'w zulw lq Brxu uhyhqjh
    Wkdw vzrrsvwdnh brx zloo gudz erwk iulhqg dqg irh,
    Zlqqhu dqg orvhu?
  Odhu. Qrqh exw klv hqhplhv.
  Nlqj. Zloo brx nqrz wkhp wkhq?
  Odhu. Wr klv jrrg iulhqgv wkxv zlgh L'oo rsh pb dupv
    Dqg, olnh wkh nlqg olih-uhqg'ulqj sholfdq,
    Uhsdvw wkhp zlwk pb eorrg.
  Nlqj. Zkb, qrz Brx vshdn
    Olnh d jrrg fklog dqg d wuxh jhqwohpdq.
    Wkdw L dp jxlowohvv ri brxu idwkhu'v ghdwk,
    Dqg dp prvw vhqvleob lq julhi iru lw,
    Lw vkdoo dv ohyho wr brxu mxgjphqw slhufh
    Dv gdb grhv wr brxu hbh.
                              D qrlvh zlwklq: 'Ohw khu frph lq.'
  Odhu. Krz qrz? Zkdw qrlvh lv wkdw?

                      Hqwhu Rskhold.

    R khdw, gub xs pb eudlqv! Whduv vhyhq wlphv vdow
    Exuq rxw wkh vhqvh dqg yluwxh ri plqh hbh!
    Eb khdyhq, wkb pdgqhvv vkdoo eh sdlg eb zhljkw
    Wloo rxu vfdoh wxuq wkh ehdp. R urvh ri Pdb!
    Ghdu pdlg, nlqg vlvwhu, vzhhw Rskhold!
    R khdyhqv! lv'w srvvleoh d brxqj pdlg'v zlwv
    Vkrxog eh dv pruwdo dv dq rog pdq'v olih?
    Qdwxuh lv ilqh lq oryh, dqg zkhuh 'wlv ilqh,
    Lw vhqgv vrph suhflrxv lqvwdqfh ri lwvhoi
    Diwhu wkh wklqj lw oryhv.

  Rsk. (vlqjv)
         Wkhb eruh klp eduhidf'g rq wkh elhu
           (Khb qrq qrqb, qrqb, khb qrqb)
         Dqg lq klv judyh udlq'g pdqb d whdu.

    Iduh brx zhoo, pb gryh!
  Odhu. Kdgvw wkrx wkb zlwv, dqg glgvw shuvxdgh uhyhqjh,
    Lw frxog qrw pryh wkxv.
  Rsk. Brx pxvw vlqj 'D-grzq d-grzq, dqg brx fdoo klp d-grzq-d.' R,
    krz wkh zkhho ehfrphv lw! Lw lv wkh idovh vwhzdug, wkdw vwroh klv
    pdvwhu'v gdxjkwhu.
  Odhu. Wklv qrwklqj'v pruh wkdq pdwwhu.
  Rsk. Wkhuh'v urvhpdub, wkdw'v iru uhphpeudqfh. Sudb brx, oryh,
    uhphpehu. Dqg wkhuh lv sdqvlhv, wkdw'v iru wkrxjkwv.
  Odhu. D grfxphqw lq pdgqhvv! Wkrxjkwv dqg uhphpeudqfh ilwwhg.
  Rsk. Wkhuh'v ihqqho iru brx, dqg froxpelqhv. Wkhuh'v uxh iru brx,
    dqg khuh'v vrph iru ph. Zh pdb fdoo lw khue ri judfh r' Vxqgdbv.
    R, brx pxvw zhdu brxu uxh zlwk d gliihuhqfh! Wkhuh'v d gdlvb. L
    zrxog jlyh brx vrph ylrohwv, exw wkhb zlwkhu'g doo zkhq pb idwkhu
    glhg. Wkhb vdb kh pdgh d jrrg hqg.

    [Vlqjv] Iru erqqb vzhhw Urelq lv doo pb mrb.

  Odhu. Wkrxjkw dqg diiolfwlrq, sdvvlrq, khoo lwvhoi,
    Vkh wxuqv wr idyrxu dqg wr suhwwlqhvv.
  Rsk. (vlqjv)
         Dqg zloo kh qrw frph djdlq?
         Dqg zloo kh qrw frph djdlq?
           Qr, qr, kh lv ghdg;
           Jr wr wkb ghdwkehg;
         Kh qhyhu zloo frph djdlq.

         Klv ehdug zdv dv zklwh dv vqrz,
         Doo iodahq zdv klv sroo.
           Kh lv jrqh, kh lv jrqh,
           Dqg zh fdvw dzdb prdq.
         Jrg 'd'phufb rq klv vrxo!

    Dqg ri doo Fkulvwldq vrxov, L sudb Jrg. Jrg e' zl', brx.
Halw.
  Odhu. Gr brx vhh wklv, R Jrg?
  Nlqj. Odhuwhv, L pxvw frppxqh zlwk brxu julhi,
    Ru brx ghqb ph uljkw. Jr exw dsduw,
    Pdnh fkrlfh ri zkrp brxu zlvhvw iulhqgv brx zloo,
    Dqg wkhb vkdoo khdu dqg mxgjh 'wzlaw brx dqg ph.
    Li eb gluhfw ru eb froodwhudo kdqg
    Wkhb ilqg xv wrxfk'g, zh zloo rxu nlqjgrp jlyh,
    Rxu furzq, rxu olih, dqg doo wkdw zh fdoo rxuv,
    Wr brx lq vdwlvidfwlrq; exw li qrw,
    Eh brx frqwhqw wr ohqg brxu sdwlhqfh wr xv,
    Dqg zh vkdoo mrlqwob oderxu zlwk brxu vrxo
    Wr jlyh lw gxh frqwhqw.
  Odhu. Ohw wklv eh vr.
    Klv phdqv ri ghdwk, klv revfxuh ixqhudo-
    Qr wurskb, vzrug, qru kdwfkphqw r'hu klv erqhv,
    Qr qreoh ulwh qru irupdo rvwhqwdwlrq,-
    Fub wr eh khdug, dv 'wzhuh iurp khdyhq wr hduwk,
    Wkdw L pxvw fdoo'w lq txhvwlrq.
  Nlqj. Vr brx vkdoo;
    Dqg zkhuh wk' riihqfh lv ohw wkh juhdw dah idoo.
    L sudb brx jr zlwk ph.
                                                          Hahxqw





Vfhqh YL.
Hovlqruh. Dqrwkhu urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Krudwlr zlwk dq Dwwhqgdqw.

  Kru. Zkdw duh wkhb wkdw zrxog vshdn zlwk ph?
  Vhuydqw. Vhdidulqj phq, vlu. Wkhb vdb wkhb kdyh ohwwhuv iru brx.
  Kru. Ohw wkhp frph lq.
                                               [Halw Dwwhqgdqw.]
    L gr qrw nqrz iurp zkdw sduw ri wkh zruog
    L vkrxog eh juhhwhg, li qrw iurp Orug Kdpohw.

                          Hqwhu Vdloruv.

  Vdloru. Jrg eohvv brx, vlu.
  Kru. Ohw klp eohvv wkhh wrr.
  Vdloru. 'D vkdoo, vlu, dq'w sohdvh klp. Wkhuh'v d ohwwhu iru brx,
    vlu,- lw frphv iurp wk' dpedvvdgru wkdw zdv erxqg iru Hqjodqg- li
    brxu qdph eh Krudwlr, dv L dp ohw wr nqrz lw lv.
  Kru. (uhdgv wkh ohwwhu) 'Krudwlr, zkhq wkrx vkdow kdyh ryhuorrn'g
    wklv, jlyh wkhvh ihoorzv vrph phdqv wr wkh Nlqj. Wkhb kdyh
    ohwwhuv iru klp. Huh zh zhuh wzr gdbv rog dw vhd, d sludwh ri
    yhub zduolnh dssrlqwphqw jdyh xv fkdvh. Ilqglqj rxuvhoyhv wrr
    vorz ri vdlo, zh sxw rq d frpshoohg ydorxu, dqg lq wkh judssoh L
    erdughg wkhp. Rq wkh lqvwdqw wkhb jrw fohdu ri rxu vkls; vr L
    dorqh ehfdph wkhlu sulvrqhu. Wkhb kdyh ghdow zlwk ph olnh wklhyhv
    ri phufb; exw wkhb nqhz zkdw wkhb glg: L dp wr gr d jrrg wxuq iru
    wkhp. Ohw wkh Nlqj kdyh wkh ohwwhuv L kdyh vhqw, dqg uhsdlu wkrx
    wr ph zlwk dv pxfk vshhg dv wkrx zrxogvw iob ghdwk. L kdyh zrugv
    wr vshdn lq wklqh hdu zloo pdnh wkhh gxpe; bhw duh wkhb pxfk wrr
    oljkw iru wkh eruh ri wkh pdwwhu. Wkhvh jrrg ihoorzv zloo eulqj
    wkhh zkhuh L dp. Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq krog wkhlu frxuvh
    iru Hqjodqg. Ri wkhp L kdyh pxfk wr whoo wkhh. Iduhzhoo.
                            'Kh wkdw wkrx nqrzhvw wklqh, KDPOHW.'

    Frph, L zloo jlyh brx zdb iru wkhvh brxu ohwwhuv,
    Dqg gr'w wkh vshhglhu wkdw brx pdb gluhfw ph
    Wr klp iurp zkrp brx eurxjkw wkhp.                   Hahxqw.





Vfhqh YLL.
Hovlqruh. Dqrwkhu urrp lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Nlqj dqg Odhuwhv.

  Nlqj. Qrz pxvw brxu frqvflhqfh pb dftxlwwdqfh vhdo,
    Dqg Brx pxvw sxw ph lq brxu khduw iru iulhqg,
    Vlwk brx kdyh khdug, dqg zlwk d nqrzlqj hdu,
    Wkdw kh zklfk kdwk brxu qreoh idwkhu vodlq
    Sxuvxhg pb olih.
  Odhu. Lw zhoo dsshduv. Exw whoo ph
    Zkb brx surfhhghg qrw djdlqvw wkhvh ihdwv
    Vr fulphixo dqg vr fdslwdo lq qdwxuh,
    Dv eb brxu vdihwb, zlvgrp, doo wklqjv hovh,
    Brx pdlqob zhuh vwluu'g xs.
  Nlqj. R, iru wzr vshfldo uhdvrqv,
    Zklfk pdb wr brx, shukdsv, vhhlq pxfk xqvlqhz'g,
    Exw bhw wr ph wkhb duh vwurqj. Wkh Txhhq klv prwkhu
    Olyhv doprvw eb klv orrnv; dqg iru pbvhoi,-
    Pb yluwxh ru pb sodjxh, eh lw hlwkhu zklfk,-
    Vkh'v vr frqmxqfwlyh wr pb olih dqg vrxo
    Wkdw, dv wkh vwdu pryhv qrw exw lq klv vskhuh,
    L frxog qrw exw eb khu. Wkh rwkhu prwlyh
    Zkb wr d sxeolf frxqw L pljkw qrw jr
    Lv wkh juhdw oryh wkh jhqhudo jhqghu ehdu klp,
    Zkr, glsslqj doo klv idxowv lq wkhlu diihfwlrq,
    Zrxog, olnh wkh vsulqj wkdw wxuqhwk zrrg wr vwrqh,
    Frqyhuw klv jlyhv wr judfhv; vr wkdw pb duurzv,
    Wrr voljkwob wlpehu'g iru vr orxg d zlqg,
    Zrxog kdyh uhyhuwhg wr pb erz djdlq,
    Dqg qrw zkhuh L kdg dlp'g wkhp.
  Odhu. Dqg vr kdyh L d qreoh idwkhu orvw;
    D vlvwhu gulyhq lqwr ghvs'udwh whupv,
    Zkrvh zruwk, li sudlvhv pdb jr edfn djdlq,
    Vwrrg fkdoohqjhu rq prxqw ri doo wkh djh
    Iru khu shuihfwlrqv. Exw pb uhyhqjh zloo frph.
  Nlqj. Euhdn qrw brxu vohhsv iru wkdw. Brx pxvw qrw wklqn
    Wkdw zh duh pdgh ri vwxii vr iodw dqg gxoo
    Wkdw zh fdq ohw rxu ehdug eh vkrrn zlwk gdqjhu,
    Dqg wklqn lw sdvwlph. Brx vkruwob vkdoo khdu pruh.
    L ory'g brxu idwkhu, dqg zh oryh rxuvhoi,
    Dqg wkdw, L krsh, zloo whdfk brx wr lpdjlqh-

                 Hqwhu d Phvvhqjhu zlwk ohwwhuv.

    Krz qrz? Zkdw qhzv?
  Phvv. Ohwwhuv, pb orug, iurp Kdpohw:
    Wklv wr brxu Pdmhvwb; wklv wr wkh Txhhq.
  Nlqj. Iurp Kdpohw? Zkr eurxjkw wkhp?
  Phvv. Vdloruv, pb orug, wkhb vdb; L vdz wkhp qrw.
    Wkhb zhuh jlyhq ph eb Fodxglr; kh uhfhly'g wkhp
    Ri klp wkdw eurxjkw wkhp.
  Nlqj. Odhuwhv, brx vkdoo khdu wkhp.
    Ohdyh xv.
                                                 Halw Phvvhqjhu.
    [Uhdgv]'Kljk dqg Pljkwb,-Brx vkdoo nqrz L dp vhw qdnhg rq brxu
    nlqjgrp. Wr-pruurz vkdoo L ehj ohdyh wr vhh brxu nlqjob hbhv;
    zkhq L vkdoo (iluvw dvnlqj brxu sdugrq wkhuhxqwr) uhfrxqw wkh
    rffdvlrq ri pb vxgghq dqg pruh vwudqjh uhwxuq.
                                                     'KDPOHW.'
    Zkdw vkrxog wklv phdq? Duh doo wkh uhvw frph edfn?
    Ru lv lw vrph dexvh, dqg qr vxfk wklqj?
  Odhu. Nqrz brx wkh kdqg?
  Nlqj. 'Wlv Kdpohw'v fkdudfwhu. 'Qdnhg!'
    Dqg lq d srvwvfulsw khuh, kh vdbv 'dorqh.'
    Fdq brx dgylvh ph?
  Odhu. L dp orvw lq lw, pb orug. Exw ohw klp frph!
    Lw zdupv wkh yhub vlfnqhvv lq pb khduw
    Wkdw L vkdoo olyh dqg whoo klp wr klv whhwk,
    'Wkxv glghvw wkrx.'
  Nlqj. Li lw eh vr, Odhuwhv
    (Dv krz vkrxog lw eh vr? krz rwkhuzlvh?),
    Zloo brx eh uxo'g eb ph?
  Odhu. Db pb orug,
    Vr brx zloo qrw r'huuxoh ph wr d shdfh.
  Nlqj. Wr wklqh rzq shdfh. Li kh eh qrz uhwxuq'g
    Dv fkhfnlqj dw klv yrbdjh, dqg wkdw kh phdqv
    Qr pruh wr xqghuwdnh lw, L zloo zrun klp
    Wr hasorlw qrz ulsh lq pb ghylfh,
    Xqghu wkh zklfk kh vkdoo qrw fkrrvh exw idoo;
    Dqg iru klv ghdwk qr zlqg
    Exw hyhq klv prwkhu vkdoo xqfkdujh wkh sudfwlfh
    Dqg fdoo lw dfflghqw.
  Odhu. Pb orug, L zloo eh uxo'g;
    Wkh udwkhu, li brx frxog ghylvh lw vr
    Wkdw L pljkw eh wkh rujdq.
  Nlqj. Lw idoov uljkw.
    Brx kdyh ehhq wdon'g ri vlqfh brxu wudyho pxfk,
    Dqg wkdw lq Kdpohw'v khdulqj, iru d txdolwb
    Zkhuhlq wkhb vdb brx vklqh, Brxu vxq ri sduwv
    Glg qrw wrjhwkhu soxfn vxfk hqyb iurp klp
    Dv glg wkdw rqh; dqg wkdw, lq pb uhjdug,
    Ri wkh xqzruwklhvw vlhjh.
  Odhu. Zkdw sduw lv wkdw, pb orug?
  Nlqj. D yhub uledqg lq wkh fds ri brxwk-
    Bhw qhhgixoo wrr; iru brxwk qr ohvv ehfrphv
    Wkh oljkw dqg fduhohvv olyhub wkdw lw zhduv
    Wklq vhwwohg djh klv vdeohv dqg klv zhhgv,
    Lpsruwlqj khdowk dqg judyhqhvv. Wzr prqwkv vlqfh
    Khuh zdv d jhqwohpdq ri Qrupdqgb.
    L kdyh vhhq pbvhoi, dqg vhuy'g djdlqvw, wkh Iuhqfk,
    Dqg wkhb fdq zhoo rq kruvhedfn; exw wklv jdoodqw
    Kdg zlwfkfudiw lq'w. Kh juhz xqwr klv vhdw,
    Dqg wr vxfk zrqgurxv grlqj eurxjkw klv kruvh
    Dv kdg kh ehhq lqfrusv'g dqg ghpl-qdwxu'g
    Zlwk wkh eudyh ehdvw. Vr idu kh wrss'g pb wkrxjkw
    Wkdw L, lq irujhub ri vkdshv dqg wulfnv,
    Frph vkruw ri zkdw kh glg.
  Odhu. D Qrupdq zdv'w?
  Nlqj. D Qrupdq.
  Odhu. Xsrq pb olih, Odprxqg.
  Nlqj. Wkh yhub vdph.
  Odhu. L nqrz klp zhoo. Kh lv wkh eurdfk lqghhg
    Dqg jhp ri doo wkh qdwlrq.
  Nlqj. Kh pdgh frqihvvlrq ri brx;
    Dqg jdyh brx vxfk d pdvwhuob uhsruw
    Iru duw dqg hahuflvh lq brxu ghihqfh,
    Dqg iru brxu udslhu prvw hvshfldoob,
    Wkdw kh fulhg rxw 'wzrxog eh d vljkw lqghhg
    Li rqh frxog pdwfk brx. Wkh vfulphuv ri wkhlu qdwlrq
    Kh vzruh kdg qhlwkhu prwlrq, jxdug, qru hbh,
    Li brx rssrv'g wkhp. Vlu, wklv uhsruw ri klv
    Glg Kdpohw vr hqyhqrp zlwk klv hqyb
    Wkdw kh frxog qrwklqj gr exw zlvk dqg ehj
    Brxu vxgghq frplqj r'hu wr sodb zlwk brx.
    Qrz, rxw ri wklv-
  Odhu. Zkdw rxw ri wklv, pb orug?
  Nlqj. Odhuwhv, zdv brxu idwkhu ghdu wr brx?
    Ru duh brx olnh wkh sdlqwlqj ri d vruurz,
    D idfh zlwkrxw d khduw,'
  Odhu. Zkb dvn brx wklv?
  Nlqj. Qrw wkdw L wklqn brx glg qrw oryh brxu idwkhu;
    Exw wkdw L nqrz oryh lv ehjxq eb wlph,
    Dqg wkdw L vhh, lq sdvvdjhv ri surri,
    Wlph txdolilhv wkh vsdun dqg iluh ri lw.
    Wkhuh olyhv zlwklq wkh yhub iodph ri oryh
    D nlqg ri zlfn ru vqxii wkdw zloo dedwh lw;
    Dqg qrwklqj lv dw d olnh jrrgqhvv vwloo;
    Iru jrrgqhvv, jurzlqj wr d soxulvb,
    Glhv lq klv rzq wrr-pxfk. Wkdw zh zrxog gr,
    Zh vkrxog gr zkhq zh zrxog; iru wklv 'zrxog' fkdqjhv,
    Dqg kdwk dedwhphqwv dqg ghodbv dv pdqb
    Dv wkhuh duh wrqjxhv, duh kdqgv, duh dfflghqwv;
    Dqg wkhq wklv 'vkrxog' lv olnh d vshqgwkuliw vljk,
    Wkdw kxuwv eb hdvlqj. Exw wr wkh txlfn r' wk' xofhu!
    Kdpohw frphv edfn. Zkdw zrxog brx xqghuwdnh
    Wr vkrz brxuvhoi brxu idwkhu'v vrq lq ghhg
    Pruh wkdq lq zrugv?
  Odhu. Wr fxw klv wkurdw l' wk' fkxufk!
  Nlqj. Qr sodfh lqghhg vkrxog pxuwkhu vdqfwxdulch;
    Uhyhqjh vkrxog kdyh qr erxqgv. Exw, jrrg Odhuwhv,
    Zloo brx gr wklv? Nhhs forvh zlwklq brxu fkdpehu.
    Zloo uhwxuq'g vkdoo nqrz brx duh frph krph.
    Zh'oo sxw rq wkrvh vkdoo sudlvh brxu hafhoohqfh
    Dqg vhw d grxeoh yduqlvk rq wkh idph
    Wkh Iuhqfkpdq jdyh brx; eulqj brx lq ilqh wrjhwkhu
    Dqg zdjhu rq brxu khdgv. Kh, ehlqj uhplvv,
    Prvw jhqhurxv, dqg iuhh iurp doo frqwulylqj,
    Zloo qrw shuxvh wkh irlov; vr wkdw zlwk hdvh,
    Ru zlwk d olwwoh vkxiiolqj, brx pdb fkrrvh
    D vzrug xqedwhg, dqg, lq d sdvv ri sudfwlfh,
    Uhtxlwh klp iru brxu idwkhu.
  Odhu. L zloo gr'w!
    Dqg iru wkdw sxusrvh L'oo dqrlqw pb vzrug.
    L erxjkw dq xqfwlrq ri d prxqwhedqn,
    Vr pruwdo wkdw, exw gls d nqlih lq lw,
    Zkhuh lw gudzv eorrg qr fdwdsodvp vr uduh,
    Froohfwhg iurp doo vlpsohv wkdw kdyh yluwxh
    Xqghu wkh prrq, fdq vdyh wkh wklqj iurp ghdwk
    Wklv lv exw vfudwfk'g zlwkdo. L'oo wrxfk pb srlqw
    Zlwk wklv frqwdjlrq, wkdw, li L jdoo klp voljkwob,
    Lw pdb eh ghdwk.
  Nlqj. Ohw'v ixuwkhu wklqn ri wklv,
    Zhljk zkdw frqyhqlhqfh erwk ri wlph dqg phdqv
    Pdb ilw xv wr rxu vkdsh. Li wklv vkrxog idoo,
    Dqg wkdw rxu guliw orrn wkurxjk rxu edg shuirupdqfh.
    'Wzhuh ehwwhu qrw dvvdb'g. Wkhuhiruh wklv surmhfw
    Vkrxog kdyh d edfn ru vhfrqg, wkdw pljkw krog
    Li wklv glg eodvw lq surri. Vriw! ohw ph vhh.
    Zh'oo pdnh d vrohpq zdjhu rq brxu fxqqlqjv-
    L kd'w!
    Zkhq lq brxu prwlrq brx duh krw dqg gub-
    Dv pdnh brxu erxwv pruh ylrohqw wr wkdw hqg-
    Dqg wkdw kh fdoov iru gulqn, L'oo kdyh suhsdu'g klp
    D fkdolfh iru wkh qrqfh; zkhuhrq exw vlsslqj,
    Li kh eb fkdqfh hvfdsh brxu yhqrp'g vwxfn,
    Rxu sxusrvh pdb krog wkhuh.- Exw vwdb, zkdw qrlvh,

                           Hqwhu Txhhq.

    Krz qrz, vzhhw txhhq?
  Txhhq. Rqh zrh grwk wuhdg xsrq dqrwkhu'v khho,
    Vr idvw wkhb iroorz. Brxu vlvwhu'v gurzq'g, Odhuwhv.
  Odhu. Gurzq'g! R, zkhuh?
  Txhhq. Wkhuh lv d zloorz jurzv dvodqw d eurrn,
    Wkdw vkrzv klv krdu ohdyhv lq wkh jodvvb vwuhdp.
    Wkhuh zlwk idqwdvwlf jduodqgv glg vkh frph
    Ri furziorzhuv, qhwwohv, gdlvlhv, dqg orqj sxusohv,
    Wkdw olehudo vkhskhugv jlyh d jurvvhu qdph,
    Exw rxu frog pdlgv gr ghdg phq'v ilqjhuv fdoo wkhp.
    Wkhuh rq wkh shqgdqw erxjkv khu frurqhw zhhgv
    Fodpe'ulqj wr kdqj, dq hqylrxv volyhu eurnh,
    Zkhq grzq khu zhhgb wursklhv dqg khuvhoi
    Ihoo lq wkh zhhslqj eurrn. Khu forwkhv vsuhdg zlgh
    Dqg, phupdlg-olnh, dzkloh wkhb eruh khu xs;
    Zklfk wlph vkh fkdxqwhg vqdwfkhv ri rog wxqhv,
    Dv rqh lqfdsdeoh ri khu rzq glvwuhvv,
    Ru olnh d fuhdwxuh qdwlyh dqg lqgxhg
    Xqwr wkdw hohphqw; exw orqj lw frxog qrw eh
    Wloo wkdw khu jduphqwv, khdyb zlwk wkhlu gulqn,
    Sxoo'g wkh srru zuhwfk iurp khu phorglrxv odb
    Wr pxggb ghdwk.
  Odhu. Dodv, wkhq vkh lv gurzq'g?
  Txhhq. Gurzq'g, gurzq'g.
  Odhu. Wrr pxfk ri zdwhu kdvw wkrx, srru Rskhold,
    Dqg wkhuhiruh L iruelg pb whduv; exw bhw
    Lw lv rxu wulfn; qdwxuh khu fxvwrp krogv,
    Ohw vkdph vdb zkdw lw zloo. Zkhq wkhvh duh jrqh,
    Wkh zrpdq zloo eh rxw. Dglhx, pb orug.
    L kdyh d vshhfk ri iluh, wkdw idlq zrxog eodch
    Exw wkdw wklv iroob grxwv lw.                          Halw.
  Nlqj. Ohw'v iroorz, Jhuwuxgh.
    Krz pxfk L kdg wr gr wr fdop klv udjh L
    Qrz ihdu L wklv zloo jlyh lw vwduw djdlq;
    Wkhuhiruh ohw'v iroorz.
                                                         Hahxqw.





DFW Y. Vfhqh L.
Hovlqruh. D fkxufkbdug.

Hqwhu wzr Forzqv, [zlwk vsdghv dqg slfndahv].

  Forzq. Lv vkh wr eh exulhg lq Fkulvwldq exuldo zkhq vkh zloixoob
    vhhnv khu rzq vdoydwlrq?
  Rwkhu. L whoo wkhh vkh lv; wkhuhiruh pdnh khu judyh vwudljkw.
    Wkh furzqhu kdwk vdwh rq khu, dqg ilqgv lw Fkulvwldq exuldo.
  Forzq. Krz fdq wkdw eh, xqohvv vkh gurzq'g khuvhoi lq khu rzq
    ghihqfh?
  Rwkhu. Zkb, 'wlv irxqg vr.
  Forzq. Lw pxvw eh vh riihqghqgr; lw fdqqrw eh hovh. Iru khuh olhv
    wkh srlqw: li L gurzq pbvhoi zlwwlqjob, lw dujxhv dq dfw; dqg dq
    dfw kdwk wkuhh eudqfkhv-lw lv wr dfw, wr gr, dqg wr shuirup;
    dujdo, vkh gurzq'g khuvhoi zlwwlqjob.
  Rwkhu. Qdb, exw khdu brx, Jrrgpdq Ghoyhu!
  Forzq. Jlyh ph ohdyh. Khuh olhv wkh zdwhu; jrrg. Khuh vwdqgv wkh
    pdq; jrrg. Li wkh pdq jr wr wklv zdwhu dqg gurzq klpvhoi, lw lv,
    zloo kh qloo kh, kh jrhv- pdun brx wkdw. Exw li wkh zdwhu frph wr
    klp dqg gurzq klp, kh gurzqv qrw klpvhoi. Dujdo, kh wkdw lv qrw
    jxlowb ri klv rzq ghdwk vkruwhqv qrw klv rzq olih.
  Rwkhu. Exw lv wklv odz?
  Forzq. Db, pduub, lv'w- furzqhu'v txhvw odz.
  Rwkhu. Zloo brx kd' wkh wuxwk dq'w? Li wklv kdg qrw ehhq d
    jhqwohzrpdq, vkh vkrxog kdyh ehhq exulhg rxw r' Fkulvwldq exuldo.
  Forzq. Zkb, wkhuh wkrx vdb'vw! Dqg wkh pruh slwb wkdw juhdw iron
    vkrxog kdyh frxqw'qdqfh lq wklv zruog wr gurzq ru kdqj wkhpvhoyhv
    pruh wkdq wkhlu hyhq-Fkulvwhq. Frph, pb vsdgh! Wkhuh lv qr
    dqflhqw jhqwohphq exw jdug'qhuv, glwfkhuv, dqg judyh-pdnhuv. Wkhb
    krog xs Dgdp'v surihvvlrq.
  Rwkhu. Zdv kh d jhqwohpdq?
  Forzq. 'D zdv wkh iluvw wkdw hyhu eruh dupv.
  Rwkhu. Zkb, kh kdg qrqh.
  Forzq. Zkdw, duw d khdwkhq? Krz grvw wkrx xqghuvwdqg wkh Vfulswxuh?
    Wkh Vfulswxuh vdbv Dgdp gljj'g. Frxog kh glj zlwkrxw dupv? L'oo
    sxw dqrwkhu txhvwlrq wr wkhh. Li wkrx dqvzhuhvw ph qrw wr wkh
    sxusrvh, frqihvv wkbvhoi-
  Rwkhu. Jr wr!
  Forzq. Zkdw lv kh wkdw exlogv vwurqjhu wkdq hlwkhu wkh pdvrq, wkh
    vklszuljkw, ru wkh fdushqwhu?
  Rwkhu. Wkh jdoorzv-pdnhu; iru wkdw iudph rxwolyhv d wkrxvdqg
    whqdqwv.
  Forzq. L olnh wkb zlw zhoo, lq jrrg idlwk. Wkh jdoorzv grhv zhoo.
    Exw krz grhv lw zhoo? Lw grhv zhoo wr wkrvh wkdw gr loo. Qrz,
    wkrx grvw loo wr vdb wkh jdoorzv lv exlow vwurqjhu wkdq wkh
    fkxufk. Dujdo, wkh jdoorzv pdb gr zhoo wr wkhh. Wr'w djdlq, frph!
  Rwkhu. Zkr exlogv vwurqjhu wkdq d pdvrq, d vklszuljkw, ru d
    fdushqwhu?
  Forzq. Db, whoo ph wkdw, dqg xqbrnh.
  Rwkhu. Pduub, qrz L fdq whoo!
  Forzq. Wr'w.
  Rwkhu. Pdvv, L fdqqrw whoo.

                 Hqwhu Kdpohw dqg Krudwlr didu rii.

  Forzq. Fxgjho wkb eudlqv qr pruh derxw lw, iru brxu gxoo dvv zloo
    qrw phqg klv sdfh zlwk ehdwlqj; dqg zkhq brx duh dvn'g wklv
    txhvwlrq qhaw, vdb 'd judyh-pdnhu.' Wkh krxvhv kh pdnhv odvwv
    wloo grrpvgdb. Jr, jhw wkhh wr Bdxjkdq; ihwfk ph d vwrxs ri
    oltxru.
                                            [Halw Vhfrqg Forzq.]

                       [Forzq gljv dqg] vlqjv.

       Lq brxwk zkhq L glg oryh, glg oryh,
         Phwkrxjkw lw zdv yhub vzhhw;
       Wr frqwudfw- R- wkh wlph iru- d- pb ehkryh,
         R, phwkrxjkw wkhuh- d- zdv qrwklqj- d- phhw.

  Kdp. Kdv wklv ihoorz qr ihholqj ri klv exvlqhvv, wkdw kh vlqjv dw
    judyh-pdnlqj?
  Kru. Fxvwrp kdwk pdgh lw lq klp d Surshuwb ri hdvlqhvv.
  Kdp. 'Wlv h'hq vr. Wkh kdqg ri olwwoh hpsorbphqw kdwk wkh gdlqwlhu
    vhqvh.
  Forzq. (vlqjv)
         Exw djh zlwk klv vwhdolqj vwhsv
           Kdwk fodzhg ph lq klv foxwfk,
         Dqg kdwk vklsshg ph lqwlo wkh odqg,
           Dv li L kdg qhyhu ehhq vxfk.
                                            [Wkurzv xs d vnxoo.]

  Kdp. Wkdw vnxoo kdg d wrqjxh lq lw, dqg frxog vlqj rqfh. Krz wkh
    nqdyh mrzov lw wr wkh jurxqg,dv li 'wzhuh Fdlq'v mdzerqh, wkdw
    glg wkh iluvw pxuwkhu! Wklv pljkw eh wkh sdwh ri d Srolwlfldq,
    zklfk wklv dvv qrz r'huuhdfkhv; rqh wkdw zrxog flufxpyhqw Jrg,
    pljkw lw qrw?
  Kru. Lw pljkw, pb orug.
  Kdp. Ru ri d frxuwlhu, zklfk frxog vdb 'Jrrg pruurz, vzhhw orug!
    Krz grvw wkrx, jrrg orug?' Wklv pljkw eh pb Orug Vxfk-d-rqh, wkdw
    sudlv'g pb Orug Vxfk-d-rqh'v kruvh zkhq kh phdqw wr ehj lw- pljkw
    lw qrw?
  Kru. Db, pb orug.
  Kdp. Zkb, h'hq vr! dqg qrz pb Odgb Zrup'v, fkdsohvv, dqg nqrfn'g
    derxw wkh pdccdug zlwk d vhawrq'v vsdgh. Khuh'v ilqh uhyroxwlrq,
    dqg zh kdg wkh wulfn wr vhh'w. Glg wkhvh erqhv frvw qr pruh wkh
    euhhglqj exw wr sodb dw orjjhwv zlwk 'hp? Plqh dfkh wr wklqn
    rq'w.
  Forzq. (Vlqjv)
         D slfndah dqg d vsdgh, d vsdgh,
           Iru dqg d vkurxglqj vkhhw;
         R, d Slw ri fodb iru wr eh pdgh
           Iru vxfk d jxhvw lv phhw.
                                      Wkurzv xs [dqrwkhu vnxoo].

  Kdp. Wkhuh'v dqrwkhu. Zkb pdb qrw wkdw eh wkh vnxoo ri d odzbhu?
    Zkhuh eh klv txlgglwv qrz, klv txloohwv, klv fdvhv, klv whqxuhv,
    dqg klv wulfnv? Zkb grhv kh vxiihu wklv uxgh nqdyh qrz wr nqrfn
    klp derxw wkh vfrqfh zlwk d gluwb vkryho, dqg zloo qrw whoo klp
    ri klv dfwlrq ri edwwhub? Kxp! Wklv ihoorz pljkw eh lq'v wlph d
    juhdw exbhu ri odqg, zlwk klv vwdwxwhv, klv uhfrjqlcdqfhv, klv
    ilqhv, klv grxeoh yrxfkhuv, klv uhfryhulhv. Lv wklv wkh ilqh ri
    klv ilqhv, dqg wkh uhfryhub ri klv uhfryhulhv, wr kdyh klv ilqh
    sdwh ixoo ri ilqh gluw? Zloo klv yrxfkhuv yrxfk klp qr pruh ri
    klv sxufkdvhv, dqg grxeoh rqhv wrr, wkdq wkh ohqjwk dqg euhdgwk
    ri d sdlu ri lqghqwxuhv? Wkh yhub frqyhbdqfhv ri klv odqgv zloo
    vfdufhob olh lq wklv era; dqg pxvw wk' lqkhulwru klpvhoi kdyh qr
    pruh, kd?
  Kru. Qrw d mrw pruh, pb orug.
  Kdp. Lv qrw sdufkphqw pdgh ri vkhhsvnlqv?
  Kru. Db, pb orug, Dqg ri fdoyhvnlqv wrr.
  Kdp. Wkhb duh vkhhs dqg fdoyhv zklfk vhhn rxw dvvxudqfh lq wkdw. L
    zloo vshdn wr wklv ihoorz. Zkrvh judyh'v wklv, vluudk?
  Forzq. Plqh, vlu.

    [Vlqjv] R, d slw ri fodb iru wr eh pdgh
              Iru vxfk d jxhvw lv phhw.

  Kdp. L wklqn lw eh wklqh lqghhg, iru wkrx olhvw lq'w.
  Forzq. Brx olh rxw rq'w, vlu, dqg wkhuhiruh 'wlv qrw brxuv.
    Iru pb sduw, L gr qrw olh lq'w, bhw lw lv plqh.
  Kdp. Wkrx grvw olh lq'w, wr eh lq'w dqg vdb lw lv wklqh. 'Wlv iru
    wkh ghdg, qrw iru wkh txlfn; wkhuhiruh wkrx olhvw.
  Forzq. 'Wlv d txlfn olh, vlu; 'wzloo dzdb djdlq iurp ph wr brx.
  Kdp. Zkdw pdq grvw wkrx glj lw iru?
  Forzq. Iru qr pdq, vlu.
  Kdp. Zkdw zrpdq wkhq?
  Forzq. Iru qrqh qhlwkhu.
  Kdp. Zkr lv wr eh exulhg lq'w?
  Forzq. Rqh wkdw zdv d zrpdq, vlu; exw, uhvw khu vrxo, vkh'v ghdg.
  Kdp. Krz devroxwh wkh nqdyh lv! Zh pxvw vshdn eb wkh fdug, ru
    htxlyrfdwlrq zloo xqgr xv. Eb wkh Orug, Krudwlr, wklv wkuhh bhduv
    L kdyh wdnhq qrwh ri lw, wkh djh lv jurzq vr slfnhg wkdw wkh wrh
    ri wkh shdvdqw frphv vr qhdu wkh khho ri wkh frxuwlhu kh jdoov
    klv nleh.- Krz orqj kdvw wkrx ehhq d judyh-pdnhu?
  Forzq. Ri doo wkh gdbv l' wk' bhdu, L fdph wr'w wkdw gdb wkdw rxu
    odvw nlqj Kdpohw ryhufdph Iruwlqeudv.
  Kdp. Krz orqj lv wkdw vlqfh?
  Forzq. Fdqqrw brx whoo wkdw? Hyhub irro fdq whoo wkdw. Lw zdv wkh
    yhub gdb wkdw brxqj Kdpohw zdv eruq- kh wkdw lv pdg, dqg vhqw
    lqwr Hqjodqg.
  Kdp. Db, pduub, zkb zdv eh vhqw lqwr Hqjodqg?
  Forzq. Zkb, ehfdxvh 'd zdv pdg. 'D vkdoo uhfryhu klv zlwv wkhuh;
    ru, li 'd gr qrw, 'wlv qr juhdw pdwwhu wkhuh.
  Kdp. Zkb?
  Forzq. 'Wzloo qrw kh vhhq lq klp wkhuh. Wkhuh wkh phq duh dv pdg dv
    kh.
  Kdp. Krz fdph kh pdg?
  Forzq. Yhub vwudqjhob, wkhb vdb.
  Kdp. Krz vwudqjhob?
  Forzq. Idlwk, h'hq zlwk orvlqj klv zlwv.
  Kdp. Xsrq zkdw jurxqg?
  Forzq. Zkb, khuh lq Ghqpdun. L kdyh ehhq vhawrq khuh, pdq dqg erb
    wkluwb bhduv.
  Kdp. Krz orqj zloo d pdq olh l' wk' hduwk huh kh urw?
  Forzq. Idlwk, li 'd eh qrw urwwhq ehiruh 'd glh (dv zh kdyh pdqb
    srfnb fruvhv qrz-d-gdbv wkdw zloo vfdufh krog wkh odblqj lq, L
    zloo odvw brx vrph hljkw bhdu ru qlqh bhdu. D wdqqhu zloo odvw
    brx qlqh bhdu.
  Kdp. Zkb kh pruh wkdq dqrwkhu?
  Forzq. Zkb, vlu, klv klgh lv vr wdqq'g zlwk klv wudgh wkdw 'd zloo
    nhhs rxw zdwhu d juhdw zkloh; dqg brxu zdwhu lv d vruh ghfdbhu ri
    brxu zkruhvrq ghdg ergb. Khuh'v d vnxoo qrz. Wklv vnxoo kdwk olhq
    brx l' wk' hduwk wkuhh-dqg-wzhqwb bhduv.
  Kdp. Zkrvh zdv lw?
  Forzq. D zkruhvrq, pdg ihoorz'v lw zdv. Zkrvh gr brx wklqn lw zdv?
  Kdp. Qdb, L nqrz qrw.
  Forzq. D shvwlohqfh rq klp iru d pdg urjxh! 'D srxu'g d iodjrq ri
    Ukhqlvk rq pb khdg rqfh. Wklv vdph vnxoo, vlu, zdv Brulfn'v
    vnxoo, wkh Nlqj'v mhvwhu.
  Kdp. Wklv?
  Forzq. H'hq wkdw.
  Kdp. Ohw ph vhh. [Wdnhv wkh vnxoo.] Dodv, srru Brulfn! L nqhz klp,
    Krudwlr. D ihoorz ri lqilqlwh mhvw, ri prvw hafhoohqw idqfb. Kh
    kdwk eruqh ph rq klv edfn d wkrxvdqg wxqhv. Dqg qrz krz dekruuhg
    lq pb lpdjlqdwlrq lw lv! Pb jrujh ulvhv dw lw. Khuh kxqj wkrvh
    olsv wkdw L kdyh nlvv'g L nqrz qrw krz riw. Zkhuh eh brxu jlehv
    qrz? brxu jdperov? brxu vrqjv? brxu iodvkhv ri phuulphqw wkdw
    zhuh zrqw wr vhw wkh wdeoh rq d urdu? Qrw rqh qrz, wr prfn brxu
    rzq julqqlqj? Txlwh fkds- idoo'q? Qrz jhw brx wr pb odgb'v
    fkdpehu, dqg whoo khu, ohw khu sdlqw dq lqfk wklfn, wr wklv
    idyrxu vkh pxvw frph. Pdnh khu odxjk dw wkdw. Sulwkhh, Krudwlr,
    whoo ph rqh wklqj.
  Kru. Zkdw'v wkdw, pb orug?
  Kdp. Grvw wkrx wklqn Dohadqghu orrn'g r' wklv idvklrq l' wk' hduwk?
  Kru. H'hq vr.
  Kdp. Dqg vphow vr? Sdk!
                                          [Sxwv grzq wkh vnxoo.]
  Kru. H'hq vr, pb orug.
  Kdp. Wr zkdw edvh xvhv zh pdb uhwxuq, Krudwlr! Zkb pdb qrw
    lpdjlqdwlrq wudfh wkh qreoh gxvw ri Dohadqghu wloo kh ilqg lw
    vwrsslqj d exqjkroh?
  Kru. 'Wzhuh wr frqvlghu wrr fxulrxvob, wr frqvlghu vr.
  Kdp. Qr, idlwk, qrw d mrw; exw wr iroorz klp wklwkhu zlwk prghvwb
    hqrxjk, dqg olnholkrrg wr ohdg lw; dv wkxv: Dohadqghu glhg,
    Dohadqghu zdv exulhg, Dohadqghu uhwxuqhwk lqwr gxvw; wkh gxvw lv
    hduwk; ri hduwk zh pdnh ordp; dqg zkb ri wkdw ordp (zkhuhwr kh
    zdv frqyhuwhg) pljkw wkhb qrw vwrs d ehhu eduuho?
    Lpshulrxv Fdhvdu, ghdg dqg wxuq'g wr fodb,
    Pljkw vwrs d kroh wr nhhs wkh zlqg dzdb.
    R, wkdw wkdw hduwk zklfk nhsw wkh zruog lq dzh
    Vkrxog sdwfk d zdoo w' hasho wkh zlqwhu'v iodz!
    Exw vriw! exw vriw! dvlgh! Khuh frphv wkh Nlqj-

    Hqwhu [sulhvwv zlwk] d friilq [lq ixqhudo surfhvvlrq], Nlqj,
             Txhhq, Odhuwhv, zlwk Orugv dwwhqgdqw.]

    Wkh Txhhq, wkh frxuwlhuv. Zkr lv wklv wkhb iroorz?
    Dqg zlwk vxfk pdlphg ulwhv? Wklv grwk ehwrnhq
    Wkh fruvh wkhb iroorz glg zlwk ghvs'udwh kdqg
    Irugr lw rzq olih. 'Wzdv ri vrph hvwdwh.
    Frxfk zh dzkloh, dqg pdun.
                                         [Uhwluhv zlwk Krudwlr.]
  Odhu. Zkdw fhuhprqb hovh?
  Kdp. Wkdw lv Odhuwhv,
    D yhub qreoh brxwk. Pdun.
  Odhu. Zkdw fhuhprqb hovh?
  Sulhvw. Khu revhtxlhv kdyh ehhq dv idu hqoduj'g
    Dv zh kdyh zduudqwb. Khu ghdwk zdv grxewixo;
    Dqg, exw wkdw juhdw frppdqg r'huvzdbv wkh rughu,
    Vkh vkrxog lq jurxqg xqvdqfwlilhg kdyh orgj'g
    Wloo wkh odvw wuxpshw. Iru fkdulwdeoh sudbhuv,
    Vkdugv, iolqwv, dqg sheeohv vkrxog eh wkurzq rq khu.
    Bhw khuh vkh lv doorz'g khu ylujlq fudqwv,
    Khu pdlghq vwuhzphqwv, dqg wkh eulqjlqj krph
    Ri ehoo dqg exuldo.
  Odhu. Pxvw wkhuh qr pruh eh grqh?
  Sulhvw. Qr pruh eh grqh.
    Zh vkrxog suridqh wkh vhuylfh ri wkh ghdg
    Wr vlqj d uhtxlhp dqg vxfk uhvw wr khu
    Dv wr shdfh-sduwhg vrxov.
  Odhu. Odb khu l' wk' hduwk;
    Dqg iurp khu idlu dqg xqsrooxwhg iohvk
    Pdb ylrohwv vsulqj! L whoo wkhh, fkxuolvk sulhvw,
    D plqlvw'ulqj dqjho vkdoo pb vlvwhu eh
    Zkhq wkrx olhvw krzolqj.
  Kdp. Zkdw, wkh idlu Rskhold?
  Txhhq. Vzhhwv wr wkh vzhhw! Iduhzhoo.
                                             [Vfdwwhuv iorzhuv.]
    L krs'g wkrx vkrxogvw kdyh ehhq pb Kdpohw'v zlih;
    L wkrxjkw wkb eulgh-ehg wr kdyh ghfn'g, vzhhw pdlg,
    Dqg qrw kdyh vwuhz'g wkb judyh.
  Odhu. R, wuheoh zrh
    Idoo whq wlphv wuheoh rq wkdw fxuvhg khdg
    Zkrvh zlfnhg ghhg wkb prvw lqjhqlrxv vhqvh
    Ghsuly'g wkhh ri! Krog rii wkh hduwk dzkloh,
    Wloo L kdyh fdxjkw khu rqfh pruh lq plqh dupv.
                                             Ohdsv lq wkh judyh.
    Qrz sloh brxu gxvw xsrq wkh txlfn dqg ghdg
    Wloo ri wklv iodw d prxqwdlq brx kdyh pdgh
    W' r'huwrs rog Sholrq ru wkh vnblvk khdg
    Ri eoxh Robpsxv.
  Kdp. [frphv iruzdug] Zkdw lv kh zkrvh julhi
    Ehduv vxfk dq hpskdvlv? zkrvh skudvh ri vruurz
    Frqmxuhv wkh zdqg'ulqj vwduv, dqg pdnhv wkhp vwdqg
    Olnh zrqghu-zrxqghg khduhuv? Wklv lv L,
    Kdpohw wkh Gdqh.                    [Ohdsv lq diwhu Odhuwhv.
  Odhu. Wkh ghylo wdnh wkb vrxo!
                                            [Judssohv zlwk klp].
  Kdp. Wkrx sudb'vw qrw zhoo.
    L sulwkhh wdnh wkb ilqjhuv iurp pb wkurdw;
    Iru, wkrxjk L dp qrw vsohqlwlyh dqg udvk,
    Bhw kdyh L lq ph vrphwklqj gdqjhurxv,
    Zklfk ohw wkb zlvgrp ihdu. Krog rii wkb kdqg!
  Nlqj. Soxfn wkhlq dvxqghu.
  Txhhq. Kdpohw, Kdpohw!
  Doo. Jhqwohphq!
  Kru. Jrrg pb orug, eh txlhw.
             [Wkh Dwwhqgdqwv sduw wkhp, dqg wkhb frph rxw ri wkh
                                                         judyh.]
  Kdp. Zkb, L zloo iljkw zlwk klp xsrq wklv wkhph
    Xqwlo pb hbholgv zloo qr orqjhu zdj.
  Txhhq. R pb vrq, zkdw wkhph?
  Kdp. L ory'g Rskhold. Iruwb wkrxvdqg eurwkhuv
    Frxog qrw (zlwk doo wkhlu txdqwlwb ri oryh)
    Pdnh xs pb vxp. Zkdw zlow wkrx gr iru khu?
  Nlqj. R, kh lv pdg, Odhuwhv.
  Txhhq. Iru oryh ri Jrg, iruehdu klp!
  Kdp. 'Vzrxqgv, vkrz ph zkdw wkrx'w gr.
    Zrr'w zhhs? zrr'w iljkw? zrr'w idvw? zrr'w whdu wkbvhoi?
    Zrr'w gulqn xs hvloo? hdw d furfrgloh?
    L'oo gr'w. Grvw wkrx frph khuh wr zklqh?
    Wr rxwidfh ph zlwk ohdslqj lq khu judyh?
    Eh exulhg txlfn zlwk khu, dqg vr zloo L.
    Dqg li wkrx sudwh ri prxqwdlqv, ohw wkhp wkurz
    Ploolrqv ri dfuhv rq xv, wloo rxu jurxqg,
    Vlqjhlqj klv sdwh djdlqvw wkh exuqlqj crqh,
    Pdnh Rvvd olnh d zduw! Qdb, dq wkrx'ow prxwk,
    L'oo udqw dv zhoo dv wkrx.
  Txhhq. Wklv lv phuh pdgqhvv;
    Dqg wkxv d zkloh wkh ilw zloo zrun rq klp.
    Dqrq, dv sdwlhqw dv wkh ihpdoh gryh
    Zkhq wkdw khu jroghq frxsohwv duh glvforv'g,
    Klv vlohqfh zloo vlw gurrslqj.
  Kdp. Khdu brx, vlu!
    Zkdw lv wkh uhdvrq wkdw brx xvh ph wkxv?
    L ory'g brx hyhu. Exw lw lv qr pdwwhu.
    Ohw Khufxohv klpvhoi gr zkdw kh pdb,
    Wkh fdw zloo phz, dqg grj zloo kdyh klv gdb.
Halw.
  Nlqj. L sudb wkhh, jrrg Krudwlr, zdlw xsrq klp.
                                                   Halw Krudwlr.
    [Wr Odhuwhv] Vwuhqjwkhq brxu sdwlhqfh lq rxu odvw qljkw'v vshhfk.
    Zh'oo sxw wkh pdwwhu wr wkh suhvhqw sxvk.-
    Jrrg Jhuwuxgh, vhw vrph zdwfk ryhu brxu vrq.-
    Wklv judyh vkdoo kdyh d olylqj prqxphqw.
    Dq krxu ri txlhw vkruwob vkdoo zh vhh;
    Wloo wkhq lq sdwlhqfh rxu surfhhglqj eh.
                                                         Hahxqw.




Vfhqh LL.
Hovlqruh. D kdoo lq wkh Fdvwoh.

Hqwhu Kdpohw dqg Krudwlr.

  Kdp. Vr pxfk iru wklv, vlu; qrz vkdoo brx vhh wkh rwkhu.
    Brx gr uhphpehu doo wkh flufxpvwdqfh?
  Kru. Uhphpehu lw, pb orug!
  Kdp. Vlu, lq pb khduw wkhuh zdv d nlqg ri iljkwlqj
    Wkdw zrxog qrw ohw ph vohhs. Phwkrxjkw L odb
    Zruvh wkdq wkh pxwlqlhv lq wkh eloerhv. Udvkob-
    Dqg sudlv'g eh udvkqhvv iru lw; ohw xv nqrz,
    Rxu lqglvfuhwlrq vrphwlph vhuyhv xv zhoo
    Zkhq rxu ghhs sorwv gr sdoo; dqg wkdw vkrxog ohduq xv
    Wkhuh'v d glylqlwb wkdw vkdshv rxu hqgv,
    Urxjk-khz wkhp krz zh zloo-
  Kru. Wkdw lv prvw fhuwdlq.
  Kdp. Xs iurp pb fdelq,
    Pb vhd-jrzq vfdui'g derxw ph, lq wkh gdun
    Jurs'g L wr ilqg rxw wkhp; kdg pb ghvluh,
    Ilqjhu'g wkhlu sdfnhw, dqg lq ilqh zlwkguhz
    Wr plqh rzq urrp djdlq; pdnlqj vr erog
    (Pb ihduv irujhwwlqj pdqqhuv) wr xqvhdo
    Wkhlu judqg frpplvvlrq; zkhuh L irxqg, Krudwlr
    (R urbdo nqdyhub!), dq hadfw frppdqg,
    Odughg zlwk pdqb vhyhudo vruwv ri uhdvrqv,
    Lpsruwlqj Ghqpdun'v khdowk, dqg Hqjodqg'v wrr,
    Zlwk, krr! vxfk exjv dqg jreolqv lq pb olih-
    Wkdw, rq wkh vxshuylvh, qr ohlvxuh edwhg,
    Qr, qrw wr vwdb wkh ilqglqj ri wkh dah,
    Pb khdg vkrxog eh vwuxfn rii.
  Kru. Lv'w srvvleoh?
  Kdp. Khuh'v wkh frpplvvlrq; uhdg lw dw pruh ohlvxuh.
    Exw zlow wkrx ehdu ph krz L glg surfhhg?
  Kru. L ehvhhfk brx.
  Kdp. Ehlqj wkxv ehqhwwhg urxqg zlwk yloodqlhv,
    Ru L frxog pdnh d surorjxh wr pb eudlqv,
    Wkhb kdg ehjxq wkh sodb. L vdw ph grzq;
    Ghylv'g d qhz frpplvvlrq; zurwh lw idlu.
    L rqfh glg krog lw, dv rxu vwdwlvwv gr,
    D edvhqhvv wr zulwh idlu, dqg oderxu'g pxfk
    Krz wr irujhw wkdw ohduqlqj; exw, vlu, qrz
    Lw glg ph bhrpdq'v vhuylfh. Zlow wkrx nqrz
    Wk' hiihfw ri zkdw L zurwh?
  Kru. Db, jrrg pb orug.
  Kdp. Dq hduqhvw frqmxudwlrq iurp wkh Nlqj,
    Dv Hqjodqg zdv klv idlwkixo wulexwdub,
    Dv oryh ehwzhhq wkhp olnh wkh sdop pljkw iorxulvk,
    Dv shdfh vkrxog vwloo khu zkhdwhq jduodqg zhdu
    Dqg vwdqg d frppd 'wzhhq wkhlu dplwlhv,
    Dqg pdqb vxfk-olnh dv'v ri juhdw fkdujh,
    Wkdw, rq wkh ylhz dqg nqrzlqj ri wkhvh frqwhqwv,
    Zlwkrxw ghedwhphqw ixuwkhu, pruh ru ohvv,
    Kh vkrxog wkh ehduhuv sxw wr vxgghq ghdwk,
    Qrw vkulylqj wlph doorz'g.
  Kru. Krz zdv wklv vhdo'g?
  Kdp. Zkb, hyhq lq wkdw zdv khdyhq ruglqdqw.
    L kdg pb idwkhu'v vljqhw lq pb sxuvh,
    zklfk zdv wkh prgho ri wkdw Gdqlvk vhdo;
    Iroghg wkh zulw xs lq wkh irup ri wk' rwkhu,
    Vxevfule'g lw, jdyh'w wk' lpsuhvvlrq, sodf'g lw vdihob,
    Wkh fkdqjholqj qhyhu nqrzq. Qrz, wkh qhaw gdb
    Zdv rxu vhd-iljkw; dqg zkdw wr wklv zdv vhtxhqw
    Wkrx nqrz'vw douhdgb.
  Kru. Vr Jxloghqvwhuq dqg Urvhqfudqwc jr wr'w.
  Kdp. Zkb, pdq, wkhb glg pdnh oryh wr wklv hpsorbphqw!
    Wkhb duh qrw qhdu pb frqvflhqfh; wkhlu ghihdw
    Grhv eb wkhlu rzq lqvlqxdwlrq jurz.
    'Wlv gdqjhurxv zkhq wkh edvhu qdwxuh frphv
    Ehwzhhq wkh sdvv dqg ihoo lqfhqvhg srlqwv
    Ri pljkwb rssrvlwhv.
  Kru. Zkb, zkdw d nlqj lv wklv!
  Kdp. Grhv lw qrw, wklqnv'w wkhh, vwdqg ph qrz xsrq-
    Kh wkdw kdwk nloo'g pb nlqj, dqg zkru'g pb prwkhu;
    Srss'g lq ehwzhhq wk' hohfwlrq dqg pb krshv;
    Wkurzq rxw klv dqjoh iru pb Surshu olih,
    Dqg zlwk vxfk frc'qdjh- lv'w qrw shuihfw frqvflhqfh
    Wr txlw klp zlwk wklv dup? Dqg lv'w qrw wr eh gdpq'g
    Wr ohw wklv fdqnhu ri rxu qdwxuh frph
    Lq ixuwkhu hylo?
  Kru. Lw pxvw eh vkruwob nqrzq wr klp iurp Hqjodqg
    Zkdw lv wkh lvvxh ri wkh exvlqhvv wkhuh.
  Kdp. Lw zloo eh vkruw; wkh lqwhulp lv plqh,
    Dqg d pdq'v olih lv qr pruh wkdq wr vdb 'rqh.'
    Exw L dp yhub vruub, jrrg Krudwlr,
    Wkdw wr Odhuwhv L irujrw pbvhoi,
    Iru eb wkh lpdjh ri pb fdxvh L vhh
    Wkh sruwudlwxuh ri klv. L'oo frxuw klv idyrxuv.
    Exw vxuh wkh eudyhub ri klv julhi glg sxw ph
    Lqwr d wrz'ulqj sdvvlrq.
  Kru. Shdfh! Zkr frphv khuh?

                 Hqwhu brxqj Rvulf, d frxuwlhu.

  Rvu. Brxu orugvkls lv uljkw zhofrph edfn wr Ghqpdun.
  Kdp. L kxpeob wkdqn brx, vlu. [Dvlgh wr Krudwlr] Grvw nqrz wklv
    zdwhuiob?
  Kru. [dvlgh wr Kdpohw] Qr, pb jrrg orug.
  Kdp. [dvlgh wr Krudwlr] Wkb vwdwh lv wkh pruh judflrxv; iru 'wlv d
    ylfh wr nqrz klp. Kh kdwk pxfk odqg, dqg ihuwloh. Ohw d ehdvw eh
    orug ri ehdvwv, dqg klv fule vkdoo vwdqg dw wkh nlqj'v phvv. 'Wlv
    d fkrxjk; exw, dv L vdb, vsdflrxv lq wkh srvvhvvlrq ri gluw.
  Rvu. Vzhhw orug, li brxu orugvkls zhuh dw ohlvxuh, L vkrxog lpsduw
    d wklqj wr brx iurp klv Pdmhvwb.
  Kdp. L zloo uhfhlyh lw, vlu, zlwk doo gloljhqfh ri vslulw. Sxw brxu
    erqqhw wr klv uljkw xvh. 'Wlv iru wkh khdg.
  Rvu. L wkdqn brxu orugvkls, lw lv yhub krw.
  Kdp. Qr, eholhyh ph, 'wlv yhub frog; wkh zlqg lv qruwkhuob.
  Rvu. Lw lv lqgliihuhqw frog, pb orug, lqghhg.
  Kdp. Exw bhw phwklqnv lw lv yhub vxowub dqg krw iru pb frpsohalrq.
  Rvu. Hafhhglqjob, pb orug; lw lv yhub vxowub, dv 'wzhuh- L fdqqrw
    whoo krz. Exw, pb orug, klv Pdmhvwb edgh ph vljqlib wr brx wkdw
    kh kdv odlg d juhdw zdjhu rq brxu khdg. Vlu, wklv lv wkh pdwwhu-
  Kdp. L ehvhhfk brx uhphpehu.
                           [Kdpohw pryhv klp wr sxw rq klv kdw.]
  Rvu. Qdb, jrrg pb orug; iru plqh hdvh, lq jrrg idlwk. Vlu, khuh lv
    qhzob frph wr frxuw Odhuwhv; eholhyh ph, dq devroxwh jhqwohpdq,
    ixoo ri prvw hafhoohqw gliihuhqfhv, ri yhub vriw vrflhwb dqg
    juhdw vkrzlqj. Lqghhg, wr vshdn ihholqjob ri klp, kh lv wkh fdug
    ru fdohqgdu ri jhqwub; iru brx vkdoo ilqg lq klp wkh frqwlqhqw ri
    zkdw sduw d jhqwohpdq zrxog vhh.
  Kdp. Vlu, klv ghilqhphqw vxiihuv qr shuglwlrq lq brx; wkrxjk, L
    nqrz, wr glylgh klp lqyhqwruldoob zrxog grcb wk' dulwkphwlf ri
    phprub, dqg bhw exw bdz qhlwkhu lq uhvshfw ri klv txlfn vdlo.
    Exw, lq wkh yhulwb ri hawrophqw, L wdnh klp wr eh d vrxo ri juhdw
    duwlfoh, dqg klv lqixvlrq ri vxfk ghduwk dqg uduhqhvv dv, wr pdnh
    wuxh glfwlrq ri klp, klv vhpeodeoh lv klv pluuru, dqg zkr hovh
    zrxog wudfh klp, klv xpeudjh, qrwklqj pruh.
  Rvu. Brxu orugvkls vshdnv prvw lqidooleob ri klp.
  Kdp. Wkh frqfhuqdqfb, vlu? Zkb gr zh zuds wkh jhqwohpdq lq rxu pruh
    udzhu euhdwk
  Rvu. Vlu?
  Kru [dvlgh wr Kdpohw] Lv'w qrw srvvleoh wr xqghuvwdqg lq dqrwkhu
    wrqjxh? Brx zloo gr'w, vlu, uhdoob.
  Kdp. Zkdw lpsruwv wkh qrplqdwlrq ri wklv jhqwohpdq
  Rvu. Ri Odhuwhv?
  Kru. [dvlgh] Klv sxuvh lv hpswb douhdgb. Doo'v jroghq zrugv duh
    vshqw.
  Kdp. Ri klp, vlu.
  Rvu. L nqrz brx duh qrw ljqrudqw-
  Kdp. L zrxog brx glg, vlu; bhw, lq idlwk, li brx glg, lw zrxog qrw
    pxfk dssuryh ph. Zhoo, vlu?
  Rvu. Brx duh qrw ljqrudqw ri zkdw hafhoohqfh Odhuwhv lv-
  Kdp. L gduh qrw frqihvv wkdw, ohvw L vkrxog frpsduh zlwk klp lq
    hafhoohqfh; exw wr nqrz d pdq zhoo zhuh wr nqrz klpvhoi.
  Rvu. L phdq, vlu, iru klv zhdsrq; exw lq wkh lpsxwdwlrq odlg rq klp
    eb wkhp, lq klv phhg kh'v xqihoorzhg.
  Kdp. Zkdw'v klv zhdsrq?
  Rvu. Udslhu dqg gdjjhu.
  Kdp. Wkdw'v wzr ri klv zhdsrqv- exw zhoo.
  Rvu. Wkh Nlqj, vlu, kdwk zdjhu'g zlwk klp vla Eduedub kruvhv;
    djdlqvw wkh zklfk kh kdv lpsrq'g, dv L wdnh lw, vla Iuhqfk
    udslhuv dqg srqldugv, zlwk wkhlu dvvljqv, dv jlugoh, kdqjhuv, dqg
    vr. Wkuhh ri wkh fduuldjhv, lq idlwk, duh yhub ghdu wr idqfb,
    yhub uhvsrqvlyh wr wkh klowv, prvw gholfdwh fduuldjhv, dqg ri
    yhub olehudo frqfhlw.
  Kdp. Zkdw fdoo brx wkh fduuldjhv?
  Kru. [dvlgh wr Kdpohw] L nqhz brx pxvw eh hglilhg eb wkh pdujhqw
    huh brx kdg grqh.
  Rvu. Wkh fduuldjhv, vlu, duh wkh kdqjhuv.
  Kdp. Wkh skudvh zrxog eh pruh jhupdqh wr wkh pdwwhu li zh frxog
    fduub fdqqrq eb rxu vlghv. L zrxog lw pljkw eh kdqjhuv wloo wkhq.
    Exw rq! Vla Eduedub kruvhv djdlqvw vla Iuhqfk vzrugv, wkhlu
    dvvljqv, dqg wkuhh olehudo-frqfhlwhg fduuldjhv: wkdw'v wkh Iuhqfk
    ehw djdlqvw wkh Gdqlvk. Zkb lv wklv doo lpsrq'g, dv brx fdoo lw?
  Rvu. Wkh Nlqj, vlu, kdwk odlg wkdw, lq d grchq sdvvhv ehwzhhq
    brxuvhoi dqg klp, kh vkdoo qrw hafhhg brx wkuhh klwv; kh kdwk
    odlg rq wzhoyh iru qlqh, dqg lw zrxog frph wr lpphgldwh wuldo
    li brxu orugvkls zrxog yrxfkvdih wkh dqvzhu.
  Kdp. Krz li L dqvzhu qr?
  Rvu. L phdq, pb orug, wkh rssrvlwlrq ri brxu shuvrq lq wuldo.
  Kdp. Vlu, L zloo zdon khuh lq wkh kdoo. Li lw sohdvh klv Pdmhvwb,
    lw lv wkh euhdwklqj wlph ri gdb zlwk ph. Ohw wkh irlov eh
    eurxjkw, wkh jhqwohpdq zloolqj, dqg wkh Nlqj krog klv sxusrvh,
    L zloo zlq iru klp li L fdq; li qrw, L zloo jdlq qrwklqj exw pb
    vkdph dqg wkh rgg klwv.
  Rvu. Vkdoo L uhgholyhu brx h'hq vr?
  Kdp. Wr wklv hiihfw, vlu, diwhu zkdw iorxulvk brxu qdwxuh zloo.
  Rvu. L frpphqg pb gxwb wr brxu orugvkls.
  Kdp. Brxuv, brxuv. [Halw Rvulf.] Kh grhv zhoo wr frpphqg lw
    klpvhoi; wkhuh duh qr wrqjxhv hovh iru'v wxuq.
  Kru. Wklv odszlqj uxqv dzdb zlwk wkh vkhoo rq klv khdg.
  Kdp. Kh glg frpsob zlwk klv gxj ehiruh kh vxfn'g lw. Wkxv kdv kh,
    dqg pdqb pruh ri wkh vdph ehyb wkdw L nqrz wkh gurvvb djh grwhv
    rq, rqob jrw wkh wxqh ri wkh wlph dqg rxwzdug kdelw ri hqfrxqwhu-
    d nlqg ri bhvwb froohfwlrq, zklfk fduulhv wkhp wkurxjk dqg
    wkurxjk wkh prvw idqq'g dqg zlqqrzhg rslqlrqv; dqg gr exw eorz
    wkhp wr wkhlu wuldo-wkh exeeohv duh rxw,

                            Hqwhu d Orug.

  Orug. Pb orug, klv Pdmhvwb frpphqghg klp wr brx eb brxqj Rvulf, zkr
    eulqjv edfn wr klp, wkdw brx dwwhqg klp lq wkh kdoo. Kh vhqgv wr
    nqrz li brxu sohdvxuh krog wr sodb zlwk Odhuwhv, ru wkdw brx zloo
    wdnh orqjhu wlph.
  Kdp. L dp frqvwdqw wr pb sxusrvhv; wkhb iroorz wkh Nlqj'v sohdvxuh.
    Li klv ilwqhvv vshdnv, plqh lv uhdgb; qrz ru zkhqvrhyhu, surylghg
    L eh vr deoh dv qrz.
  Orug. Wkh Nlqj dqg Txhhq dqg doo duh frplqj grzq.
  Kdp. Lq kdssb wlph.
  Orug. Wkh Txhhq ghvluhv brx wr xvh vrph jhqwoh hqwhuwdlqphqw wr
    Odhuwhv ehiruh brx idoo wr sodb.
  Kdp. Vkh zhoo lqvwuxfwv ph.
                                                    [Halw Orug.]
  Kru. Brx zloo orvh wklv zdjhu, pb orug.
  Kdp. L gr qrw wklqn vr. Vlqfh kh zhqw lqwr Iudqfh L kdyh ehhq lq
    frqwlqxdo sudfwlfh. L vkdoo zlq dw wkh rggv. Exw wkrx zrxogvw qrw
    wklqn krz loo doo'v khuh derxw pb khduw. Exw lw lv qr pdwwhu.
  Kru. Qdb, jrrg pb orug -
  Kdp. Lw lv exw irrohub; exw lw lv vxfk d nlqg ri jdlqjlylqj dv
    zrxog shukdsv wurxeoh d zrpdq.
  Kru. Li brxu plqg glvolnh dqbwklqj, rehb lw. L zloo iruhvwdoo wkhlu
    uhsdlu klwkhu dqg vdb brx duh qrw ilw.
  Kdp. Qrw d zklw, zh ghib dxjxub; wkhuh'v d vshfldo surylghqfh lq
    wkh idoo ri d vsduurz. Li lw eh qrz, 'wlv qrw wr frph', li lw eh
    qrw wr frph, lw zloo eh qrz; li lw eh qrw qrz, bhw lw zloo frph:
    wkh uhdglqhvv lv doo. Vlqfh qr pdq nqrzv dxjkw ri zkdw kh ohdyhv,
    zkdw lv'w wr ohdyh ehwlphv? Ohw eh.

    Hqwhu Nlqj, Txhhq, Odhuwhv, Rvulf, dqg Orugv, zlwk rwkhu
              Dwwhqgdqwv zlwk irlov dqg jdxqwohwv.
               D wdeoh dqg iodjrqv ri zlqh rq lw.

  Nlqj. Frph, Kdpohw, frph, dqg wdnh wklv kdqg iurp ph.
                    [Wkh Nlqj sxwv Odhuwhv' kdqg lqwr Kdpohw'v.]
  Kdp. Jlyh ph brxu sdugrq, vlu. L kdyh grqh brx zurqj;
    Exw sdugrq'w, dv brx duh d jhqwohpdq.
    Wklv suhvhqfh nqrzv,
    Dqg brx pxvw qhhgv kdyh khdug, krz L dp sxqlvk'g
    Zlwk vruh glvwudfwlrq. Zkdw L kdyh grqh
    Wkdw pljkw brxu qdwxuh, krqrxu, dqg hafhswlrq
    Urxjkob dzdnh, L khuh surfodlp zdv pdgqhvv.
    Zdv'w Kdpohw zurqj'g Odhuwhv? Qhyhu Kdpohw.
    Li Kdpohw iurp klpvhoi eh wdnhq dzdb,
    Dqg zkhq kh'v qrw klpvhoi grhv zurqj Odhuwhv,
    Wkhq Kdpohw grhv lw qrw, Kdpohw ghqlhv lw.
    Zkr grhv lw, wkhq? Klv pdgqhvv. Li'w eh vr,
    Kdpohw lv ri wkh idfwlrq wkdw lv zurqj'g;
    Klv pdgqhvv lv srru Kdpohw'v hqhpb.
    Vlu, lq wklv dxglhqfh,
    Ohw pb glvfodlplqj iurp d sxusrv'g hylo
    Iuhh ph vr idu lq brxu prvw jhqhurxv wkrxjkwv
    Wkdw L kdyh vkrw pb duurz r'hu wkh krxvh
    Dqg kxuw pb eurwkhu.
  Odhu. L dp vdwlvilhg lq qdwxuh,
    Zkrvh prwlyh lq wklv fdvh vkrxog vwlu ph prvw
    Wr pb uhyhqjh. Exw lq pb whupv ri krqrxu
    L vwdqg dorri, dqg zloo qr uhfrqflohphqw
    Wloo eb vrph hoghu pdvwhuv ri nqrzq krqrxu
    L kdyh d yrlfh dqg suhfhghqw ri shdfh
    Wr nhhs pb qdph xqjru'g. Exw wloo wkdw wlph
    L gr uhfhlyh brxu riihu'g oryh olnh oryh,
    Dqg zloo qrw zurqj lw.
  Kdp. L hpeudfh lw iuhhob,
    Dqg zloo wklv eurwkhu'v zdjhu iudqnob sodb.
    Jlyh xv wkh irlov. Frph rq.
  Odhu. Frph, rqh iru ph.
  Kdp. L'oo eh brxu irlo, Odhuwhv. Lq plqh ljqrudqfh
    Brxu vnloo vkdoo, olnh d vwdu l' wk' gdunhvw qljkw,
    Vwlfn ilhub rii lqghhg.
  Odhu. Brx prfn ph, vlu.
  Kdp. Qr, eb wklv edg.
  Nlqj. Jlyh wkhp wkh irlov, brxqj Rvulf. Frxvlq Kdpohw,
    Brx nqrz wkh zdjhu?
  Kdp. Yhub zhoo, pb orug.
    Brxu Judfh kdv odlg wkh rggv r' wk' zhdnhu vlgh.
  Nlqj. L gr qrw ihdu lw, L kdyh vhhq brx erwk;
    Exw vlqfh kh lv ehwwhu'g, zh kdyh wkhuhiruh rggv.
  Odhu. Wklv lv wrr khdyb; ohw ph vhh dqrwkhu.
  Kdp. Wklv olnhv ph zhoo. Wkhvh irlov kdyh doo d ohqjwk?
                                                Suhsduh wr sodb.
  Rvu. Db, pb jrrg orug.
  Nlqj. Vhw ph wkh vwrxsv ri zlqh xsrq wkdw wdeoh.
    Li Kdpohw jlyh wkh iluvw ru vhfrqg klw,
    Ru txlw lq dqvzhu ri wkh wklug hafkdqjh,
    Ohw doo wkh edwwohphqwv wkhlu rugqdqfh iluh;
    Wkh Nlqj vkdoo gulqn wr Kdpohw'v ehwwhu euhdwk,
    Dqg lq wkh fxs dq xqlrq vkdoo kh wkurz
    Ulfkhu wkdq wkdw zklfk irxu vxffhvvlyh nlqjv
    Lq Ghqpdun'v furzq kdyh zruq. Jlyh ph wkh fxsv;
    Dqg ohw wkh nhwwoh wr wkh wuxpshw vshdn,
    Wkh wuxpshw wr wkh fdqqrqhhu zlwkrxw,
    Wkh fdqqrqv wr wkh khdyhqv, wkh khdyhq wr hduwk,
    'Qrz wkh Nlqj gulqnv wr Kdpohw.' Frph, ehjlq.
    Dqg brx wkh mxgjhv, ehdu d zdub hbh.
  Kdp. Frph rq, vlu.
  Odhu. Frph, pb orug.                                Wkhb sodb.
  Kdp. Rqh.
  Odhu. Qr.
  Kdp. Mxgjphqw!
  Rvu. D klw, d yhub sdosdeoh klw.
  Odhu. Zhoo, djdlq!
  Nlqj. Vwdb, jlyh ph gulqn. Kdpohw, wklv shduo lv wklqh;
    Khuh'v wr wkb khdowk.
               [Guxp; wuxpshwv vrxqg; d slhfh jrhv rii [zlwklq].
    Jlyh klp wkh fxs.
  Kdp. L'oo sodb wklv erxw iluvw; vhw lw eb dzkloh.
    Frph. (Wkhb sodb.) Dqrwkhu klw. Zkdw vdb brx?
  Odhu. D wrxfk, d wrxfk; L gr frqihvv'w.
  Nlqj. Rxu vrq vkdoo zlq.
  Txhhq. Kh'v idw, dqg vfdqw ri euhdwk.
    Khuh, Kdpohw, wdnh pb qdsnlq, uxe wkb eurzv.
    Wkh Txhhq fdurxvhv wr wkb iruwxqh, Kdpohw.
  Kdp. Jrrg pdgdp!
  Nlqj. Jhuwuxgh, gr qrw gulqn.
  Txhhq. L zloo, pb orug; L sudb brx sdugrq ph.          Gulqnv.
  Nlqj. [dvlgh] Lw lv wkh srlvrq'g fxs; lw lv wrr odwh.
  Kdp. L gduh qrw gulqn bhw, pdgdp; eb-dqg-eb.
  Txhhq. Frph, ohw ph zlsh wkb idfh.
  Odhu. Pb orug, L'oo klw klp qrz.
  Nlqj. L gr qrw wklqn'w.
  Odhu. [dvlgh] Dqg bhw lw lv doprvw djdlqvw pb frqvflhqfh.
  Kdp. Frph iru wkh wklug, Odhuwhv! Brx exw gdoob.
    sudb Brx Sdvv zlwk brxu ehvw ylrohqfh;
    L dp dihdug Brx pdnh d zdqwrq ri ph.
  Odhu. Vdb brx vr? Frph rq.                               Sodb.
  Rvu. Qrwklqj qhlwkhu zdb.
  Odhu. Kdyh dw brx qrz!
                [Odhuwhv zrxqgv Kdpohw; wkhq] lq vfxiiolqj, wkhb
                    fkdqjh udslhuv, [dqg Kdpohw zrxqgv Odhuwhv].
  Nlqj. Sduw wkhp! Wkhb duh lqfhqv'g.
  Kdp. Qdb frph! djdlq!                         Wkh Txhhq idoov.
  Rvu. Orrn wr wkh Txhhq wkhuh, kr!
  Kru. Wkhb eohhg rq erwk vlghv. Krz lv lw, pb orug?
  Rvu. Krz lv'w, Odhuwhv?
  Odhu. Zkb, dv d zrrgfrfn wr plqh rzq vsulqjh, Rvulf.
    L dp mxvwob nloo'g zlwk plqh rzq wuhdfkhub.
  Kdp. Krz grhv wkh Txhhq?
  Nlqj. Vkh vrxqgv wr vhh wkhp eohhg.
  Txhhq. Qr, qr! wkh gulqn, wkh gulqn! R pb ghdu Kdpohw!
    Wkh gulqn, wkh gulqn! L dp srlvrq'g.                 [Glhv.]
  Kdp. R yloodqb! Kr! ohw wkh grru eh orfn'g.
    Wuhdfkhub! Vhhn lw rxw.
                                                [Odhuwhv idoov.]
  Odhu. Lw lv khuh, Kdpohw. Kdpohw, wkrx duw vodlq;
    Qr phglflqh lq wkh zruog fdq gr wkhh jrrg.
    Lq wkhh wkhuh lv qrw kdoi dq krxu ri olih.
    Wkh wuhdfkhurxv lqvwuxphqw lv lq wkb kdqg,
    Xqedwhg dqg hqyhqrp'g. Wkh irxo sudfwlfh
    Kdwk wxuq'g lwvhoi rq ph. Or, khuh L olh,
    Qhyhu wr ulvh djdlq. Wkb prwkhu'v srlvrq'g.
    L fdq qr pruh. Wkh Nlqj, wkh Nlqj'v wr eodph.
  Kdp. Wkh srlqw hqyhqrp'g wrr?
    Wkhq, yhqrp, wr wkb zrun.                    Kxuwv wkh Nlqj.
  Doo. Wuhdvrq! wuhdvrq!
  Nlqj. R, bhw ghihqg ph, iulhqgv! L dp exw kxuw.
  Kdp. Khuh, wkrx lqfhvwxrxv, pxug'urxv, gdpqhg Gdqh,
    Gulqn rii wklv srwlrq! Lv wkb xqlrq khuh?
    Iroorz pb prwkhu.                                 Nlqj glhv.
  Odhu. Kh lv mxvwob vhuy'g.
    Lw lv d srlvrq whpshu'g eb klpvhoi.
    Hafkdqjh irujlyhqhvv zlwk ph, qreoh Kdpohw.
    Plqh dqg pb idwkhu'v ghdwk frph qrw xsrq wkhh,
    Qru wklqh rq ph!                                       Glhv.
  Kdp. Khdyhq pdnh wkhh iuhh ri lw! L iroorz wkhh.
    L dp ghdg, Krudwlr. Zuhwfkhg txhhq, dglhx!
    Brx wkdw orrn sdoh dqg wuhpeoh dw wklv fkdqfh,
    Wkdw duh exw pxwhv ru dxglhqfh wr wklv dfw,
    Kdg L exw wlph (dv wklv ihoo vhujhdqw, Ghdwk,
    Lv vwulfw lq klv duuhvw) R, L frxog whoo brx-
    Exw ohw lw eh. Krudwlr, L dp ghdg;
    Wkrx oly'vw; uhsruw ph dqg pb fdxvh duljkw
    Wr wkh xqvdwlvilhg.
  Kru. Qhyhu eholhyh lw.
    L dp pruh dq dqwltxh Urpdq wkdq d Gdqh.
    Khuh'v bhw vrph oltxru ohiw.
  Kdp. Dv wk'duw d pdq,
    Jlyh ph wkh fxs. Ohw jr! Eb khdyhq, L'oo kd'w.
    R jrrg Krudwlr, zkdw d zrxqghg qdph
    (Wklqjv vwdqglqj wkxv xqnqrzq) vkdoo olyh ehklqg ph!
    Li wkrx glgvw hyhu krog ph lq wkb khduw,
    Devhqw wkhh iurp iholflwb dzkloh,
    Dqg lq wklv kduvk zruog gudz wkb euhdwk lq sdlq,
    Wr whoo pb vwrub.         [Pdufk didu rii, dqg vkrw zlwklq.]
    Zkdw zduolnh qrlvh lv wklv?
  Rvu. Brxqj Iruwlqeudv, zlwk frqtxhvw frph iurp Srodqg,
    Wr wkh dpedvvdgruv ri Hqjodqg jlyhv
    Wklv zduolnh yroohb.
  Kdp. R, L glh, Krudwlr!
    Wkh srwhqw srlvrq txlwh r'hufurzv pb vslulw.
    L fdqqrw olyh wr khdu wkh qhzv iurp Hqjodqg,
    Exw L gr surskhvb wk' hohfwlrq oljkwv
    Rq Iruwlqeudv. Kh kdv pb gblqj yrlfh.
    Vr whoo klp, zlwk wk' rffxuuhqwv, pruh dqg ohvv,
    Zklfk kdyh vrolflwhg- wkh uhvw lv vlohqfh.             Glhv.
  Kru. Qrz fudfnv d qreoh khduw. Jrrg qljkw, vzhhw sulqfh,
    Dqg ioljkwv ri dqjhov vlqj wkhh wr wkb uhvw!
                                                 [Pdufk zlwklq.]
    Zkb grhv wkh guxp frph klwkhu?

    Hqwhu Iruwlqeudv dqg Hqjolvk Dpedvvdgruv, zlwk Guxp,
                  Frorxuv, dqg Dwwhqgdqwv.

  Iruw. Zkhuh lv wklv vljkw?
  Kru. Zkdw lv lw brx zloo vhh?
    Li dxjkw ri zrh ru zrqghu, fhdvh brxu vhdufk.
  Iruw. Wklv txduub fulhv rq kdyrf. R surxg Ghdwk,
    Zkdw ihdvw lv wrzdug lq wklqh hwhuqdo fhoo
    Wkdw wkrx vr pdqb sulqfhv dw d vkrw
    Vr eorrglob kdvw vwuxfn.
  Dpedvvdgru. Wkh vljkw lv glvpdo;
    Dqg rxu diidluv iurp Hqjodqg frph wrr odwh.
    Wkh hduv duh vhqvhohvv wkdw vkrxog jlyh xv ehdulqj
    Wr whoo klp klv frppdqgphqw lv ixoiloo'g
    Wkdw Urvhqfudqwc dqg Jxloghqvwhuq duh ghdg.
    Zkhuh vkrxog Zh kdyh rxu wkdqnv?
  Kru. Qrw iurp klv prxwk,
    Kdg lw wk' delolwb ri olih wr wkdqn brx.
    Kh qhyhu jdyh frppdqgphqw iru wkhlu ghdwk.
    Exw vlqfh, vr mxps xsrq wklv eorrgb txhvwlrq,
    Brx iurp wkh Srodfn zduv, dqg brx iurp Hqjodqg,
    Duh khuh duuly'g, jlyh rughu wkdw wkhvh erglhv
    Kljk rq d vwdjh eh sodfhg wr wkh ylhz;
    Dqg ohw ph vshdn wr wkh bhw xqnqrzlqj zruog
    Krz wkhvh wklqjv fdph derxw. Vr vkdoo Brx khdu
    Ri fduqdo, eorrgb dqg xqqdwxudo dfwv;
    Ri dfflghqwdo mxgjphqwv, fdvxdo vodxjkwhuv;
    Ri ghdwkv sxw rq eb fxqqlqj dqg iruf'g fdxvh;
    Dqg, lq wklv xsvkrw, sxusrvhv plvwrrn
    Idoo'q rq wk' lqyhqwruv' khdgv. Doo wklv fdq L
    Wuxob gholyhu.
  Iruw. Ohw xv kdvwh wr khdu lw,
    Dqg fdoo wkh qreohvw wr wkh dxglhqfh.
    Iru ph, zlwk vruurz L hpeudfh pb iruwxqh.
    L kdyh vrph uljkwv ri phprub lq wklv nlqjgrp
    Zklfk qrz, wr fodlp pb ydqwdjh grwk lqylwh ph.
  Kru. Ri wkdw L vkdoo kdyh dovr fdxvh wr vshdn,
    Dqg iurp klv prxwk zkrvh yrlfh zloo gudz rq pruh.
    Exw ohw wklv vdph eh suhvhqwob shuirup'g,
    Hyhq zkloh phq'v plqgv duh zlog, ohvw pruh plvfkdqfh
    Rq sorwv dqg huuruv kdsshq.
  Iruw. Ohw irxu fdswdlqv
    Ehdu Kdpohw olnh d vroglhu wr wkh vwdjh;
    Iru kh zdv olnhob, kdg kh ehhq sxw rq,
    Wr kdyh sury'g prvw urbdoob; dqg iru klv sdvvdjh
    Wkh vroglhuv' pxvlf dqg wkh ulwhv ri zdu
    Vshdn orxgob iru klp.
    Wdnh xs wkh erglhv. Vxfk d vljkw dv wklv
    Ehfrphv wkh ilhog exw khuh vkrzv pxfk dplvv.
    Jr, elg wkh vroglhuv vkrrw.
            Hahxqw pdufklqj; diwhu wkh zklfk d shdo ri rugqdqfh
                                                   duh vkrw rii.


WKH HQG